VOL. II.A
CHAPTER I.
Beverley Randolph to Victor Chevillere
.
High Hills of the Santee, South Carolina
, 18
Dear Friend
,
You
will be surprised to learn that this letter
is written in bed, on a large old portfolio of yours,
while I am propped up with chairs and pillows
behind
;
all during the doctor's absence, and against
the urgent entreaties of the whole house.
I have been ill, Chevillere, exceedingly ill.
You, no doubt, recollect the threats I made to
charge my system with miasma, and thereby take
on the fever-and-ague, by way of making myself
interesting. I had little thought then of the reality,
or how soon that reality would come.
It has come; and, I hope, has gone; but not
the fever-and-ague. I had an ague, it is true, and
fever after it; but the latter, I believe, kept up a
more continued fire upon my system than
intermittents
ever do. Strange too, that when this
attack came upon me without my bidding, I never
once thought of my former interesting schemes;
nor (as it seems to me now) did I think much of
any thing
, except the taste of the medicines.
I can recollect when I thought it must be a
strange and dismal experiencethat of the sick
chamber. It is no such thing. I have vague and
ill-defined recollections of hot days and restless
nights, perhaps; but all the other experience seems
like a long dreamy period of existence.
Nature seems to provide us against the misery
of conscious suffering, by turning our ideas upon
trifles and childish vexations. A man who is ill
with a malignant fever, is an object of dread and
commiseration to his acquaintance, who exclaim,
`How horrible! how dreadful a thing it is!' And
this with regard to his physical sufferings, and in
anticipation of immediate dissolution of soul and
body. We attempt to picture to ourselves what
his thoughts must be.
What is the invalid himself doing all this while?
He is begging for cold water; quarrelling with the
taste of villanous drugs, and abusing his nurse, if
the fever has just then remitted a little. And as
for his thoughtshe has none beyond these things;
his mind is a blank; the past and the future are
obliterated.
The rational creature is lost in the
predominating
exigencies of the animal; the mind seems to
lose the power of combining any but the simple
sensations.
I have not reflected much upon the causes of
these things, because my own mind has but too
lately recovered from that very state. I merely
give the facts of my own experience, because I
know you are fond of gathering up these little
unnoticed
things, and arranging them with your other
natural curiosities.
But I have not told you half yet; my mind
was in a worse state even than that just described;
it was entirely in eclipse. Of that I know nothing
except what Virginia has told me.
You see, I do not call her Bell any more, nor
do I mean to do so; the reason, perhaps, I may be
able to tell you before they take the paper away
from me.
The name Bell, short and alone, somehow
suited her character, as I then understood it, as
well as my feelings towards her. She seemed to
me a lively, intelligent little romp, and I loved her
as such. I did not then think myself capable of
feeling any stronger attachment for any other
character of beauty, or for any deeper or more
profound characteristics of the female heart.
Indeed
,
I doubt whether I knew of, or believed in,
the existence of any better foundation for an
attachment.
Poor, fickle-hearted man! I have changed
already. Be not alarmed, Chevillere; I have not
gone out of the family; I have only changed from
Bell to Virginia.
Now can you solve this truly profound enigma?
No. Then I must unravel the mystery for you.
First then, I have not spoken to her once of
love, unless it was during the two days that I was
deranged; and to tell you the truth, I have some
shrewd suspicion that I did broach the subject
then; nay more, that I did much better for myself
than if I had been sane in mind. This is a
left-handed
compliment to myself, but I cannot help it,
as I cannot challenge myself. Something that I
did or said, during those two days, has certainly
revolutionized her whole conduct towards me, and
every one else in my presence. She has changed
towards me, and hence my change towards her.
I thought her the most charming girl in existence
before; now I have different feelings. Charming
she certainly is, but charming is too cold a term
too much the word of a stranger, to express my
feelings any longer. They are more respectful
nowbut more of this at another time.
Old Tombo has been my constant attendant,
because I preferred him, it seems, to any of the
house servants. He has been devoted to me. I
suppose he little thought that I once had a design
to drown him.
When I returned to sane views of things, the
doctor had gone. I awoke out of a profound
sleep, and found myself lying on my back, with my
face towards the ceiling. In a short time my
recollection
was perfect of every thing which happened
previous to the two days. I lay in that state
collecting
my thoughts a few moments, and then
slowly and silently turned my head towards the
centre of the room. Virginia sat there reading
intently
.
She was paler and thinner than usual, and
her countenance so complete a mirror of her
thoughts, that I imagined I could almost read there
what she read in the book. I had never seen the
same look before, and was struck with it. I at first
thought it nothing more than the result of my
wayward
fancies coming over me again, for I knew
that something had been wrong with me. I closed
my eyes to recover myself, in order to try again;
still her countenance was sad, absorbed, and
deeply thoughtful. I never saw a more wonderful
change; there was not an expression of the
thoughtless
school-girl there.
It was the woman I saw, in
propria persona;
not that she has numbered more than eighteen
years, and that is a long age of feeling; but that
she appeared now so calm, dignified, and sensible;
her beautiful upper lip convulsively tremulous
with deep sympathetic feelings. It was this chord
which first caused my own nervous vibrations.
The nether lip, the eye, and even the cheeks are
obedient in some measure to the will, in expressing
either pathetic or ludicrous ideas. But show me
a tragedian who can convulse the upper lip in those
little (almost) nameless vibrations, which come
from, and go straight to, the heart,and I will
show you a consummate master of his art.
You see I go upon the ground that he can first
operate upon his own feelings sufficiently to touch
this delicate chord, for I hold that it is obedient
to no other monitor.
Is this observation the result of a diseased
mind? Look at those who have had that organ
paralyzed; let them weep; and I think you will
see a
horrid
confirmation of my opinions. Or on
the other hand, deeply touch the feelings of a
sensitive
child or woman, and note the result; I will
abide by your judgment.
I saw that her feelings were not only deeply
affected by what she read, but all her sensibilities
were attuned to a state of thrilling vibration for
which I had never given her credit.
It was my ignorance of this, no doubt, which
caused her playful and artificial manner towards
me, or in other words, she had not until lately (if
now) a very exalted idea of my penetration.
Consequently
she could not have formed a high opinion
of my understanding, for penetration is but the eye
of the soul. No one can go beyond his own
profundity
,
in penetrating the obscure origin of looks,
feelings, and passions in another; and we can
generally go, I think, about to our own depth.
Our opinion of another depends much upon his
opinion of us. This has generally been ascribed
to selfishness in the human heart, and an inordinate
avidity for flattery; but it has likewise a deeper
foundation.
Fools, no doubt, may admire each other for the
pleasure and satisfaction which the thing affords;
but wise men have other interchanges besides the
feelings and passions. First there is the
magnetic
influence (I have no other name for it), which will
open a secret intercourse and understanding
between
two persons, in a room where scores of
duller mortals may be standing by, none the wiser.
It is not purely
magnetic
, because a word or a hint
will sometimes open the door before the secret
influence.
I have been hitherto a most unfortunate fellow
in this respect, for I never could get a great man
to receive the magnetic stream from me. You see
the devil is not entirely cast out.
But seriously, let the change in Virginia be
owing to what it may, the fact was
incontro-vertible
.
There she sat, as completely metamorphosed
as the shoemaker's wife in the play. There was
nothing to intercept my view except the mosquito
nets which here surround all your beds, instead of
the curtains which are used in the middle and, I
suppose, in the northern states.
A full quarter of an hour elapsed while the
foregoing ideas passed through my mind, before
the death-like silence of the sick-chamber was
disturbed
by a single sound louder than an occasional
sigh from the beautiful girl. But a quarter of an
hour, short as it was, sufficed to induct me into
more of the mysterious and subdued operations of
the female heart and mind, than many months'
previous experience while my blood was warm,
my pulsations impetuous, and my actions
produced
by direct impulses of the moment.
You, Chevillere, have preceded me in these
observations. You seemed from the first to have
been endowed with an intuitive perception of these
things. At least, you manifested a secret and
undefined
dread of prematurely encountering such
little magazines of combustible feeling.
But now, it seems, you are about to explode
in a genuine Guy Faux affair, after being
frightened
at a pop-gun. This is always the way with
you silent abstracted gentlemen; you avoid the
little school romances which beset your companions
from the year 14, until you get the credit of being
very unsusceptible young men, and are set down
by the little gay creatures as incipient bachelors.
But a day of retribution comes at last. The
experience which others have been drawing in
through that long, long age of minority, is in your
case concentrated into a single year, month, or
week.
But how prosing sickness has made me. While
you are asking for bread, I am giving you a stone.
`Miss Virginia,' said I, softly (it used to be
Miss Bell); she dropped the book and sprung to
her feet like one who had been electrified.
`Do you feel better, Mr. Randolph?' she asked,
VOL. II.B
at the same time gently tapping the floor with the
handle of a riding switch, kept there for that
purpose
.
`I do feel better, my dear young lady,' said I,
stretching out my hand.
My own voice frightened me; it came as if
from the bottom of a sepulchre. My bony hand
slipped from under the bedclothes like a smuggled
piece of anatomy; she placed her warm throbbing
little hand in mine; it felt as if it had a heart within
its soft and pure outlines; I denied myself the
reviving pleasure, and withdrew my hand, as a
deformed man would withdraw the defective
member.
At this moment your mother entered on
tiptoe
,
and seeing Virginia standing by the bedside
with the netting in her hand, she approached and
laid her hand upon my forehead.
`Dear Mr. Randolph,' said she, `do you feel
better?' in her peculiarly mild and benignant tones,
and feeling my pulse like a novice. `O, I know
you are better; the doctor thought your sleep
would restore you. Thank God! you know not
what we have suffered, both on your account
and our own; but I am afraid we have made you
talk too much. Compose yourself, my dear sir,
and I will watch by your bedside.'
Now, Chevillere, I admire, and honour, and
love your mother almost as much as I did my own;
but I love her neice's company better. The idea
instantly occurred to me that Virginia would come
back again if I fell into a slumber; so I pretended
to enjoy a very comfortable nap. As I expected,
your mother withdrew on tiptoe, and Virginia
returned to her post.
I saw that she had been weeping. She still
held the same book in her hand, but I was too vain
to attribute the tears to the influence of its
contents
.
I lay and enjoyed one of the most
delightful
periods I recollect ever to have spent. My
system was cool and comfortable; not a particle
of disease was left. My eyes were just closed
enough to catch a shadowy outline of her figure
and profile through the eyelids. I was determined
not again to disturb my own comfortable reveries,
and had just fixed myself with a good deal of
complacency
to enjoy the delicious present, when,
behold
!
I fell asleep in earnest.
Did you ever fall asleep just as you had sat
down to a magnificent dinner, with fine wine and
fine company, and slept till the dinner was eat up
and the company gone? That was precisely my
case. I awoke and found I had fallen asleep under
the most atrocious circumstances, perhaps, that
ever a man snored in,not excepting deacons,
elders, town clerks, and cooks on a summer
Sunday
.
The delicious meal which I had laid out for
my eyes was gone, and old Tombo sat there in
her place. When I awoke, I turned my head
slowly towards the spot, as I had done before, and
slowly raised the lids in a lazy, luxurious, and
valetudinarian
style, until they beheldthe devil! I
thought, indeed, it was he at first; so ugly did old
Tombo look from very contrast.
`Tombo!' said I, `how came you here?'
`Up the stars, masta.'
I smiled, for the first time, I suppose, in many
days; for Tombo seemed to be tickled at the sight
of my teeth.
`Tombo,' said I, `sit near, and tell me all the
things I have been saying within the last two days,
especially those things I said when your young
mistress was in the room.'
`I can't, sir, axing your pardon.'
`Why not, Tombo?'
`'Cause why, Miss Bell been tell me no, and I
tink I find it bery hard to say him ober again.'
`O, never mind what Miss Bell told you; she
only told you so on my account; come, tell it out.
I will explain to your young mistress that I ordered
you to tell me; if you can't repeat the words, let
me know what it was about, for the most part.'
`O! I can tell what it was about, for it was
all the same ting, and that was Miss Bell heself;
and fine talk I calls it too; I told 'em in the kitchen
that you been no more crazy than the doctor
heself
.'
`What did I say about Miss Bell, Tombo?'
`O, Lord, sir, I can't speak him, but he make
her cry for true, some time; and misses cry too,
and I can't say but I swallo'd bery hard myself;
more, maybe, from what the doctor says than what
you said.'
I told him to hand me a looking-glass. I had
been picking the skin off my finger bones, and
holding them up occasionally to look at them, until
I began to feel some curiosity to see my phiz!
And a precious piece of anatomy I saw; head
shaved close, and a sheepskin plaster over it, like
a bald crown; face as sharp as a handsaw, and
features, good imitation of the teeth thereof; ears
sticking out in bold relief like two handles to a
tub; lips covered with fever scales; neck long
and stringy; eyes drawn in like a turtle's head;
nose sticking out by itself like the cutwater of a
ship, and skin like a tanned sheepskin. An
interesting
plight for a hero of a love affair! I had not
finished
admiring myself when Virginia again entered
on tiptoe, expecting, no doubt, to find me still
asleep. She started back in astonishment, when
she saw Tombo holding the glass before my face.
I motioned to him to take it away, and begged
Virginia
not to rap on the floor, which I saw she was
about to do, as I did not wish to disturb your
mother
.
I declared myself much better, and begged
her to be seated a few moments. She did so.
`Have I said any thing during the two last
days which would have been improper if it had
been said in my sane moments?'
`Nothing, sir, but'
`But what?'
`You said many things of which you seldom
thought when you were well.'
`Indeed! what were they?'
B 2
`It would be useless, sir, to rehearse them, and
might injure you to hear them.'
`Not at all; on the contrary, the restlessness
of anxiety will injure me if I do not hear them,
especially those things in which your own name
was mentioned.'
`I cannot repeat them, sir; I have no doubt
my aunt will, if the doctor approves of it.'
`Tell me, then, do you think a maniac displays
any thing of the operations of his mind in his
sounder moments?'
`To tell you candidly, then, I think he does.'
`Will you tell me why you think so?'
`Because most of a maniac's discourses are
retrospective; detached and disjointed, it is true,
but still momentarily calling upon that stock of
ideas which has been treasured up in by-gone days;
but, sir, I think this a very improper subject for you
to converse upon at present.'
`Not at all; I feel as strong in lungs and
intellect
as I ever did in my life.'
Your mother came in just at this moment, and
sent Virginia down to receive some visiters, male
and female, from the refugees' sandhill village.
I feel now what it is to be stretched out here,
not able to wink an eye at a rival; but I shall
recruit
apace, at least as long as they stay. They
have been trying to get the paper from me this half
hour, but I will not give it up yet; I tell them that
it soothes and calms me like an opiate.
Since I wrote the above, the doctor has called.
He is a better specimen of the cloth than I
expected
to find heregentlemanly, sensible, and
discreet
.
I asked him, when there was no one present
but Tombo, what I had said about Virginia in my
two days of mental eclipse? He answered, that I
was a very impassioned lover for a philosopher,
and laughed heartily.
I suspect that he suspects me of not being too
sound in my most rational moments. What, in the
name of the seven wonders, does he mean by
philosopher? But I will be at the bottom of all
these things, before I get on my legs again. In the
mean time, the change in Virginia occupies our
attention.
I begin to doubt very seriously whether she
is such a real, natural, and unsophisticated
character
as I first described her to you in my letter of
that period.
At a certain age, far within twenty, girls of a
good deal of ingenuity may make almost any
character
seem natural to them, especially if they have
vivacity to support it. Nay, they may stamp
that character upon themselves for life, if it is
much admired. They do not at that age study
themselves;
they do not know that the character
which they have assumed is an artificial one; but
of course there is just enough of nature, and
artlessness
,
and unaffectedness, to make it captivating
to our sex.
It depends entirely upon their adventures in
the world, just at this time of setting out, what turn
this girlish vivacity will take. An early
disappointment
will temper their sprightliness into a
very discreet carriage, and sometimes make them
sad and melancholy all their days.
In these times of convenient matches, the
whole world is full of this sadness and melancholy;
not affected melancholy, but real and true
sorrowing
after the gay and brilliant dreams of their
youth; a yearning for the scenes and associates of
their childhood.
Happy that man and that woman who have
wedded in young life, upon the impulses of the
heart, and have moulded each other's characters
into genuine connubial congeniality. I have
frequently
seen old couples who had been united in
early life, and had lived so long together that they
actually resembled each other in feature, face, and
expression.
Your cousin's mind is much more like yours
than I had at first supposed. She endeavours to
penetrate into the results of experience without its
pains and penalties. Oh! how much you both
have the advantage of me there. I plunge
headlong
into every thing, and then I can study very
ingeniously how to get out. I really believe that
I improve by experience; but no other schooling
can make me wise.
But you and Virginia seem to make it your
study to suck honey from the flowers strewed in
your path, without touching the thorns; 'tis a
heaven-born gift, therefore cherish it. I, on the
contrary, plunge up to the neck in thorns after a
single flower, and then pay some one to help me
out, with the very thing for which I jumped in.
What does experience avail a man, when the
occasion
for using the knowledge he gains by it,
vanishes
with it. It is an experience which comes
too late.
It is very common to suppose, indeed to say,
that these prudent and discreet characters are dull
and prosing. There can be no more pernicious
mistake, nor one more calculated to lead would-be
geniuses into follies and erratic vices. Thus
copying
the errors of some fatal genius they find
themselves
in the midst of follies and crimes, without
the excuse of genius, or the genius to get out of
them.
The finest combination of talents in the world,
is that which can lead a man to fold his arms and
stand as a spectator upon the actions of others,
drinking in that wisdom of experience through his
eyes and ears, which another must have lashed
into his back. Scott and Napoleon are two fine
examples of this genius preceding experience, and
Byron of the opposite.
It is doubtful in my mind whether Byron might
not have been a very different character if his
`Hours of Idleness' had been suffered to die a natural
death, and had he never been lashed into the
production
of `English Bards and Scotch Reviewers.'
This result would have been still more probable,
had he married the lady of his youthful love. This
opinion of the noble poet you may take as the
product of a mind diseased, if you like. The truth
is, there are so many conversations, lives, memoirs,
&c. of Byron, from Leigh Hunt up to Moore, that
we on this side of the Atlantic have not the
materials
,
in an authentic form, wherewith to make up
our opinions.
And now that the time and paper allowed me
are drawing to an end, permit me to allude to a
subject upon which we exchanged letters before
setting out.
I promised to give you my poor views of the
gradual change of opinion, of population, and of
circumstances, and of the future prospects of
Virginia
.
The truth is, I have found things here which
interested me so deeply that I of course thought
they would interest you too; but when my health
is restored, and present objects lose their novelty
a little, you shall be welcome to any observations
which I have made with regard to my native
state; always giving the first place, however, to
whatever concerns her little namesake.
Tell Lamar that I consider much of our
correspondence
,
on both sides, as joint stock.
Believe me to be your much chastened and
sobered chum.
B. Randolph
.
CHAPTER II.
V. Chevillere to B. Randolph
.
New-York
, 18.
Dear Chum
,
I DID not write to you the next morning, as I
promised, for many reasons, which may appear in
the sequel. Bad news always comes soon enough.
This city now presents a most singular
spectacle
.
The throng, and hurry, and I may say the
pleasure of business, have changed into the throng,
and hurry, and misery of fear. Carts that
formerly
bore merchandise through the streets, are
now carrying beds, chairs, and tables of flying
families to their country-seats. The bodies of
carriages are dismounted, and the running gears
are covered with platforms, on which are placed
the whole culinary apparatus. Stages and
steamboats
are crowded with all colours, sexes, and
conditions
.
The mason has forsaken his half-built
house, and the joiner has left his timber in the
street. The glittering bow-windows of the bazars
in Broadway are many of them darkened with
their night and Sunday barricades. The theatres
and places of amusement are closed, when the
season had just commenced. The entries to the
hotels look like the empty aisles of churches on
week days, and the streets look dismal, gloomy,
and silent.
The only business which thrives is that of the
apothecaries and coffin-makers. From these facts
you have already gathered that the pestilence of
the East is really and truly here.
Early on the morning of the day appointed for
our jaunt to the Falls of the Passaic, Lamar and
myself arose from our beds with all the ardour of
expectation, and the high impulses and impetuous
spirits of our best youthful and college days.
Before
we had completed our toilet, my impatience
led me to the high four-story front window of our
apartment, which overlooks the eastern part of the
city, in the direction of Long Island and the Sound,
to see if a fickle climate promised to be propitious
to our undertaking.
All nature seemed to smile upon our intended
expedition; the eastern turrets of the city, and
the bright curtains of misty drapery which
fantastically
arose and hovered over Hurlgate, were
brilliantly tinged with the crimson rays of a
summer morning's sun; although the arbitrary
divisions of the year remind us that we are
considerably
beyond the period of that happy season
in a northern climate.
We were scarcely sooner in readiness than the
cabriolet, horses, and servants intended for the
occasion
.
As we slowly walked the horses to the
rendezvous where we had agreed to take an early
breakfast, fearing, perhaps, that we might disturb
the little nestlers in their slumbers, we observed
for the first time the various operations of morning
in a large city.
Preparations were making at every door to
supply those incessant wants of natural or
artificial
life, which, in so large a city, employ so
many hewers of wood and drawers of water.
Here was the dingy charcoal-vender, with his dull
monotonous song, which almost makes one imagine
that he is still slumbering through the disturbed
hours of the morning. Here was a large cask of
spring-water, sold by the gallon, and looking cool
and invigorating, especially to those countless
crowds of youth and men who enjoy the night
with the murderous pleasures of wine, only to
long for ice and soda-water in the morning. Here
was the sooty patent-sweeper, with our southern
corn-songs converted into the monotonous twang
of business. The various rival dairymen with
their milk carts standing along the curbstones, their
drivers yelling like western Indians to the tardy
housemaids, as they slowly rubbed their eyes,
adjusted
their aprons, and sleepily handed out their
pitchers at random.
As we rode along the street, maids were to be
seen sweeping the pavement, clerks taking down
the barricadoes of the night, and journeymen
hurrying
to their employers. Gentlemen and ladies,
singly and in pairs, men-servants and
maid-servants
,
boys and girls, both coloured and white,
VOL. II.C
those of low as well as of high degree, were pouring
down those streets leading to the markets, which
you know, perhaps, are here situated in various
parts of the city.
At length we arrived before the door of the
house which contained the magnetic points by
which so many of our movements are directed.
We dismounted, while Cato held the horses in his
most pompous style, seeming to have a shrewd
suspicion that his best behaviour at this house
would not be entirely unacceptable to us. When
we rang at the bell, no one hastily answered our
summons as on the former occasion, and our hearts
began to misgive us a little. We were surprised
that the green lattice-door, which opened
externally
,
was now gone, and its place supplied by a
very inhospitable cold-looking one of more solid
construction. We rang again, and after waiting
some time, heard some one fumbling at the door
inside, in a very different fashion from the sudden
overdone politeness of proud servants; one bolt
began to withdraw after another, until at length
the door opened. Who stood there, do you
suppose
?
not the gay and lively Isabel Hazlehurst,
nor her mother,nor the footman who usually did
the office,but an old lady housekeeper in
spectacles
,
as deaf as a door-post, who invariably
answered
to what she thought ought to have been
the question. We, of course, were not aware of
this at first, and were therefore not a little surprised,
after Lamar had expended some very useless
courtesy
upon her, to hear,
`And what's your will, gentlemen?'
Lamar screamed the object of our visit loud
enough in her ear to have awakened the whole
family, had they been still asleep.
`O ay! O ay!' said she, `you are the gallants,
you say, and you want the bit letter,' and away
she waddled, leaving us not much less impatient
than our horses, which were pawing the pavement
at a furious rate.
Presently she returned, and delivered to Lamar
a note directed to me; it was from young
Hazlehurst
,
apologizing in the name of the family and
the ladies for our disappointment, and pleading as
the cause the ravages of the pestilence and the
dread of the family; concluding by stating, that
they had all gone up the Hudson to the
country-seat
of Mr. Brumley (Miss St. Clair's step-father),
and would return together as soon as the Board of
Health pronounced it safe to do so; when they
would be happy to see us again, and to compensate
for our present disappointment by making the
promised jaunt.
Lamar sprang upon his horse and galloped
away down the street, the fire flying from under
his feet as if some imp of darkness was at his
heels. I saw no more of him that morning, but
fortunately met Arthur soon after breakfast. He
seemed astonished that we had not fled also, and
still more so when I communicated my desire to
see something of this disease, and especially in
those haunts where the wretched paupers were
congregated.
Our first visit was to that celebrated place the
Five Points
, called so from there being five corner
houses on the spot, one of them triangular, of
course; the others being formed by two streets
intersecting each other at right angles. One of
these in one direction divides into two streets,
running
one on each side of the triangular house.
As we approached the spot, the loaded
atmosphere
from the filthy streets began to salute our
olfactories, and various evidences were presented
to our eyes of the loathsome and disgusting
dissipation
which was still kept up, in spite of the
terrors
of the grim monster. The corporation wagons
or hearses were to be seen standing along the
streets, with the end gate down, into which two
men were stacking the white pine coffins as high as
the lid would admit, and often bringing two and
three of these from one house. I will confess to
you that this struck me with horror at first,not
fear, but horror,and I must remark to you an
observation of mine connected with it; you know
I am fond of treasuring up
these
, great or small.
When a person first enters these dismal regions
during the prevalence of an epidemic, he is ten
times more struck by the appearance of these
crowded coffins, than he is at the sight of a whole
hospital of patients with the epidemic. In the first
house we entered, were three persons lying ill of
the disease in one room; all of them of the very
lowest class of drunken debauchees. I can
scarcely give you an idea of the wretched
condition
of these tatterdemalions, by any thing which
you have seen in the South. They are far more
filthy, degraded, and wretched than any slave I
have ever beheld, under the most cruel and
tyrannical
master. If such is their condition in ordinary
times, what must it be now? they are in the lowest
depths of human degradation and misery.
Two of the three were females,mother and
daughter; the latter looked as if she was
thirty-five
years of age, though she told me she was
only twenty. She was thought to be convalescent,
and I can truly say that out of the hundreds whom
I have seen, she was the only one of her class who
exhibited any thing like remorse of conscience for
her past life. One would be apt to suppose that
there would be weeping, and wailing, and
gnashing
of teeth,but there is no such thing; they die
like dogs, amid the ribald jests, vulgar wit, and
Billingsgate slang of their quondam associates.
Self-preservation seems to have ceased to be a law
of nature here, and death has become familiar to
the eyes of these wretches, as carnage does to the
soldier. I asked the daughter if she and her
mother
had ever been in better circumstances. She
said they had, far better; that they had once been
comfortable and happy, but that her wretched
mother had deserted her father's house while he
was gone to sea, which had driven him to
dissipation
,
C 2
ruin, and the state-prison, and them to
their present condition; there was no kind of
feeling
exhibited by the mother, either in regard to the
past or the future; the sufferings of the present
moment occupied her, both soul and body, and this
is the case with ninety-nine in the hundred of all
those whom I have seen sick and dying; they
forcibly
remind me of a flock of sheep swept off
suddenly
by some rapid distemper. I never could
realize the idea of the state of feeling in Paris
during the bloody days of the reign of terror until
now; I can readily conceive how indifferent men
may become to death, by being stupified with its
hourly exhibition.
There are some heart-rending scenes here,
such as parents just landed from Europe, who die
and leave little children wandering about the
streets, without any one to know or care for them.
Dead bodies lying in the houses by twos and threes
and sixes; no one caring or knowing of them,
until the corporation officials come round, and then
they are dragged out into the middle of the floor
and thrown into pine coffins, clothes and all
unknown
oftentimes, even by name.
From whence did these people come? Most
of them from happy homes, and tender and
affectionate
friends in the country. Attracted here,
perhaps, by gay scenes, and brilliant delusions, and
intoxicating delights, which greet the young and
thoughtless upon a first entrance into a city life.
Misfortune or misadventure, perhaps, first throws
them from the current of business into the current
of amusementsthis again carries them down to
dissipationperhaps to crime. And finally, death
meets them in these awful sinks of perdition.
Urgent
,
indeed, should be the calls of business or
ambition which lead a youth of any tolerable
prospects
in the country, to fly to the greater theatre
of a populous city.
With such as these last mentioned, I observed
one remarkable fact during the prevalence of the
epidemic. Until a fatal disease seizes them, they
live from year to year, month to month, and day
to day, under some strange hallucination;
expecting
some miraculous change of fortune, or a turn
of luck, as they call it. But when finally the grim
monster seizes them, their consternation and
confusion
are equal to their previous delusions. For
the first time in years, perhaps, they see themselves
in their true outlines. The shock is frightful to
look upon; the criminal brought to the scaffold
does not appear more wretched and overwhelmed.
I have seen one of these precocious sots first
really and thoroughly convinced of the extent of his
degradation upon his death-bed.
Yours truly,
V. Chevillere
.
CHAPTER III.
Victor Chevillere to B. Randolph
.
New-York
, 18.
Dear Friend
,
Once
more I breathe freely; the pestilence
has almost left us, and the citizens are returning.
Joy has taken the place of fear and trembling.
The hum of business and the crash of wheels are
heard, and I have opened my portfolio once more,
to lay before you in a more concocted form those
things which have crowded upon me since I last
wrote; which I believe was some two or three
weeks ago.
I have again seen her, Randolph; have ridden
with her fifteen mileshave talked with her; and
by all that is lovely, have laughed with her. Think
of that, my dear fellow! Yet I am as profoundly
ignorant as to the cause of the blight which has
fallen upon her spirits, as I was when I first
mentioned
the topic.
How shall I tell you of those things which have
occurred in the last forty-eight hours? And where
shall I begin?
When other people began again to crowd this
little island, Lamar and I began our promenades
in Broadway; and I will not conceal from you
that sundry glances were cast to the condition and
appearance of certain window-shutters and doors.
At length, and on a sudden, they began to assume
an indescribable appearance, as if some treasures
were enclosed within, which had not been stored
there of late. We saw no signal ribands through
the shutters, nor any intelligible announcement.
Our knowledge was derived from the external
appearance
of the house alone. We approached the
houserang the bell, and speedily the
hospitablelooking
door was thrown wide open by the
footman
,
in as polite and welcoming an attitude as if
his young master and myself were never to
become
rivals.
Did you ever sit half an hour, examining the
cornice around the ceiling of a fashionable saloon,
or the texture of a Turkey carpet, or the veins of
an Italian marble slab? adjusting yourself twenty
different times and ways for the reception? conning
over your first speechfirst short, then longer,
and at length, formal and spiteful. That was not
our case, for I had not fixed my mouth, even for a
speech, before the gay Isabel bounced into the
room, as full of hilarity as Lamar or Arthur could
have desiredbut alone.
`I am truly sorry,' said she, `that we
disappointed
youbut indeed, indeed, it was not my
fault. Brother brought such terrible accounts of
the epidemic, that mother would not hear of our
remaining two whole days longer, and Mr. Brumley
would still have gone, had we declined, and that
you know, Mr. Chevillere, would have been quite
the same to you as if we had all gone. You shall
have your revenge; we are all here again; and
will go to-morrow to the falls, if you are still in
the humour. Frances is out this morning, but I
will promise in her name.'
We did not detain the gay girl any longer
with our morning visit than was barely sufficient
to arrange the same plans which we had adopted
before. I brought away with me abundant
materials for reflection during the intervening
hours. Of one thing I had now satisfied myself;
namely, that young Hazlehurst and Mr. Brumley
had conspired to defeat our previously arranged
jaunt. Perhaps conspired is too harsh a word;
but, certain it is, that they had needlessly frightened
the ladies from going to a place where they would
have been as free from infection as amid the
shades of Oakland itself. Perhaps you may
see the matter through a less jaundiced medium.
Be that as it may, I determined to move onward
in the career which I had laid out for myself, either
with or without their aid.
Accordingly, on the next morning, we were
again blessed with a propitious day, and having
risen early, and forewarned Cato of our intentions
(which is always sufficient, you know) our equipage
was ready, and we were soon at the door.
Isabel and the other equestrian young ladies
made their appearance at the window by the time
we had dismounted, arrayed in long riding skirts,
and plumed hats. Not so, however, the lady in
black, who leaned against the recess of the farthest
window, gazing out upon the passing scenes, as a
melancholy damsel will sometimes gaze upon a long
continued storm of rain. She wore no long skirt
nor plumed hat, but appeared in her usual
travelling
garb. As we dismounted I saw a momentary
suffusion of the neck and face, but in an instant it
was gone, and she stood, sad, serene, and beautiful
as ever.
After a hasty breakfast I led the way,
conducting
Miss St. Clair. As I was about to enter
the carriage myself, Isabel sent a servant to
smuggle
something under the seat of our cabriolet, in the
shape of a long box. I readily assisted in the
scheme, for I doubted not that it contained cold meats,
wine, and crackers,I was wrong; it contained
something of far more importance to our pleasure,
but of that you shall hear in due time. We were soon
across the ferry and pursuing the road to
Aquackenack
and Patterson. A gayer party you perhaps
never saw; if I except a certain lady, and even she
did not affectedly frown upon the gayety of others.
On the contrary, it seemed to raise her spirits in
her own peculiar way.
Lamar and Arthur seemed to have left their
formality behind them, although the former escorted
Isabel. Of course I can only speak of what took
place between others of the party in general terms.
Of my own proceedings I suppose so little will not
satisfy you.
Now was the interview granted me which I
had so earnestly desired; that is, it was practically
granted to me under another name; but will you
believe it, Randolph? I was confused, although the
case had been merely adjourned. The truth is, I
very foolishly attempted at first to support a
general
conversation, when my mind was entirely
engrossed
with a more interesting subject. At length
my confusion and absence became so apparent
through my blundering answers, that she actually
laughed outright. By old Noll's nose! I was glad
to see it, for it enabled me to say,`You see, Miss
St. Clair, how impossible it is for me to converse
upon one subject, while my thoughts are running
upon another which has been too long deferred
already. Do not consider me abrupt or
impertinent
if I now beg leave to renew it?'
`It would be affectation in me to pretend that
I too was not anxious to set your mind at rest upon
that subject.'
Randolph, this took my breath completely
away from me; it was so firm, sudden, and
unexpected
.
I thought of the words again and again
`set my mind at rest.' There was but one way to
interpret it; viz. that she was about to give me the
same kind of rest which the dead enjoy. However,
`
onward
' was my motto of the day previous, and I
continued; `I hope you speak of
rest
, in the happy
sense of the term?'
`Indeed, sir, I cannot tell how you may
interpret
it, but my meaning is, that no possible good
can grow out of the continuation of the subject
alluded to.'
`And is Miss St. Clair so resolved to reject my
suit, even before I have fully pleaded my case?'
`Indeed, indeed, sir, you must greatly mistake
my meaning. I did not understand that you had
laid a suit before me; but'
`Permit me to interrupt you before you go any
further. I do now, madam, offer myself'
`Stop! sir, stop! Let me interrupt you in
turn. You are about to do you know not what.
Suffer me to go on in the course which I had first
intended; and that is to say, that you do me far
more honour than I deserve, or even expected
again
,
from any one, for whom I should entertain so much
esteem as I do for Mr. Chevillere. But, sir, it is
impossible that I can ever encourage the addresses
of any gentleman. It is painful, sir, on my own
account, as well as your own and your mother's,
for me to say so; but fate has shut the door
against me, in that respect, long ago.'
`Then it is not on my own personal account
that you thus peremptorily reject my suit.'
`Indeed, sir, it is not.'
`Then I breathe again! Now, Miss St. Clair,
listen to me with patience but a few moments. It
seems, from what I can understand of your
rejection
of me, that it is from some imaginary cause
resting on your own inability, instead of my
unworthiness
,
VOL. II.D
which is acknowledged. Now, I am
not vain, if I know myself; and I would not boast
of what I could dare, or do, in such a case; but
there is no impropriety, I hope, in saying that it
will require the most extraordinary array of
untoward
circumstances, to make me believe that the
fates have fixed the decision so irrevocably as you
seem now to think.'
`But, sir, will you not take my own decision,
without entering into the why and the wherefore?'
`Indeed, madam, I cannot. Forgive my
boldness
and presumption; but I have never before
been a suitor before woman's shrine. I had lived
through twenty-three years before I saw you,
unscathed
.
Think, then, whether I am likely to give
up a pursuit at the very threshold, in which my
whole soul, my present happiness, and my mother's
happiness if you will, my future plans, and my
very existence are concerned.'
`Your mother's happiness! Certainly, sir,
your mother does not encourage your present
course, knowing what she does?'
`She has never had the opportunity. But you
add new vigour to my determination: you say, if
I understand you, that my mother is partly
acquainted
with the circumstances which have
conspired
to produce your determination.'
`I do not know that I said exactly so; nor did
I intend to say so. It is nevertheless true.'
`Then am I doubly armed against your
resolves
.
Trust me, dear ladyno trivial
circumstance
shall unite my opinion with yours on this
subject. Perhaps it is a vow?'
`It is not.'
`What then can it be; is it impertinent in me
to ask?'
`It is not, sir. But it is painful to mepainful
in the recollections which it revivesand painful
because I must seem strange and unreasonable in
denying you a present relation of them.'
`And do youwill you deny me that relation?'
`Indeed, indeed, sir, I must for the present.'
`At some future day, not very far distant, will
you indulge me?'
`It is hard, sir, very hard to promise; yet to
avoid it'
`Thank you, thank you, dear lady.' I would
have seized her hand, and smothered her little
palpitating fingers with kisses, if the company had
not escorted us so confoundedly close; but I
continued
`Perhaps
Miss St. Clair will pardon a still
further impertinenceis it too much to ask, if none
of these things had ever happened, whether my
suit would then have been rejected?'
`I cannot now answer that question.'
`Fix, then, the period of my probation; name
the happy day when you will give me this promised
history.'
`Oh, sir, it will be any thing but a happy day
for me, and I am very sure it will be little more so
for you. Why then persist in a course which
must result in unhappiness to all parties? Trust
me, there is no affectation in the case, when I say
that we can
never, never
, sir, be more to each other
than simple friends. As such I am proud and
grateful to consider both you and your honoured
mother.'
`You but add firmness to my resolves, when
you allude to the friendship of my mother. Say,
then, dear lady, would to-morrow be too early a
day?'
`To-morrow! Since you are resolved upon
it, I will relate to you the history of my life.
Nothing less, it seems, will serve; but I must be at
home; the very sight of dear and cherished objects
around that place would comfort and reassure me,
if my own dear mother was not there also. But
to-morrow would not suffice, sir, even if I had the
opportunity required, in the house of a friend.
This history I have never
fully
disclosed to any
person living; I related some passages of my sad
story to your mother, not because she thought it
necessary, but because I thought it so; when I
saw her disposed to lavish upon me so much of
her cherished love and sympathy.'
`I know well,' replied I, `what persons attract
her regard; she has an astonishing sagacity in
selecting the gold from the dross on such
occasions
.'
It is useless for me to dwell upon every word,
Randolph. Suffice it to say, she consented that I
should visit her after her return to the quiet shades
of Oakland, upon the banks of the Hudson.
It was truly gratifying to hear almost all the
ladies exclaim, when we reached the hill-side which
overlooks Patterson,`Why, Frances, how the
ride has improved you!' In truth, her mind had
been harassed with the idea of the interview which
I had been seeking; but now she was relieved for
the present, and the effect was magical.
An autumn sun shone out in all the splendour
of our most brilliant days of that more genial
climate
in which you now sojourn. The trees were a
bronzed green, and the lingering flowers of the
season
still greeted our delighted senses, as we strolled
among the hills of that romantic region. How
could she but inhale a portion of the surrounding
happiness? Her companions were gay and lively,
even to the romping mood; our anticipations were
bright, our pulsations impetuous; weather
propitious
,
scene brilliant, and journey prosperous. In
this condition of the party we arrived at the rude
enclosure on the top of the hill overlooking the
town of Patterson, on the side next the falls. We
soon entered an extensive and rugged area,
interspersed
here and there with rude arbours and
booths, covered with green boughs of the forest,
and lined with seats, as if refreshments were
occasionally
served out here to parties, from a little
shop of some kind, which stands near the entrance
to the area. We could now distinctly hear the
roar of the cataract, and see the river to the left
of us as we proceeded onwards, but were surprised
that we nowhere saw the falls.
D 2
Following a beaten path over rugged beds of
projecting rocks in the direction of the sound, we
came to a narrow, covered bridge, thrown across
a dark and deep ravine, after ascending to the
middle
of which we stood in front of the Passaic Falls.
The river before mentioned, about a stone's throw
from the bridge, came tumbling down a precipice
in great magnificence, sending up splendid wreaths
and festoons of vapour, through which the rays of
the sun exhibited the colours of the rainbow in
surpassing
beauty. The river, after being dashed
down this precipice some eighty or a hundred feet,
into the abyss below, among the remnants of a
former convulsion of nature, is, by the concussion,
beaten into waves of white foam, and then gently
glides down the widening ravine, till it suddenly
changes its course around the base of a cliff in the
direction of the town, and expands again into its
accustomed width, stillness, and beauty.
Each of our party, as is universally the case,
was impressed with the scene before us according
to his or her
individuality
. A consummate master
of all the workings of the human heart might have
found ample materials for study on the present
occasion
,
and though not one of those, I must still
give you the observations of a novice.
Those who were fanciful and light of heart,
poured forth quotations from favourite poets.
Those with the organ of veneration more fully
developed, stood with hands clasped, eyes
upturned
,
attitudes startled, as if their souls shrank
from this too open and majestic display of the
power of the great mysterious mover of floods and
torrents. While the simple of heart and weak of
understanding exclaimed, `O! dear, how
wonderful
!'
`Only see! I declare it is beautiful! is it
not?' appealing to some one, perhaps, whose spirit,
with the mist of the cataract, was soaring into the
summitless regions of the heavens.
But there was one, Randolph, who stood in the
solitude of the spirit, though in a crowd; there
was little outward exhibition of emotion to a less
curious observer than myself. The pupil of the
eye was distended to its utmost limits; her features
had assumed a chiselled distinctness, her lips were
compressed together, and her whole countenance
was in the highest degree abstracted and
contemplative
.
Many questions were addressed to her,
but she heeded them not; nor did a sound issue
from her lips louder than an occasional full
inspiration
,
as her beautiful bust heaved with the
internal
and deep-seated emotions of the spirit.
That is a profound abstraction which can
entirely
withdraw us for a time from any communion
with external objects of sense. We see the misty
clouds as they heave each other from the gulf
beneath
.
We hear the thunders of the cataract, it is
true, but we hear on such occasions for the soul
alone, our social and conventional feelings are lost
and swallowed up in the profounder emotions of
adoration. We hold a more direct communion
with the great and mysterious spirit of the deep;
the eye becomes dim and watery with the eager
stretching of our glances into an awful futurity.
Not that we always direct our vision towards
what is farthest and least obstructed, for we often
glance upon the scene before us, looking, as it were,
through the tumbling torrent into a great abyss
below, as if we could see there the great master of
the scene. The soul does not scorn its
prison-house
,
because we learn to love even its weakness
too well; but it attempts too often to soar into those
regions which, to human organizations, are fearful,
dark, and shadowy.
It is delightful to contemplate the reflection of
these scenes upon one of those imaginative beings
who can people the floods and torrents with the
darker creatures of their own imagination. Such
a one will walk abroad into the groves and forests,
at the hour of midnight, or stand upon the deck as
a vessel rolls through the black chasms of the
sea, in the darker hours of early morning; or stand
upon an eminence while the blackness of the storm
rages around, and the lightning quivers above, in
its gleaming gambols, and will people these regions
with misty forms and unearthly spirits, until earth
and all its lesser tempests, and man with all his
little cares, are forgotten. Are these wanderings
of the spirit a foretaste of what we shall be
hereafter
?
Will it be permitted to our disenthralled
spirits, as the stoics fondly hoped, to ride upon the
wings of these storms and tempests, revisit the
scenes of our earthly struggles, and see others as we
have been, vainly attempting to hold converse with
us? If it is delightful to contemplate the
reflection
of these things upon a kindred spirit of the
sterner sexhow much more so to see these images
cast upon the pale transparent countenance of a
youthful female? Could you disturb the beatified
trembler, as the sportsman brings down the
graceful
little flutterer from his sunny regions? No,
Randolph, you could not; you would have done
as I did; you would have stood guardian over
the fairy while she communed with the spirits of
the mist.
There is something worth observing too in the
manner in which we come suddenly down from
this mysterious abstraction. We gaze on, entirely
unconscious of the time, and of the weakness of
our physical organs, until mere exhaustion compels
us to identify ourselves once more, and then arouse
from the trance like one waking from a deep sleep;
we look around on worldly objects first in a sort
of lofty contempt, and then perhaps despise our
own littleness of spirit.
It was not so however with the fair dreamer
before me; when her eyes became so weak that
she could no longer distend the pupil, she first
looked around until she caught my steady gaze
and blushed; and then covering her face with her
hands, she withdrew to a secluded crag. But
there was yet another character left for me to
study, after she desertedno less a personage
than lofty old Cato. He stood upon one of the
rugged cliffs, whence he could see the whole
cataract
,
with his arms folded upon his breast, and his
brows drawn down over his dark, stern
countenance
,
until you could almost have imagined him
the gloomy spirit of the scene himself. I know
that he has a soul of his own, and of rare excellence
too, but it is not metaphysical in its construction.
He looked as a sturdy old warrior of the ruder
ages may be supposed to have looked on such a
scene. But I fear I tire you with these
descriptions
,
on which you know that I love to dwell. I
will therefore pass on to one of the rude arbours
before mentioned, where all the company were
seated around a board spread with napkins, upon
which a cold collation formed a very inviting
spectacle
.
When we had all done ample justice to this
good cheer, and washed it down with a delicious
cup of light French wine, our party became truly
sociable. Indulgence in the creature comforts is
a wonderful leveller of distinctions and formalities.
We were now in the most delightful state of
romposity
.
Lamar was quite in the third heavens,
and, I doubt not, forgot entirely that such a man
as Arthur lived; much less did he remember that
he was eying him all the while. Young
Hazlehurst
and old Mr. Brumley walked apart and
conversed
confidentially. Something is hatching
between
the two; but my motto is `onward;' I am
one of those who do not believe in the influence of
fathers on such occasions. I have no doubt that
there is a natural desire existing in these two
families
to unite them; perhaps an understanding
between
those who have no primary right in the
business; but of this more hereafter.
Old Cato now entered by the orders of Isabel,
I suppose, with the smuggled long box which I
mentioned to you before. A green baize cloth
being removed from around it, I saw at once that
it was a flageolet case. Receiving the box from
his hand, I took out the instrument, and eyed every
lady on the rocks and seats around, to find to whom
it belonged. The ownership lay between Isabel
and Miss St. Clair; for the former smiled and the
latter blushed. On my presentation of it, Miss St.
Clair took it very reluctantly, and complained
loudly of Isabel's fraud; she took the instrument,
however, without affectation. Before commencing,
she gave us to understand that we were not to
expect
fashionable music; and then, Randolph, she
commenced one of the wildest and most delightful
Scotch airs I ever heard. There was something
novel in this. I had never before heard the
flageolet
except in dull, mechanical songs of the
fashionable
school, and scarcely knew that any life and
feeling could be infused into its tones. Imagine
us seated on the rocks around this picturesque and
romantic spot, listening to music as wild as the
scene itself, from the hand of an enthusiast.
`Now, ladies and gentlemen,' said Isabel, `I
wish to put to the test one of Frances's theories
with regard to the effects of music. She contends
that every air conveys specific impressions to the
mind and feelings of the different hearers, varied
somewhat, indeed, by the character of the
individual
.'
`Indeed, Isabel, this is very unfair,' said the
frowning performer; `you first stealthily introduce
my instrument, and then bring some of our
thoughtless discussions to the test by means of my
own performances, which, you must recollect, I
never pretended would have much effect.'
All insisted upon the trial; and each prepared
to give way to the natural feelings excited by the
music, as little interrupted by others as possible.
The air was one of the same Scotch effusions,
peculiarly touching in its effects, and most
appropriate
to the scene. When it ceased, Isabel
required
each one to write with a pencil the
impression
made. She found much difficulty in getting
some of her female coadjutors to comply. The
fact is, that many persons are so unaccustomed to
imbodying out their feelings on any given occasion,
that they find it no easy matter. All made the
attempt, however, after being assured that no
names would be required to the papers; and as
these were all of the same size and cast into a hat,
the writer alone could know each as it was read.
Lamar collected the ballots, and then seated
himself
to read them. I must try to recollect a few
for the amusement of your convalescence.
First ballot. `This air excites in my mind
visions of wild glens and brooks.'
Second ballot. `Highland scenery, with kilts
and tartans.'
Third ballot. `Mountain passes, and wild
herds of forest animals.'
Fourth ballot. `Associations connected with
the surrounding scene.'
Fifth ballot. `Romantic adventures, of which
the fair musician is the heroine.'
Although there was undeniable frivolity in this,
yet the gravest of us was surprised to see the
identical vein which ran through the thoughts of
all. The experiment was repeated once and again,
and always with like success, when the music was
Scotch, Tyrolese, or German, and entirely
unknown
;
the latter we found essential to an
identical
effect in all: for if any one had before heard
the air, it invariably called up associations of the
time and place and persons connected with its first
performance.
Almost a unanimous vote declared victory in
favour of the performer; her more gay and
dashing
friend admitting herself vanquished with
becoming
grace.
During our ride to the city, the transition from
the foregoing subject to national music was natural
and easy, and as my companion's ideas were
somewhat
new to me, I must endeavour to recollect a
little of our conversation.
`I am truly rejoiced,' said I, `that you are not
an admirer, nor a performer of fashionable music.'
`It is not the result of principle with me, but
VOL. II.E
the dictates of what I always thought my own
peculiar taste.'
`Both my taste and judgment are in perfect
unison with yours, and I must acknowledge myself
indebted to you for some new ideas on the subject.
I have always been a reviler of what I considered
an affectation of fondness for Italian and French
music. But is it not strange that we have had no
American composer of any celebrity, nor any
national
music?'
`It is owing, I believe,' said she, `to the very
cause we have been speaking of. Italian music is
only suited to those double-refined and palled
tastes, which have passed through ages of
effeminate
luxury to complete them. Affectation and
fashion have engrafted this style of music into our
systems of education, without once inquiring
whether
it is suited to the taste and genius of the
people, and the features of the country. What is
the result? It is, that we have no composers,
no enthusiasts, and no native performers,except
such as are mechanical and artificial.'
`You think, then, that the features of a country
have some connexion with a national taste for
music.'
`I do; and that if our natural and
unsophisticated
tastes were consulted, we should have music
in keeping with our wild and majestic scenery.
In proof that this is true, and not founded entirely
on my own taste, look at the music of Switzerland,
Scotland, and Germany, in comparison with the
Italian and French. Each of these nations has
music suited to the traits of the country and the
corresponding genius of the people. We should
have such here, if those who have by nature a
taste and genius for the art were not uniformly
disgusted at the very threshold, by a style with which
they have no sympathy. Others, with less genius
and no taste, escape this disgust, and are pushed
forward, and called great performers, when in fact
nothing but their very deficiency in natural
qualifications
enables them to succeed at all.'
`It is perhaps our refinement, instead of our
rudeness, which prevents the development of these
capabilities.'
`True; but the word refinement must, I think,
be qualified. Our refinement in the art is of
foreign
growth, and is pretty much the same kind of
culture which a
gourmand
gives to his appetite.
He refines upon refinement, in one dish after
another, until he no longer possesses any relish for
those articles of food which nature has evidently
provided for us. So in Italian music; its votaries
have become more exquisite, until it has lost the
power to charm the natural ear.'
`On your hypothesis, Miss St. Clair, it would
be much the same thing to feed a lion upon
blanc
mange
, as to offer this double refined music to an
American ear which had not been tampered with.'
`Exactly so, sir! Though his majesty of the
forest is rather too rough a trope for our
countrymen
.'
`I stand corrected, madam.'
Randolph, there is something charming in the
enthusiasm of woman; far more so than in that of
our sex! With the latter is too often mingled the
inspiration of wine, the rant of passion, or the
artificial
and selfish exaltation of ambition, vanity, and
conceit of genius. Female enthusiasm is pure,
touching, and sincere; divested of self, generous and
benevolent to others. Besides, it seems so natural
to the sex to be raised `above the stir and smoke
of this dim spot which men call earth,' that they
appear to soar in their proper element. Their
enthusiasm is carried out even into their every-day
concerns too; they are enthusiastic in their taste,
in their friendships, in their hatreds, in their
religion
,
and in their love. Ah! Randolph, there is
the key-stone to the arch. Nature has endowed
them with these generous and high-toned feelings,
from the wisest and most benevolent designs
towards man; upon this natural peculiarity of the
other sex rests more of man's happiness than we
generally suppose. The old look back to its early
influence with a sad but pleasing excitement, such
as we feel in pleasant dreams. The present
generation
act, and fret, and fight, and trade, and grow
rich, all for its genial blessing; while the young
live in the constant hopes of its early fruition.
`Woman loves but once and loves for ever,' is the
language of one of the most touching and pathetic
songs in our language. Most men deny the truth
of this text, because they are interested in doing so;
thinking generally, that if this is true, their wives
are false, because they were not the first choice, nor
could they have been in the nature of things.
All women are not false to their husbands, who
cherish these dear and flowery dreams of early
youth, in some remote and secret corner of the
heart. So far from it, that I doubt not many of
them have a more fond and enduring attachment
to their lords from throwing habitually the colours
of these early tints over their more mature
engagements
.
These romances season all the after life,
and invest us, as we glide down the vale, with a
richer mantle than that of prophecy.
All men and women have these little secrets
locked up within their own hearts, as dear and
nourished treasures which grow richer as they
grow older, and are really inestimable when the
time comes in which the pleasures of the present
consist in a retrospect of the past.
Yours truly,
V. Chevillere
.
E 2
CHAPTER IV.
V. Chevillere to B. Randolph
.
New-York
, 18.
Dear Friend
,
Hitherto we have been gliding down the
smooth current of college life with a full breeze of
youthful hopes and pleasures; we seem to have
skimmed over the sunny surface of things, entirely
unconscious of the waters beneath. But now we
are embarked upon the life of passion. No longer
have we the regulated pulsations, the quiet
slumbers
,
the delightful reveries, the monotonous
routine
,
and the cool and invigorating shades of
college
groves. We now begin to know man in his
developmentswe saw him before, but we knew
him not. It is not given to us to stand aloof and
view all this war of the contending elements of
man's composition, without partaking in the
adversities
of the storm. And now that we are fairly
embarked, and have occasionally, as is the case with
me now, time to look within and around, to see
how we are prepared for the voyage, what a
confounding
sight presents itself?
Let us see of what our stores consist! We
have reason, it is true, but so feeble and doubtful
in its results, that we seem still to be placed like
our primitive parents, with the tree of life before
usthe devil leading us one way, down-hill, and
reason the other way, upward. Even when we
have that rare combination of all the faculties of
the mind which constitutes true greatness, are we
any better off? and especially when we have
brilliant developments of peculiar faculties called
genius, are we any better prepared for the trials
and troubles of this world? How are we in the
dark, even when possessed of some or all of these
excellences? Conscience may be imperfectly
tutored, reason misled, or genius itself be
confounded
with the ravings of the maniac, or so
doubtful in its pilotage as to be worse than common
sense or even instinct itself. I can recollect when
you and I turned up our indignant noses, when
clergymen and moralists descanted upon the trite
subject of the depravity of the human heart; we
had not then embarked upon this ocean which
constitutes
human life. We now see differently; at
least
I
do. There is now no bottom to this
profound
.
We can already see into the mystery of
the murderer's feelings; we can trace the gradual
steps, at first, and then the leap, as these wretches
are both led and driven to perdition. But above
all, can we now see those fierce contests of
human
life which are brewed from the passions;
reason being deluded, and genius run wild; where
one being deceives another, and yet more deceives
himself; where one being wrongs another, and yet
most of all wrongs himself; while multitudes are
engaged in fierce struggles, they know not why.
They are driven by impulses, and surrounded by
circumstances, over which they imagine they have
all, yet have in reality little, control. These do
not plunge down to murder, but they are engaged
in a constant warfare, in which the same passions
are developed with which the murderer sets out;
they wrestle upon the brink of the precipice, and
are preserved from the fall by two things
selfishness
and fear.
These two passions hold the world in its
constant
equipoise. The fear of which I speak is not
the mere dread of the executioner; there is a
darker apprehension lurking in every human heart.
He who is possessed of it fears, he knows not what,
nor how long he has felt it, nor how much power
it can exercise over him. Indeed he has never
analyzed its proporties; for this very power of
analyzing his
weakness
is often the
strength
of the
outlaw, the murderer, and the assassin.
This fear is early developed, and seems at its
very first exhibition to give us some clew to its
future mysterious influence over us. One urchin
will be frightened at stories of ghosts and
grave-yards
;
another at haunted mansions; a third at
warning dreams; while another, and this is by far
the most common case, at all undefined darkness.
This fear is matured according to the
peculiarity
of the individual, and the circumstances in
which he is placed; but wo be to that man, who,
with an imperfectly matured understanding, learns
how to rid himself of this fear, and thus cuts
himself
loose from the safe anchorage which nature has
given him, without acquiring the substitute of a
corresponding pilotage of intelligence and principle.
A spark of genius, ill-directed, may make a
murderer
;
as a spark of genius, well-directed, may
make a saint.
But there are some fearful exceptions to this
general lot of humanity; some spirits which are so
dark themselves, at their very entrance upon the
scene, that no darkness terrifies them. The
obscurity
of real things to their gloomy minds laughs
to scorn the shadowy creatures of our
superstitious
imaginations. These are the characters
which overleap all the usual stepping-stones of
mortality in their career, either upwards or
downwards
,
as destiny and circumstances may develop
them, and as nature may have qualified them with
collateral powers and feelings.
The other great passion of supreme selfishness
forms one of the most curious subjects of mental
study. Bear with me a while, and I will tell you
what frightful adventure has given rise to this train
of reflections.
Selfishness is the master-key to unlock every
heart; it is the great passion upon which all others
have their foundation. It will be found variously
disguised and modified, and sometimes scarcely to
be recognised; and what is strangest of all is, that
ninety-nine hundredths of the subjects of it are
entirely unconscious of its secret operations. But
look (where it is not so evident at first sight)
at the most disinterested acts of the self-deceived,
of the poet, the scholar, the genius, the
philosopher
,
the philanthropist. Is it not the
main-spring
of all?
[1]
[1]
The author thinks, with a late writer in the North American,
that the attacks of this college philosophy, like the measles, come
but once, seldom last long, are easily cured, and rarely fatal.
Look around you at your
fellow-probationers
,
and see how many of the purest deeds
of apparent piety, and benevolence, and charity,
may be traced through its deep disguise to this
source. If you have doubts remaining, as to this
great ruling motive of mankind, look within, and
there you will find it, Randolph. I do not hesitate
to tell even you this much, because those who have
this main motive adorned with most virtues can see
it most clearly within themselves. There is no
man so free from selfishness in his own opinion, as
he who is ruled by no other motive or principle.
The very power of self-examination seems to be
entirely swallowed up by this mother of passions.
Such persons see themselves through a medium so
tinctured with self, that self always looks pure and
disinterested. The highwayman only robs the
rich to feed the poor, according to his philosophy;
the murderer only rids the world of a monster and
a tyrant in the most disinterested and generous
manner imaginable; the thief only takes that to
which all men were born with equal claims; the
politician and the demagogue live for the benefit
and advancement of others' interests alone; while
the trading community are nothing more than
agents, to gather from the four quarters of the
globe necessaries and luxuries, to supply the
wants, real and imaginary, of their fellow-men,
scarcely ministering to their own cravings of
nature.
Oh! how generous and benevolent is man to
his fellow-man! How little does self appear in
all the bustle and turmoil of this busy city; that
is, if you only look at the surface of their acts,
and listen to the language of the actors.
But I do not complain of these things; they
are best as they are. I state them as facts, which
are not always clearly seen in the dear intimacies
of college life. I would not destroy the selfishness
of man if I could, any more than I would destroy
the main-spring of a watch, which I highly prized;
upon it are founded the courage, the industry, the
enterprise, the knowledge, and the prudence of our
species; and out of these grow our governments
and our laws.
I cannot disguise from you, Randolph, that the
natural tendency to gloom and despondency which
you have so often observed, grows upon me much
of late; but attend to what I am about to relate,
and you may account, perhaps, for that, as well as
the previous train of ideas in this epistle.
On the evening of the day after our visit to
the falls, the same company, with many additions,
had assembled at the house of Mr., father to
one of the young ladies of our party. The
stiffness
and formality which generally prevail for
the first hour on such occasions, were just
beginning
to give way to a better state of things.
Lamar
and Arthur were formidably arrayed against
each other, on either side of Isabel, while Miss St.
Clair and I were ensconced, as aforetime, in one of
those little convenient recesses in which these
fashionable houses abound. I had never seen her
so cheerful, or known her to enter into conversation
with more spirit and apparent enjoyment, than upon
this occasion. She conversed with great
animation
and eagerness, which is evidently her natural
manner, until she would catch my eyes
unconsciously
riveted upon her countenance; she would
then cast down her own, with the most becoming
modesty, while her usual sadness would again steal
over her countenance, as if she had just recollected
and identified herself and her treasured sadness.
But I would again succeed in banishing the cloud
by leading her to converse and become excited on
some subject which deeply interested her, and
again she would recollect herself. These
repeated
excitements eventually led her to look with
more complacency upon the power of pleasing
and of conversation which still remained to her,
for it was evident to me, by the time the evening
was half spent, that she could be said to have
enjoyed
the party.
Every thing seemed thus to be going on
smoothly, until we had all, as is frequently the case
on such occasions, become for a time quite
boisterous
;
here one little coterie laughed outright; there
another had got into such a lively dispute, that the
neighbours were compelled to pitch their voices
to the same key in order to be heard at all; and
so on round the saloons, until the din resembled a
little bedlam; every person seemed to be enjoying
himself more after our southern fashion than I have
seen since I came hither; there was a reckless
resignation to the enjoyment of the moment, which
you do not often see in these large cities.
All at once there was a dead pause. Every
tongue was hushed, as if a funeral knell had
been sounded from the richly wrought ceiling.
You could almost have heard the ladies' hearts
beating. My companion and I were deeply
absorbed
at the time in a conversation, which it is
not necessary
now
to relate; but when silence thus
suddenly took place, all were anxious to see the
cause, all the necks in the room were elongated,
and ours last but still among the rest. And there
I beheld, Randolph, a sight which I shall vividly
remember to the latest period of my existence,
both on account of its character, and its effects
upon one around whom are entwined the very fibres
of my heart.
In the centre of the room, there stood the
emaciated
figure of a man, wrapped in a long red
dressing-gown
,his
throat bound up with surgical
dressings
,his
VOL. II.F
head shaved and dressed with a plaster,
his gray hair hanging lank from its edges over his
temples and shoulders,his eyes sunk deep in
their sockets, and glaring round the room,his
cheek-bones projecting,his eyebrows gray and
bushy,his beard and mustachios unshorn,his
lips thin and retracted, showing a perfect set of
large white teeth, in the most ghastly manner, like
a recently-dissected skeleton,his nose long, white,
and thin, and collapsed like that of a corpse. Just
above the dressings of his throat was the
pomum
Adami
, working up and down among the long
stringy tendons, like a tackle or pulley; while an
unnatural fire shot from his eyes, and all his
movements
were quick, convulsive, and maniacal.
As soon as my companion raised her head
above the little crowd which obstructed her view,
the eye of this figure darted upon her with vulture
quickness and malignity, and stretching out his
long bony hand, and pointing his shaking finger
directly at her, `There,' said he, `is the
murderess
!
Thought you I was dead? Dead men tell
no secrets! but I have risen from the grave!
Behold
me! am I not a pretty corpse?' and then he
burst out into one of those singularly frightful and
wretched peals of laughter, which you may
sometimes
hear from the maniac's cell.
Ere his speech was half-concluded, as I
subsequently
found, the lady had fallen lifeless at my
feet. My attention was so irresistibly attracted
by the strange visiter, that I was not aware of this
effect until a dozen at once sprang to her relief
By the time she was carried out of the saloon, the
friends of the wretched man, or his attendants, had
been able to trace him; and rushing in, forcibly
dragged him off, and placed him in a carriage at
the door. The room was now one scene of
indescribable
confusion: the predominant feeling was
sympathy for the afflicted young lady. There was
a great deal of low whispering, of which I was
enabled
to catch only detached sentences, such as,
`That is his father.'`I thought he was dead.'`It
is shameful in his friends to suffer him to annoy her
in this way, as if she had not suffered enough by
them already.'
I ventured not to ask what all this meant,
Randolph; yet the most maddening curiosity
seized me. I left the room without Lamar;
indeed
the whole party broke up in confusion, and I
suppose our agreeable little society will now be
dissolved; for I hear that the lady has already
gone up the river to her own home.
After I left them so abruptly, I wandered round
this large city with as little purpose or motive as
the maniac himself could have done. My brain
seemed to be on fire, and every pulsation to be
throbbing as if it would burst; huge drops of
perspiration
would start upon my forehead and upper
lip, as I ran, rather than walked, from one street to
another, Heaven only knows where; and I
suppose
I should have been wandering till this time,
if a hackney-coachman had not happened to come
along, which I discerned by the number on his
lanterns
,
and I immediately employed him to set me
down at the City Hotel.
When I arrived at our apartments, I found
Lamar and Arthur talking over the circumstances
as busily, and in as friendly a manner, as if they
had never been jealous of each other. What
provoked
me, however, was, that the moment I
entered
the room they became mute as statues, and
exchanged knowing glances, as if I had been an
idiot, or could not see them. I hate this sort of
commiseration: I suppose they saw it; for they
left the room together. I walked the floor for half
the night; tumbled and tossed in the bed for the
remainder, and arose next morning little refreshed,
and none the wiser to this moment, as to the
meaning
of this strange business.
Chevillere
.
CHAPTER V.
B. Randolph to V. Chevillere
.
Belville, High Hills of the Santee, S. Carolina
, 18.
When
I last wrote to you, I had but just
escaped from the jaws of the hideous monster
cooked up by a spell of fever, in order, as it turned
out afterward, to be served up to the same
monster
in a more novel and savoury form; at least,
that seems to have been the benevolent intention of
his grim majesty towards your humble servant if
my good genius, or destiny, or a good servant, had
not interposed in my behalf. With the exception
of the time when I was ill, I have occupied a small
building which stands about a hundred yards from
the main edifice at Belville. It is known here as
`
the library;
' and seems, from all I can learn, to
have been your favourite retreat. There, you
know, I found all the little snug luxuries of a
southern bachelor, not excepting a supply of
cigars
for a twelvemonth's siege; all the foreign
and domestic reviews and magazines, files of
country
and city papers, old and new nevels, writing
materials, half-finished drawings, music-books and
musical instruments, all in the most delightful order
in the midst of confusion.
F 2
There I used regularly to retire after eleven
P. M., to saw on the violin, snap some of the strings,
throw it aside, take up the flute, dive into the midst
of an overturequiver, and quiver, and quiver at
some tough passage, like a Frenchman talking
English when he does not understand the language;
bowing, scraping, shrugging, and making all the
appropriate
gestures, but coming no nearer the words
he wishes to get out; so it was with me on your
confounded twenty-one keyed flute; I bobbed my
head, and turned up my eyes, stamped with my
feet, and shook with my fingers, but it would not
come out music. Away I tossed it, of course.
Next came one of your half-finished sketches.
I recognised it immediately as one of our old
college-haunts
,
and took up the crayon to finish from
memory what you had left undone; but I soon
found that I put down mountains instead of
mole-hills
;
so that a very few of my touches were
required
to obliterate the perspective, lights and
shades, and every thing else save a little touch of
darkness visible. Away it went after the flute and
violin. Next came a cigar out of a drawer, and
the last number of the Southern Review. `
These
,
at least, I can play on,' said I to myself; `these
require none of the touches of artists or
accomplished
gentlemen; here I have all the pleasures of
life, dressed to the taste of all comersgrilled,
stewed, roasted, or fricasseed. Here is an epitome
of the age of intellect and the march of mind;
music ready played to your hand, perhaps, and if
not, the finest substitute in the world for it in the
jerks and quivers of the writer, as he draws his
bow-hand over the dots and demi-semi-quavers of
some luckless wight of an author.'
Such were my occupations in this
sanctum
sanctorum
of yours, during most of the latter part
of the evenings, and such was my employment on
a certain night when, having retired from the
parlour
uncommonly well pleased with myself (merely,
I believe, because I was pleased with Virginia's
treatment of me), and having gone through this
routine, and read myself into drowsiness, I
undressed
and went to bed, and (as has been the case
ever since I recovered my legs) was no sooner
down than I was fast asleep; not so fast, however,
but that I dreamed horrible things. No marvel
that I should; for in the midst of one of these
peregrinations
,
I was suddenly awakened by a cold,
damp, clammy hand, fastened so tight upon my
throat that I was almost strangled at the first grasp.
I had scarcely become conscious of my position,
before I heard a heavy blow, as from a billet of
wood, upon some one's head. Instantly the grasp
was loosened from my throat, and I heard a heavy
fall upon the floor. I sprang up in the bed, and
screamed to my defender, whoever he might be, to
get a light. He ran out to obey my orders, but
was scarcely over the threshold of the lower door
before the man on the floor sprang up, leaped out
of the window about twenty feet, I suppose, and
was shrouded in impenetrable darkness. His
movements were so sudden that his escape took
me completely by surprise.
But I was still more surprised when, as I stood
by the open window drawing on my clothes, I saw
the whole lawn suddenly illuminated as if a
magnificent
meteor had darted across the horizon.
The light increased and continued, however, and
I soon heard my protector raise the alarming cry
of
fire!
wood crackling, and dozens of voices
joining in chorus. The smoke began by this time
to make its way into the room where I stood, from
the library below. I rushed to the staircase, but
found there was no egress except through the same
opening which my strange assailant had sought.
Something between a jump and a fall brought me
to the ground, when I discovered that the whole
of one side of the library was in flames. It was
useless to throw on water by the single bucket-full,
and seeing the lower door free, and one side of the
room and all the books and papers on that side safe
as yet, I rushed in and ordered those of the negroes
to follow me who had collected around, and were
gaping in stupid wonder at the scene.
We were enabled to save many bundles of
papers and most of the valuable books, before the
flames encroached so much on our side as to
compel
us to seek the door. This they were a long
time in reaching, because the incendiary had placed
the fire among the papers under the staircase in
the little closet, for the purpose, I suppose, of cutting
off my retreat. By this time, your mother and
cousin had hastily dressed and were no unfeeling
spectators of the latter part of our labours. It did
not strike them with so much dread and horror as
it would have done, because they were ignorant,
as yet, how it originated, and I determined to let
them remain so until morning, lest it should alarm
them so much as to prevent their further repose.
In the mean time I determined to see every
precautionary
measure taken to guard the main
building
from a like calamity. Accordingly, after I had
persuaded the ladies to retire, I summoned Tombo
and my brave defender (who proved to be the
young fellow whose cause I had advocated against
the driver), to a council of war in the parlour.
I had every confidence in my coadjutors; I
therefore arranged that Tombo should stand and
walk sentinel round the house for two hours, that
Philip should then take his turn of two hours more,
and at the end of that time, they were to awaken
me. I arranged it thus because I thought it likely
that if any attempt should be made on the mansion,
it would be just before daylight, when I should be
on guard myself. I supposed a renewal of the
attempt more likely, because I thought that I
discovered
in some of the crowd assembed at the fire
a disposition to stand aloof and secretly rejoice,
and from what I have since learned, there were
two complete parties on the occasion. It seems
that this driver (like all drivers, I suppose) was in
the habit of showing partiality in his
administrations
of summary justice. This had naturally
made him a strong man with his own peculiar
favourites
.
The day after the disturbance at the driver's
house, spoken of in a former letter, when all things
had assumed their wonted quiet, the driver made
his appearance. According to promise, I
summoned
the white overseer before your mother, and
requested an examination into the conduct of the
driver, in cruelly and unjustly whipping Philip. It
was readily granted, and both your mother and
the overseer requested me to accompany the latter
to see the matter impartially settled. I did so,
and the investigation resulted in the deposition of
the driver from his high authority, and a
repayment
on his own back of part of the stripes which
he had so unmercifully inflicted upon Philip. These
were almost forgotten until the night before the
last, when the fire and my attempted strangulation
were discovered, and the latter was so fortunately
thwarted by the shrewdness and vigilance of
Philip.
It seems he had noticed the ex-driver prowling
about the library in the early part of the evening,
and had determined, in consequence of so unusual
a circumstance, to keep an eye to his motions.
This he did effectually, so far as my personal safety
was concerned; but the scoundrel had thrown the
fire into the closet, between the time of his own
entrance and Philip's following him; which he was
afraid to do too quickly, lest he might discover him
before he had ascertained his designs on the library
and its inmate. No farther attempt was made
upon the house during the night, nor did his
exdrivership
make, then or since, his appearance.
Next morning I cautiously made known all
these facts to your mother. She was much more
agitated than during the attack upon the said
driver; but she soon rallied her accustomed
energies
,
and laid down the course to be pursued with
a promptness and decision which were really
admirable in one so gently tutored in her younger
days. She determined that the culprit should be
sold as soon as he could be caught, together with
any others who could be detected as having aided,
abetted, or approved of his designs. This
punishment
of selling seemed to me mild for one so
guilty; but when your mother explained to me her
views, I was satisfied that it was the best
disposition
of the case, for all parties, which could
possibly
be made.
`You see, Mr. Randolph,' said she, `that this
ignorant creature was elevated by the overseer to
an authority which tended to excite rather than
subdue his bad passions, and one which I doubt
whether any ignorant negro can exercise without
injury to himself and his fellows. It clothes the
slave with the authority and some of the privileges
of the master; two conditions which are entirely
incompatible with each other. If, then, he has been
criminal, when it was difficult, indeed almost
impossible
for him to be otherwise, it becomes us to
protect ourselves, it is true, but to be as lenient as
this duty to ourselves will admit. I am
determined
,
henceforward, to have no more black drivers
on the plantation.'
It seems, too, that this selling is a terrible
punishment
to negroes who have been accustomed to
the mild and indulgent treatment which yours
enjoy. But now that all this burning, and
attempted
murder, and consequent discipline, and
the excitement of the moment are over, and we
have time for cool reflection, what ideas naturally
present themselves? A gloomy foreboding for the
future!
You know that I have not, when in health,
habitually looked at the dark side of things; but I
must confess to you that the recent circumstances
have conjured up exceedingly unpleasant
anticipations
.
What can we do to prevent the realization
of these apprehensions? We cannot set slaves
free among us. Such a course would dissolve the
social compact. It would set at defiance all laws
for the protection of life, liberty, and property,
either among them or the whites. It would present
the strange anomaly of a majority under the
control
of the minority, and a majority possessing
personal without political freedom; which state of
things could not last, because anarchy and
confusion
would usurp the place of law and government.
To emancipate them where they are, would be,
then, to surrender life, liberty, and property,and
for what? to render justice to these poor creatures?
Would it be rendering justice to them or ourselves?
Would it be any reparation of an hereditary wrong,
to plunge the subjects of that wrong, with
ourselves
,
into irretrievable ruin, to attain nominal
justice? Who is it that expects this of us?
Certainly
not the intelligent part of the community
among whom you sojourn at present! Who are
they, then, who demand it? A set of enthusiasts.
Send some of them here to preach their own
doctrines
among the negroes, and, my word for it, they
will set a ball in motion which they cannot stop
again! They would be overwhelmed in a storm
of their own creating. It is cowardly in the
extreme
for them to stand at a
safe distance
,
throwing
lighted matches into our magazines. If they
wish to fight freedom's battles, let them repair to
the scene of the conflict, and expend some of their
surplus chivalry at the post of danger. They
would need no worse enemies than the blacks
themselves
.
They would soon see a tyranny ten times
worse than the slavery of the South, in the lawless
outrages and uncontrollable fury of the savage
mob.
But let us turn from this disagreeable subject
to my own more immediate concerns. My rival,
the Charleston refugee, has actually, and in form,
become a suitor to Virginia; and she is now
engaged
in playing off on him something of the same
caprice which she formerly exercised upon me.
When I say that he has become a suitor in form, I
mean that he has requested your mother's leave
to address her; she replied, `that she intended
VOL. II.G
henceforward to refer such applications to
Virginia
herself; that she had full confidence in her
judgment and discretion.' Virginia intends to
reject
him upon the first opportunity. My vanity
says so; and thenand thenI intend to give her
a chance to add another to her list of killed and
wounded. You see the devil has not been cast out
of me so completely as I thought; he was only
subdued a little.
I shall not leave this place, whether rejected or
not, until I see all things tranquillized at the
quarter
,
so you may rest at ease on that score. Write
freely, fully, and often; I feel quite interested in
your demure lady of the black mantle; you ought
to have me there, to unravel the mystery; I
have been panting all along for some such
opportunity
.
Virginia's respectful treatment of me continues.
I am observing her closely; the result of which,
perhaps, with some other results, I may give you
in my next. She is a beautiful subject of study,
either for the artist or the moralist, but for the latter
more especially, being just at that interesting age
when the female mind begins to mature in the
south; she is just arriving at some results, and
preparing to work her previous observations into
connected links. God send she may not come to
some conclusions very unfavourable to your humble
servant,
B. Randolph
.'
CHAPTER VI.
V. Chevillere to B. Randolph
.
New-York
, 18.
Dear Friend
,
She is gone, Randolph! and without my seeing
her, or receiving an explanation from any source
whatever. I did not expect one from them at this
time, but there are others of my acquaintances
who have no excuse whatever for the manner in
which they treat me. The moment I approach
any of them where she is the subject of discourse,
the conversation is hushed, as if they were talking
of an idiot who suddenly makes his appearance.
I will not bear it, by heavens! I will be off
without
so much as giving Lamar notice, and seek an
explanation where I have now a right to seek it,
namely, at Oakland. My brain is on fire. My
passion, if it can be dignified with no higher name,
becomes the more maddening with every new
obstacle that is thrown in its way. But my object
in taking up the pen was not to dwell upon the
unutterable things which I have suffered in the last
few days, but to relate to you another unfortunate
turn, which things relating to our northern
expedition
have taken.
Lamar and Arthur have become bitter enemies,
and Arthur has actually challenged Lamar to meet
him in deadly combat the day after to-morrow.
What is to be done? My own head is confused,
my heart sad, and my anticipations gloomy. I
have reasoned and raged with both, and have left
them much more disposed to fight with me than
to adjust their own quarrel. This enmity had its
ostensible origin, like most others of its kind, in a
mere trifle. Lamar and Arthur met at the
Hazlehurst's
,
when the former began to entertain the fair
Isabel with some of the oddities of Damon,
repeating
his speeches and imitating his gestures. Arthur
construed this into an intentional affront, purposely
introduced in his presence for effect, and
immediately
left the room. Lamar had not long returned
to the hotel before Arthur entered in a towering
passion, and demanded to know what he meant by
exhibiting his damned Kentuckian, just at that time
and place, and in his presence, and by heavens,
glancing at me all the while, said he. You know
how this was likely to end. Lamar is not the man
to be either softened or bullied into measures by
such a speech. Coolly talking through his teeth,
in his peculiarly provoking style, he told Arthur
that all discussion was at an end, and that he was
willing and ready to hear any communication from
him with which he might choose to honour him.
To make the matter more difficult to adjust, young
Hazlehurst became the bearer of a challenge from
Arthur, which Lamar referred to me of course. I
say it made the matter worse, because, in the first
place, he is the brother of the lady, and in the
second, he and I are open and undisguised rivals,
so that we might get up a double affair with very
little trouble; but against this, I took especial care
to guard at the onset.
I waited upon Arthur in person, contrary to
all rules in such cases; he insisted upon sending
for Hazlehurst. I locked the door and put the key
in my pocket, and then undertook to argue the case
with him; I represented to him that we were three
strangers here, almost in a foreign country, and
that it would have no good appearance to slay one
of the three for a trifle. He was silent. I begged
him to relate all the circumstances; he referred
me to Hazlehurst, so that I was compelled to turn
my attention next to Lamar. I found him in his
room, writing. He laid down his pen, and looked
up in a very unpromising manner; he was as
perverse
and coolly obstinate as his antagonist, and
wound up the discussion by handing me the key
to his pistol case, and requesting me to look to their
condition.
Now you have a glance at the whole business.
What could I do but arrange weapons, distance,
place, et cetera, with Hazlehurst? And thus the
matter rests until day after to-morrow; when I
will make one more effort to reconcile these
maddened
young men and old school fellows.
G 2
Now for my own affairs again. You no doubt
recollect, Randolph, those days of incipient
bachelorism
,
as you and Lamar considered them, when
I was living secluded from female society; I was
not then an unobservant spectator, as you supposed;
I studied the female character much and deeply;
it is true, that I had given myself up to a future
life of single blessedness; not from selfishness, or
suspicion, or parsimony, or fear, but from a
supposed
knowledge of my own individuality, I never
expected to find a lady endowed with all the rich
and varied characteristics which my imagination
had taught me to look for, at the same time that
she should possess youth, beauty, and
accomplishments
.
I thought such a one as I might worship,
could only be formed by the two (almost)
impossibilities
of youth and experience.
Such a one I have found, Randolph; one
whose whole life in detail could furnish me with
subjects for pleasing study and admiration; one
whose interest would never flag; whose mind is
constantly increasing in its rich and simple stores;
whose deep knowledge of the world has neither
tinctured her with incurable melancholy, cynicism,
nor pride; who is as simple and unaffected as a
child of nature, whose beauty is of such vision-like
influence, that you breathe in an exhilarating
atmosphere
as long as you are within its spell. Her
presence illumines a room, not for me onlyevery
one smiles when she smiles, and listens when she
speaks. She carries with her an indescribable
charm; the young and the old alike seek her
society. To the old and the sanctimonious she is
agreeable without the affectation of piety or
prudery
;
to the young she is charming without wit,
gayety, or vanity. It is not sympathy alone, for
we can deeply sympathize with those that suffer,
without receiving as much as we give, and without
in any measure enjoying their society.
There are a few of these rare and gifted
individuals
scattered over the world, like brilliant stars
in a dark night; but they are often overclouded
with storms and vicissitudes. I do not assert that
these are actually necessary to their full
development
;
but certain I am that they are a constant
attendant upon their sometimes brilliant career.
The captivating charm in these persons is not
eccentricity, either real or affected; nor in displays
of learning or superior wisdom; nor in wit and
novelty; nor in beauty and genius. It seems to
me to consist in bland, ingenuous benevolence,
intuitive
perception of propriety, and the engaging
sadness of deep and painful experience, untinctured
with the evils which a knowledge of human
depravity
too often engenders. I know that every
ardent lover imagines his mistress to be just such a
character; but before I would class them as such,
the impression must be universal; there must be
no room for argument; these good qualities must
charm all hearts into acquiescencenot reason
them into conviction, or dazzle them into the
acknowledgment
by brilliant sallies of genius. Such
a gentle and admirable being, I say, I had found:
nay, more, I had worshipped, in the permitted
human
worship of the heart. But now, Randolph, I
am neither contented nor happy. I have a
longing
and eager desire to hear what this experience
has been that has developed those very qualities
which I most admire. It would be strange and
anomalous, would it not, if I were to quarrel with
the means by which this great good, in my eyes,
has been brought about? But so it is; we often
are willing to pluck the delicious fruit, and quarrel
with the thorns upon which it grew. This is quite
natural. All men love to pluck the roses without
the thorns; to gather up the good things of this life
without the accompanying and antithetical evils in
which they are uniformly found imbedded. The
soul of man seems to have been constructed for
another sphere of existence. It seems to scorn the
schooling of contrasts by which all things are
effected here; and not to desire the knowledge of
good and evil in the only way in which nature has
made that knowledge admissible. We would reap
the knowledge, it is true; but we would reject the
pains and experience of which it is born.
I am just now in that predicament. I desire
to possess a peerless and princely jewel; yet I
dread to dive down into those regions in which
only it is to be found; but I have embarked upon
the current, and I must now sink or swim.
But apart from personal considerations, is it
man's singular destiny, that all sensations should
be born of contrasts? That all pleasures should
be born of pains, and that our ideas should be but
the combined representatives of these? It is a
curious matter of study, to ascertain of how much
pain our pleasures are composed, and how
essential
are the former to the very existence of the
latter. These rich capacities produced by the
various combinations of contrasts, are peculiar to
the human animal, so far as I have observed; and
may account in some measure for the fact, that
man is capable of suffering more exquisite and a
longer duration of pain, than any of his fellow
animals. How much of this acute sensibility is
owing to the combination of the soul with our
organizations
,
is another curious subject of study,
which I merely hint at for your especial benefit;
investigate these subjects, Randoph, and enlighten
the world upon them.
You see I begin with love and murder and end
with metaphysics, but you must not quarrel with
the desultory manner in which I write, if you wish
really to follow the current of our thoughts and
feelings, for is it not a fact that men, at our age at
least, think and act in this desultory train? Take
one of your conversations with a friend, for
instance
,
and think over the course which it pursued,
and you will be surprised at the first glance to
perceive how little connexion there is apparently
between the subjects of it; yet if you have been
the leader in that conversation, take a second view
and see the little secret vein or connexion in your
own mind; you will find the most opposite subjects
connected together, by a chain which you will
seldom find on paper, either in fact or described.
How many ludicrous ideas will sometimes force
themselves upon us on the most solemn occasions!
How natural it is to see an urchin labouring to
suppress a laugh at a funeral or at church! And
how often have you yourself been just ready to
burst into merriment in the middle of the most
pathetic scenes of tragic representation, not owing
to the defects of the actor, but to that secret
current
of the thoughts over which one has no control.
I recollect once going to hear a funeral sermon,
deeply impressed with the solemnity of the
occasion
,
and of course profoundly engaged in the
subject
of the eloquent speaker: but all at once, like
a flash of electricity, the idea rushed through my
mind, of Samson racing down three hundred
foxes. I thought of the dead, and his virtues; of
our loss, the sad occasion for which we had
assembled
;
but all would not do; I could see Samson
running after Reynard too distinctly; so that I
was forced to feign sudden illness, and leave the
church for fear of disgracing myself. Now there
was no impious feeling in all this. I had never
in my life thought of that subject before; I
surmised
some figurative meaning in the text, but the
ludicrous was too palpable for me.
These secret currents of the thoughts are
inexplicable
,
at least at our time of day; perhaps age
and long drilling may put the other powers more
completely under the command of the will; until
then you must allow me to write as I think.
Yours truly,
V. Chevillere
.
CHAPTER VII.
B. Randolph to V. Chevillere
.
High Hills of the Santee
, 18.
The
change in Virginia's deportment has been
to me a curious subject of study and reflection. I
dare not say that it has been entirely disinterested
study, but perhaps it was none the less close and
minute on that account. We are apt to
investigate
those engines which operate upon ourselves
very philosophically. But before I go any farther,
permit me to correct an error into which I fear
I have led you, because I had honestly fallen into
it myself. I stated to you that my sickness had
cast out devils for me, and that I was altogether a
changed and reformed man. It is no such thing;
I feel the devil of mischief and fun in me even
now. It was nothing more than a natural
depression
of animal spirits, consequent upon the low
state of my stomach and pulsations. The doctor
was my priest on the occasion. He subdued the
old Adam in me for a time, by the assistance of
his lancet and the whole vegetable and mineral
kingdom, worked up into shot and bullets vulgarly
called pills, by the aid of which these same
doctors
,
I believe, often do a deal of execution; at all
events this disciple fleeced me of a goodly
quantity
of the flesh upon my ribs; none of his shot
happened to be mortal; but, nevertheless, I would
advise you to keep out of the reach of their
magazines
.
The muzzle of a pill-box is as terrible to
me now, as the mysterious dark hole in the end of
a forty-two-pounder; and a blister-plaster as awful
as an army with banners. As for cupping-glasses
and scarificators, they are neither more nor less
than instruments of torture, borrowed from the
Spanish inquisition. But above all, deliver me
from the point of a seton-needle! Did you ever
see a cruel boy string fish on a stick before they
were dead? He runs the stick through the gills,
tearing and torturing as it goes; so do these
disciples
of Esculapius; they seize a piece of your
skin, no matter how scarce the article may be,
no matter if your lips do not cover your teeth, and
the bones of your nose look white through the
attenuated
sheath! Away goes this surgical bayonet
through a handful of it, armed with a piece of gum
elastic, which is left sticking there, the sensation on
the back of your neck being as if the ramrod of a
small swivel had been shot through it; and there
you must sit, or stand, or lie, with this huge thing
all the while poking your head forward, as if you
had a pillory on your back.
Although there is not so great a change in me
as I had supposed, the change in Virginia is none
the less certain. She is as dignified towards me
now as a princess; nevertheless there is a
trembling
VOL. II.H
nervousness about it, which charms me
indescribably
.
I know you will exclaim here, `Vain
fellow!' I am not vain; but as humble and
fearful
as a bride of two hours' standing. Half the
time I am doubtful of the cause of this new
reserve
,
and set it down as decidedly unfavourable
to my views, until I detect a little thrill in her
voice, or tremulousness in the fingers as they meet
mine, or touch the piano; and even that I set down,
sometimes, as nothing more than sympathy for my
forlorn condition, especially if there is a mirror
near, and I happen to get a peep of my shaved
cranium and sharp visage. And then, again, I
consider it nothing more than the natural reserve
of the woman, as she throws off the playful air of
the school-girl; and that too, perhaps, from having
discovered, during my illness, that she could no
longer, in justice to myself, treat me as a playmate.
But all these doubts and difficulties will be solved
in two hours. I have requested her to accompany
me in a walk around the lawn and garden, and I
intimated to her that I had something very
particular
to say. This was ill advised, I know, but the
truth is, I was attempting at that very time to
broach the subject, and, as with all other bashful
boobies, my tongue clove to the roof of my mouth.
I certainly have some fear of disturbing my
pleasant
dreams of the present reckoning; but I am
committed now, and there is no retracting. I shall
leave this letter open, that I may communicate to
you the result; no doubt you can anticipate now
more truly what it will be than I can. Until this
crisis in my affairs is over, farewell.
B. Randolph
.
B. Randoiph to V. Chevillere
.
(In continuation.)
I have deferred the closing of this letter a day
longer than I intended when I penned the above.
The fact is, I was not so much in the humour for
writing as I expected. I was compelled to order
your horse and take my first ride, and you may be
sure that I did not restrain his mettle. What
would you argue from this? That I was
successful
?
or defeated? I should suppose neither, from
that circumstance alone, say you,as you would
be apt to ride down your impetuosity in either
case.
But the time at length arrived,the long
looked-for
,
hoped-for time! and lo! when it did come, I
would have put it back again, if I could have done
so with credit; but no, I must now go onward;
so I plucked up my wavering courage, and
prepared
for a formal introduction. This, you know,
is at all times, and under the most favourable
circumstances
,
but an awkward business; but it is
especially so if the lady possesses a keen sense of
the ludicrous, has a lurking devil of ridicule in her
eye, and if the person about to address her has
often felt the smart of her keen satire.
In the present instance, there seemed a hundred
little smothered devils of fun, and wrath, and
frolic
peeping from the corners of her eyes; not that
her deportment was different from that placid
serenity which has of late sat so modestly upon
her brow; unless, indeed, it was that there might
have been discovered greater efforts than usual to
produce this result. We sauntered down the
lawn, until we came to the clump of pride of India
trees, amid which is situated a summer-house,
covered
with vines; you no doubt recollect the place;
here we were seated.
`Miss Virginia,' said I, in the formal style in
which a lawyer says, `may it please the court,'
`Miss Virginia, when I first set out from home
upon a southern expedition at this strange season
of the year, my only object was to see whether
the original of that miniature, about which you
have heard so much, was as lovely as it
represented
her. I expected to see a beautiful little girl
of thirteen, and hoped at some future day to make
her my wife; nay, if I must make a true
confession
,
I hoped to make some impression on her
youthful and gentle susceptibilities, before she could
see any more attractive admirer, and then leave
her to mature until my return. In all these
expectations
I have been disappointed, except with
regard to the personal qualities, which I found of
a much more dangerous character than I had
calculated
upon; but Miss Virginia Chevillere is not
one to whom I would address compliments upon
her beauty, except in the regular course of my
narrative. During the progress of these
discoveries
I was taken ill, and within the same time a
great change has come over Miss Chevillere.'
`A great change,' said she, suddenly turning
full upon me, a deep blush suffusing her face; `in
what respect, sir?'
`Does Miss Virginia ask that question
seriously
?'
`Never was one more seriously propounded.'
`The change has been from hilarity to calm
placidity, as it regards externals.'
`You astonish me!'
`And
you
astonish
me
.'
A laugh ensued, which afforded a favourable
opportunity, and I continued:
`After my recovery, I found that I had rivals;
that it was more difficult than ever to tell upon
what ground I stood;' she smiled, while I
continued
:
`I have now only to offer Miss Chevillere a
skeleton of a hand,' holding out my anatomy, `but
it is an honest one, and is at her disposal, backed
by as warm and ardent an attachment as ever a
man was laughed and fretted into; will you accept
it for better for worse?'
She hung down her head a moment upon the
ends of her fingers, seeming to struggle, I know
not with what; then suddenly placing her hand in
H 2
mine, she said, `I will be as candid and as honest
as yourself,you have left me no alternative.'
But I pass over those delightful passages,
which no human eye shall ever fathom; they are
my own treasures for future retrospection.
Yet I may give you some hints of our
subsequent
conversation, towards the end of the time
spent in the arbour.
`But, Mr. Randolph, you acknowledge that
you have entertained two distinct opinions since
your arrival at Salem; suppose you should have a
third, and a fourth?'
`My changes of opinion,' said I, `have in both
instances taken their cue from your own changes
in deportment; but to tell you the truth, I should
be contented with either set of manners, or with
either opinion of them.'
`Pshaw!' she replied, `you flatter; I thought
we understood each other too plainly for you to
offer such compliments.'
`I would not offend you for the world, dearest
Virginia, nor would I have you to believe that I
pretend not to have studied the change. All that
I meant to convey was, that I was pleased and
delighted
with Virginia Chevillere when I saw her
the lively school-girl, but far more so when I saw
her the reflecting and considerate young lady; and
that I would have been quite contented with the
former if I had never known the latter; nay more,
I will tell you the cause of the change!' Here
she put her little hand over my mouth.
`No, no, no!' said she, `for fear you might
tell the true one, and surely you shall never find
out my secrets for the world, lest I become afraid
of you!'
`Well,' said I, `I am satisfied with the result;
you may keep your own secrets for the present,
but remember a time is coming, and that soon,
when there will be no secrets between us.'
`Hah! are you there?' replied she; `then I
must see all those letters you have been writing to
my cousin and his friend; indeed, now I think of
it, I must see them before'
There she stopped, not knowing how to finish
the sentence, and immediately started up and
attempted
to run towards the house; I caught her,
and, with gentle violence, compelled her to resume
her seat.
`Before when?' said I.
`Before the great day,' she answered, laughing.
`What, the day of judgment?'
`Yes, truly, the day of judgment.'
`But tell me truly, Virginia, how very, very
soon shall that happy day come?'
`One year from next Christmas day.'
`Phew!' whistled I, `a year and a half! Come,
say a week and a half.'
`Why, sir, you have not asked my aunt's
consent
,
nor my cousin's, nor my guardian's.'
`Come, then,' said I, `let us to the house; it
shall soon be done.'
When we were seated in your mother's private
parlour, the old lady looked first at me, and then
at Virginia. The latter sat with her cheeks flushed,
biting the fingers of her gloves into bits, with
side-long
glances at me, and a malicious smile upon her
face. I was meanwhile pulling all the fur off my
hat with one hand, and drumming on the crown
with the other. Virginia could bear this no longer,
but, bursting into a sprightly laugh, flew out of the
room.
`Ah!' said your mother, `I see it all; you
need not pain yourself, Mr. Randolph, in breaking
the subject. Believe me that a woman's vigilance
does not often sleep in these matters.'
`Ah then, dear madam, say that your
judgment
approves of your son's partiality in my
favour
.'
`My
son's
! I thought it was my niece's.'
`Indeed, madam, I mean both, if I dare say
so.'
`Mr. Randolph, you have my cheerful
consent
;
trust me, I have not observed you carelessly,
since your visit to us, to say nothing of the
unbounded
confidence which I place in Victor's
judgment of his associates and school-fellows. To
tell you the truth, he long ago revealed to me his
ardent desire that you and Virginia should become
acquainted, and his conviction that you were
exactly
suited to each other.'
`Do then, dear madam, urge an early day for
our nuptials; your niece's most extravagant
notions
of the length of human life render the request
necessary.'
`My dear sir!' she replied, `you have not yet
consulted your own relations and friends; even if
you had, you would not be married to-night?'
`Madam, I would, if I had my own way,
especially as I have unfortunately no mother and
father to consult.'
`There will then be nothing to prevent your
removing to South Carolina.'
`You forget, madam, that we Virginians are
the most bigoted people in the world about our
own country.'
`You would not separate my adopted daughter
from her widowed mother?'
`By no meansI would take the mother with
the daughter.'
`Have you a home already prepared?'
`I have, madam, the home of my fathers.'
`I fear it will be more difficult to remove you
than I had supposed. Virginia and I have
managed
this business badly. We should have held you
in suspense until you had renounced your country.
But perhaps it is as well thus; forced renunciations
are generally unhappy.'
I need not repeat to you, dear Chevillere, every
word that passed between us; suffice it, therefore,
to inform you, that I am to tear myself away, in a
few days, to the Old Dominion, to prepare for my
nuptials, which will occur immediately on my
return
;
and this, whether you shall have repaired
hither or not. Indeed, you need not be surprised
to see Mr. and Mrs. Randolph in New-York
before
Christmas.
Yours truly,
B. Randolph
.
CHAPTER VIII.
V. Chevillere to B. Randolph
.
New-York
, 18.
Dear Friend
,
I AM inexpressibly sad. Every thing goes
wrong. The bright hopes and brilliant
anticipations
with which we came to this city have
vanished
!
Yesterday morning at sunrise, Lamar and
I were on the ground (in Jersey) before our
antagonists
were anywhere to be found. As had
been agreed upon, I was to furnish the arms for
the unnatural occasion. Lamar, though not in
bravado, was desperately calm and savage; I
could see from his hurried steps, compressed lips,
and flashing eyes, that he was in no condition to
do well even the wretched business for which we
had come. I thought too, while his present humour
lasted, that there was no possibility of succeeding in
my deeply cherished hopes of a compromise. To
hint directly at a reconciliation would have been
to thwart it; I thought the only plan, therefore,
would be to urge upon him coolness and
deliberation
for his own sake.
`Lamar,' said I, `do you think yourself in good
condition and feelings to act with entire
self-possession
?'
`Never in better! My eye is clear, heart
cheerful, and hand steady! I could knock a
mosquito's
eye out this morning, at twenty steps.'
What a singular thing it is, Randolph, that the
mind of a firm and courageous man, when about
to engage in a personal affair of this kind, seems
always to be narrowed down or concentrated to
the direction of the lead in its passage from the
pistol, and all his ideas seem to run upon straight
lines, and steady aims, and that even under an
aspect
of levity!
How is it, that one can throw aside all the
momentous considerations which press upon a
bystander
?
that the profoundest melancholy does not
overwhelm him? Why not throw the thoughts one
hour ahead and see himselfperhaps weltering in
goreeyes half closedtongue thick and
motionless
feet
and hands coldpulsations feeble, and
altogether in a condition which would call forth
our tenderest sympathies for a stranger found in
this condition by the way side. Perhaps if the
thoughts of combatants could be thus carried
forward
for an hour, their imaginations might show
them their antagonists in this condition. No
enmity
could be so bitter, that they would not feel
sympathy for one thus situated. And herein lies
the strangeness and inconsistency of the duellist.
An antagonist once wounded, and we are all
sympathy
for those very sufferings which we ourselves
have inflicted; none was extended while it would
have availed any thing, but no sooner is it
unavailable
,
than it is showered upon the dying
adversary
!
What wretched mockery is this? To
thrust one over a precipice only to pick him up
and lament over him! To fire a house, and then
seek to extinguish it with tears! To put out a
man's eyes, and then ask him to
look
upon you with
forgiveness! To shoot a neighbour through the
heart, and then kneel and pray for his pardon before
he dies!
How much like the child with his toy is all
this, when he, in the folly of the moment, destroys
some invaluable relic, which millions could not
restore. So it is with us `children of a larger
growth,' when we go out upon the field to sport
with human life, as if it was a thing to be restored
when once destroyed.
The truth is this, and the position will be
sustained
by the facts which I am going to relate: no
man who goes on such an errand, realizes in his
own mind what it is he is about to do or to suffer.
Let such a one vividly realize to his own mind his
antagonist, stretched out on a litter, just ready to
be borne from the field, a ball having passed across
the bridge of the nose and knocked out both eyes,
and horribly deformed his face, without producing
death! Would he not call upon the rocks and
mountains to crush him for a monster, before he
would touch a hair-trigger? But I am, as is usual
VOL. II.I
with letter writers and reviewers, giving you the
reflections before the facts.
We soon discovered the other party
approaching
the spot. When they were within about fifty
yards of us they halted and held a council, as we
did likewise, to arrange all the awful particulars.
I could see their earnest gestures, as they stood,
partly hid by the bushes, dripping with morning
dew. The time having nearly arrived, one of
their number separated from the rest and
approached
us.
This movement roused me from a very
disagreeable
revery, into which I had thoughtlessly or
thoughtfully glided, while Lamar stood talking to
the surgeon and Damon (who, by-the-by, has just
returned from Albany). I suppose that the cause
of my so far forgetting myself as to indulge in this
habitual mood, was the latter personage calling my
mind vividly to the consequences of our present
undertaking, by some of his plain, downright mode
of speaking to the surgeon. However, I
immediately
recollected my individual responsibility, and
hastened to meet the plenipotentiary of the other
party, who, I found, was young Hazlehurst. He
looked pale and haggard, as if he had been
endeavouring
to keep away the intruding imps of the
night by the more genial spirits of the bottle; he
was any thing but calm, though he assumed to
be so.
The idea of a compromise still forced itself
upon me; I therefore urged it upon him by all the
considerations in my power. I told him that I had
often observed the skill of both; that they were
both `dead shots,' and undoubtedly what the world
is wont to call men of courage. Making but little
impression, I determined to assail him upon a more
tender point, namely, the delicate subject of his
sister's concern in this matter. I begged him to
recollect that it would give her an unenviable
notoriety
,
if one of these young men should be killed.
I seemed here to touch his home feelings, if not
his judgment and his principles, and he returned to
advocate a reconciliation, while I pursued the same
course with Lamar.
It was all to no purpose; for when we met
again upon middle ground, it appeared that each
of the principals had singularly enough construed
our overtures into a demand of apology from the
opposite party. Each now urged that the time had
arrived. The ground had already been measured
off (twenty paces). Our next business was to cast
lots for choice of position and `the word.'
Hazlehurst
won the privilege, if it could be so called, of
giving the word `fire,' and the choice of position
fell to me.
As seconds, we proceeded to load the pistols;
not, however, before I had spent my logic in vain
upon the parties. The task being finished, they
took their positions, appearing calm and composed
to the hasty eye, although a fierce commotion of
subdued elements was going on within. They
looked, however, as report generally says, `calm
and steady.'
Hazlehurst took his position, and all things
being in readiness, his hoarse and evidently
excited
voice began in slow, measured, and distinct
articulation, `Ready! aim! fire! One! two!
three!'
Both pistols were discharged almost at the
same instant, and for a moment I could not see
through the smoke what injury had been done and
received. In another moment Lamar and Arthur
were visible, unhurt, and both singularly staring at
Hazlehurst and me. For my life I could not, at
first, see into this,the first impression was that
they had both been shot, and were still able to
stand, yet unable to move. In this belief I
hastened
to Lamar, who said, as I came up,
`And were they really and truly charged?'
`Upon honour they were,' said I, `and exactly
in the same manner in which you and Arthur have
been practising; for I showed Hazlehurst the
charge when he took his away some days ago, and
I saw him to-day, when we picked up the pistols
indiscriminately, load his exactly as I had
previously
shown him.'
`There must have been some magic in this
business,' said Lamar; `I never carried a steadier
hand up and down a line in my life.'
By this time each party had again withdrawn
to themselves, when I asked Lamar my
instructions
,
as I saw young Hazlehurst again coming to
meet me, as might have been expected. `Another
fire, of course,' said Lamar. Hazlehurst's
instructions
were the same; accordingly, we again went
through the same preliminaries, and something in
addition,for Lamar proposed, and Arthur agreed
to it, through us, that they should both see the
pistols
loaded.
Accordingly we again collected, like a sociable
little coterie, and proceeded to load. Just as I had
done my part, Lamar found some fault with the
manner in which I placed the percussion cap, and
hastily seized the pistol, somewhat contrary to the
usages in such cases; as no one objected, however,
I surrendered it to him. In letting down the cock
to a half-cock, it slipped through his fingers and
exploded, bursting the barrel and wounding him
dreadfully in the hand and the side of the head just
above the right ear, by which he was prostrated in
an instant, covered with blood and powder. We
all thought him dead, as soon as we saw him fall.
Arthur, in particular, knelt down beside him, and
called upon him by all the endearing titles of old
school-fellowship. The surgeon used such means
as were at hand, and soon succeeded in restoring
animation. As soon as he became sensible, Arthur
took his hand and held it between his own during
the whole time we were getting a rude litter ready
to bear him to the carriage, and they were
completely
reconciled. We bore him to the carriage
I 2
and thence by slow marches to the ferry on the
Hudson, from which place we safely removed him
into the room in which I write.
He seems now to be doing well; though his
hand is dreadfully torn, and a deep and large scar
will be left on the side of his head as long as he
lives. We agreed, before we left the ground, to
keep the whole business secret, except so much as
related to the bursting of a pistol in Lamar's hand.
Damon would have been quite amusing, as
usual, if the occasion had not been unsuited to
merriment
;
however, after Lamar was safely placed
in bed, as Arthur insisted on staying with him, I
agreed to accompany Damon to the theatre, as it
was to be his last night in the city.
Accordingly, after tea, he called for me, and we
walked over to the old Park Theatre, taking box
seats on this occasion. You must know,
by-the-by
,
that I do not find the pit in these theatres the
resort of the literati, and critics, and authors. This,
I suppose, is owing somewhat to the character of
our people, the nature of our institutions, and the
low price of admittance.
As we entered, the pit were calling loudly upon
the orchestra for our national air, if it may be so
called, of Hail Columbia. The band, most of whom
were foreigners, were engaged upon some piece of
music more to their own tastes, I suppose; for the
yelling and stamping became excessive before they
yielded to the voice of the mob, which they were
at length compelled to do. It was a benefit night,
and the house was full; many persons standing up
in the rear of the boxes. Damon and I were
lucky enough to procure seats; which we had
scarcely taken, when a little billet was dropped
into my hat, which I held between my knees. I
picked it up hastily, supposing it belonged to some
gentleman behind me; but was astonished to see it
directed to me. I tore it open, and read these
words:
`You know now who the widow is. Beware
of her, beware!'
`(Signed)
Neither a Friend nor an Enemy
.'
I had almost forgotten a similar
communication
received before. I looked round to see who
could have dropped it there. Every countenance
was gentlemanly and calm, forbidding at a glance
all suspicion. I crushed it into my pocket, and
endeavoured to forget it in seeing Damon so
amusingly amused.
After Hail Columbia had been played to their
hearts' content, the mob became calm, and the
curtain
rose. The play, fortunately, was a
home-production
;
and, as good luck would have it, a
Kentuckian
was the principal character.
It was a prize-comedy, the hero of which,
Colonel Nimrod Wildfire
, of Kentucky, quite
captivated
Damon's heart. He entered into the spirit
of the plot with great interest; and, as men
unpractised
in the ways of the refined world generally
do, he realized it so vividly as at times to forget
that it was not a real scene. When the colonel
was rounding off his periods in favour of old
Kentuck
,
Damon would slap down his hand upon his
knee and exclaim, `Hurrah for old Kentuck!'
`This,' said he to me, `is worth a million of
your Italian fiddle-faddles. There, at the opera, a
man, if he should happen to go to sleep, would be
sure to dream that he had fallen foul of a strange
hen-roost, or was riding to the devil in a rail-road
car of live-stock. But here, a man could a'most
dream he was in old Kentuck, with his eyes open.'
`Then you like your countryman the colonel?'
`You may say that, neighbour; but between
you and me and that pillar there, though he's a
plagued clever fellow, yet' (lowering his voice to a
whisper) `he spins rather longer yarns than I'm a
thinkin he does at home.'
`The sin of a traveller,' said I.
`Right again, neighbour; and I, for one, don't
blame him for it. Double and twist me! if I don't
feel
myself
very much moved, now and then, to spin
a yarn or two about old Kentuck, when I see these
etarnal mountebank-dandies, knowing so little
about sich a fine country, and sich whole-souled
fellows.'
`But, Damon,' said I, when the curtain fell upon
the first act; `I have always thought that your
boasting-men never act?'
`I don't understand you,' said he.
`I mean that bullying, swaggering fellows never
fight; or, in other words, `barking dogs seldom
bite.
`Oh, ho! I understand you now! you suppose
because my countryman there on the stage spins
a pretty good yarn, and tells a good story of
himself
,
and what he can do, that he won't fight. But
there, neighbour, I rather suppose that you might
be mistaken a little; for it depends upon the
company
a man keeps what sort of yarns he spins.
Now if the colonel there and I should happen to
fall out about any trifle, he knowing that I was
from old Kentuck and I knowing as much of him,
why there would only be a word and a blow
between
us, all in good nature; but that Mrs.
Trollope
that he is feedin on soft corn don't know
nothing
;
Kentuck'l give her a lesson.'
The first piece being concluded, the afterpiece
now came on, `Paul Pry.' Damon relapsed into a
brown study for some minutes, until he caught a
glimpse of Paul's peculiarities,which were
suddenly
interrupted by his usual slap on the knee,
like the fall of a sledge-hammer. `That fellow,'
exclaimed he, `must be a real Yankee! yes, he's a
Yankee, I see it! I see it! them's the sort o' chaps
they have in Yankee town; no such chaps in old
Kentuck, except among the old wives.'
`How is that, Damon; I thought that every
neighbourhood had a Paul Pry?'
`That may be, hereabouts; but you see we
have a cure for such complaints as that chap seems
to be troubled with.'
`And what may that be, Damon?'
`A knock down and drag out.'
`That, to be sure, is a very summary remedy;
but are you sure it would cure it?'
`As sure as that I'm settin here; just let that
chap or the likes of him travel into old Kentuck,
and run his nose into other people's business after
that fashion, and I'll agree to be hornswoggled if
he don't be apt to
catch it
in his bread-basket.
Jist suppose, now, that Mr. Pry was to git a
sneezer between his two lookin eyes when he's
runnin his nose about after that fashion! he
wouldn't intrude again soon in the same premises.
Paul wouldn't be apt to intrude at a regular
hand-round
in old Kentuck. But what makes you
laugh?'
`I was laughing at your new doctrine of social
order.'
`Lord, sir, I havn't told you half the good that
comes of regulating the people by the five rules.'
`Five rules! what are they?'
`These marrowbones!' (holding up his clenched
fist.)
`Well, let's have it; what other good do they
do, besides what you have already stated?'
`They make people polite to one another, and
keep them from calling names.'
`Calling names!' said I.
`Yes, calling names; no longer than to-day, I
was coming down this very street the theatre
stands on, at a place they call `the square,' and I
heard two fellers talking as if their dander was
up a little; so I walked up and leaned against a
lamp-post close by, to listen and see if any fun
was going to come of it; presently one of 'em
called the other a liar. Now, thinks I, we'll see
some sport; so I rolled up my sleeves, and held
my arms both stretched out to keep back the
crowd. `Don't press on 'em, gentlemen,' said I;
`fair play, fair play!' and what do you think it all
came to?'
`Nothing, I suppose.'
`Right; instead of knocking the fellow on his
sconce, he stood quietly with his hands in his
pockets
,
and says, `Oh hush! Do tell now!' I stared
at them to see if they had tails and walked on
all-fours
,
and the crowd stared at me like fools, as if
there wasn't two fellers there to be stared at sure
enough, without putting old Kentuck out of
countenance
.'
`But you did not interfere any further?'
`Only to ask the man who stood next to me if
he had seen a man call another a liar before,
without
being knocked down. `I never saw anybody
knocked down in my life,' said he, `except by the
watchman.' `I'm hornswoggled,' said I, `If I an't
glad I'm goin away to-morrow, for I should be
spiled here in a short time;' and then they all set
up a horselaugh at
me
, instead of laughing at the
two cowards who stood by.'
`Well,' continued I, `are there any other
advantages
of the knocking-down system?'
`O, yes,' said he, `hundreds; it makes the blood
circulate, like runnin in the mountains keeps up
the blood of the bucks.'
`But here,' said I, `there is no necessity for
such a stimulus; because the difficulties of getting
meat and bread where there is such a crowd, are
sufficient to make the blood circulate.'
`Ah, that's true,' said Damon, rather sadly; `it
may suit some stomachs to live in this crowd; but
curse me if it don't make my breath short jist to
think of it; and that ain't the worst of it: I am
told that there is as hard scufflin among the dead
here for a little elbow-room, as among the living.'
`Yes, you have been rightly informed. The
living begin to
push the dead
out of their quiet
resting-places; insomuch, that a man who died
here forty years ago, and paid two hundred dollars
for the ground to be buried in (if he is cognoscent
of such things in another state), finds his bones
scattered with those of the dogs and horses of his
generation.'
`Oh, I'm off,' said Damon, `this would never
do for me. I don't like to be crowded,living or
dead; Lord! when I get into one of our long open
forest ranges again, I rather expect that I shall
snort like a wild beast, when he first snuffs a
stranger.'
`You see no advantages, then,' said I, `to
compensate for these various inconveniences of a
crowded city?'
`None; do
you?
'
`Some; for instance, the society of a large
city, and the amusements; as the theatre.'
`The theatre!' exclaimed he, in surprise;
`would you put this clamjamfry against a deer
drive, or a fox-chase, or a 'coon hunt? Why, I
wish I may be perlequed through a saw-mill, if I
would'nt rather go to a country-wedding, any day,
than come to this place. Why, here it's all
make-believe
;
it's all sham; but out in old Kentuck we
have
the
real
things which you
pretend
here; like
we do scarecrows to a corn-field.'
Much of this dialogue passed between the acts
and scenes; though when Damon becomes
interested
,
he pursues his discourse independently of
performers and audience too. After the
conclusion
of the performance, I walked with him to his
lodgings, and took leave of him with real regret;
whether we shall ever meet with him again,
Heaven only knows; I, for one, will be glad to
see him at any time, and in any company; I have
learned to estimate our rude western yeomanry
more justly since I have become intimate with
Damon; the acquaintance was doubtless
commenced
in the waywardness of our old college
mischief, but it has ended in our all respecting
Damon for his good qualities, and looking upon his
foibles rather as sources of amusement than as
unpardonable faults. There are, doubtless, as
VOL. II.K
many accomplished gentlemen in the state of
Kentucky, as in any other in the Union, but it is
equally certain that wilder regions of the state
produce many such characters as our friend. I
have seen many polished gentlemen of our sister
state; and with the exception of those who come
from the large towns of Lexington, Louisville, &c.,
there is about them a wild romantic turn,
analogous
to their native scenes, which renders them,
in our older settlements, unique, but by no means
disgusting or disagreeable. This tinge is
particularly
observable when contrasted with the
blunted and worn-out societies of our large
northern
and eastern cities.
Lamar we found doing extremely well as to
his wounds, and sleeping soundly. If he continues
thus, I shall soon put an end to this cruel suspense,
which tears my tranquillity to pieces, and strikes
at the root of every enjoyment;you understand
me.
Present me most affectionately to my mother
and cousin; I read your letters with great interest,
I assure you; you cannot be too minute; all, all
will be interesting to yours, most sincerely,
V. Chevillere
.
CHAPTER IX.
Victor Chevillere to B. Randolph
.
Oaklands
, 18.
Dear Friend
,
I left
Lamar in the city of New-York, under
the hands of an experienced surgeon, doing well
as to his bodily wounds, and on such a footing with
his rival as becomes them both, as gentlemen and
old acquaintances. As soon as I had obtained
from the surgeon so much of the foregoing
information
as was professional, I took my passage on board
one of the Albany steamboats. About eight o'clock
of the same day, which at this season of the year
is just after dark, the sky was clear, serene, and
beautiful, save along the western horizon, where a
long veil of purple drapery interposed between the
land and the sky, as the sun sank to rest in
quietness
and beauty, while the moon and the stars at
the opposite point of the compass were just
beginning
to shed their paler rays over the magnificent
scenery of the Hudson. Our boat glided over the
scarcely rippled surface of the noble river, until
the little bell of the engineer, or of some one in
command, was heard in the quiet scene, as a signal
for the engine to cease its ponderous movements,
while the captain at the same moment was heard
to cry out, `Passenger for Oaklands.' A boat was
speedily manned and lowered from the stern,
containing
the said passenger and a small travelling
trunk. It was none other than your old chum and
humble servant.
In a very few moments I was left standing on
the banks of the river, and the boat was speedily
moving out of sight. I looked all around me, to
see in what direction the lights from the mansion
were visible, but all was darkness amid the trees
in the direction of the land. The surface of the
river was still, but no such serenity reigned within
my own bosom. Not that I have no taste for
tranquil
scenes; it was just such a one as I love to
dwell upon; but I was approaching a house, the
owner of which was secretly hostile to the objects
of my visit; all the rest of the family, save one,
were strangers to me, and that one was last seen
under circumstances of doubt and mystery, painful
and impressive to the heart of one who has been
always charged, and perhaps justly, with
fastidiousness
as to female purity and refinement.
Leaving my small trunk hid in a boat-house
which I found upon the banks of the river, I began
leisurely to ascend a gravelled walk, which was
skirted on each side by a row of huge forest trees,
each of which, as its black outlines stood forward
from the darker regions of others behind, looked
like a gigantic bastion of the citadel at the head of
the lawn, to guard against such intruders as I
began
to fear I might be considered by some of the
garrison. Although I had yet some eight or nine
hundred yards to attain the level at the end of
the lawn where the house stood, the dogs began to
warn the inmates of my approach; and as I
ascended
a little mound, more steep in its ascent than
the rest of the walk, the mansion presented itself,
dimly seen by the doubtful rays of the rising moon.
The size and structure of the edifice I could partly
discern from the lights within, as well as from the
gleam without. It seemed to be a two-story frame
building, painted white, with the longest side facing
the river, and a wing or smaller building at each
end; in the centre of the main building was a
portico
,
surrounded at the top by a heavy balustrade.
The trees and shrubbery, as I approached, became
thicker on each side of the avenue, opening into
something like a half circle in front of the house
with the convex towards me. Within this area
there were also trees and shrubbery, but the former
were smaller and of a different kind, and the latter
more tastefully arranged than that interspersed
between the trees along the avenue.
I did not present myself immediately in this
area to sound my bugle and summon the castle,
but wound round one of the wings to reconnoitre
the premises. I had a reason for this movement.
As I stood among the trees on one side of the
avenue
,
waiting till some one should chain up the
dogs, a gentle sound at intervals vibrated through
K 2
the still air, in delightful unison with the scene, the
occasion, and my own feelings. There was
pathos
in the touch of every string, as its tones died
away amid the serenity of the night.
I skirted round among the trees to the other
side of the wing from which the sounds seemed to
proceed. There was no light in the window, but
I could see the gentle songstress as she sat in the
casement, the features of her face being just enough
discernible in the rich and silvery tints of the queen
of night, as her horizontal beams fell amid the
boughs of the trees, to give employment to the
imagination. I could discern her loosened ringlets,
as they fell over a polished forehead and temples,
and occasionally caught the lustre of the eye, as
she turned her face (under the full rays of the
moon) towards the thick grove in which I stood.
The song ended,and by some strange
operation
of the mind, I began to think of a favourite
air which I sometimes play, and which I had given
her in score; the thought had scarcely passed
through my mind, before she touched the identical
melody in her peculiarly soft and `moonlight' style.
Was it not strange? Yet I do not see why we
should so consider these things, occurring so often
as they do. I call to mind my having once
adverted
suddenly in thought, and without any visible
cause, to a friend whom I had not seen for years.
But a few minutes afterward I met the identical
person, and that too in a city five hundred miles
from the spot where we had met before. Is there
some secret connexion or intercommunication of
the mind which we know not of, except by its
effects? Is the German theory a mere whim?
But waving these inquiries, the fact that the same
ideas were passing through my mind and that of
this beautiful and melancholy being, produced novel
and delightful emotions. There must have been
congeniality of thought, if not of feeling. I could
hear the servants scolding and beating the
watchful
guardians of the night, as they still, from time
to time, growled forth their knowledge of my
presence
.
I nevertheless maintained my position
against one of the venerable oaks, until the air was
ended; she touched the guitar no more that night,
but leaning her head on her hand, she gazed on
the captivating scene in what seemed profound
sadness.
`Now,' thought I, `the plain flute in my pocket
(which I always carry with me in my travelling
expeditions) will be in place; and the rest of the
family in the apartments fronting the river are not
likely to hear my soft tones;' (and I made them
more soft than usual,) as I attempted to imitate a
distant, dying echo of the air she had just been
playing.
The effect was instantaneous; she started
from her sad revery, with her head erect, in the
most expressive attitude of listening. I ceased
instantly when these effects were visible. She
soon seemed to think it a delusion, and, holding her
hand to her forehead for a few moments, resumed
her former position. I waited to assure myself
that I had not aroused any other members of the
family.
After remaining in that position for a few
moments
,
she began in a kind of thoughtful abstracted
mood to sigh over the same air. When she had
finished it, I again softly breathed the echo upon
the instrument. For an instant only she started
to her feet,looked out of the window,held her
hand to her head again for some time, as if trying
to ascertain whether she were dreaming or awake.
I thought now that I had practised upon her
feelings
long enough; I therefore replaced the
instrument
,
and walked round to the main entrance of
the building, where I held the knocker some little
time in my hand before I could summon resolution
for the attack. My knock was soon followed by
the sound of footsteps, and when a servant opened
the door, I announced myself as Mr. Chevillere of
South Carolina. He left me seated but a few
moments
,
before he returned with Mr. Brumley. The
latter was more polite and hospitable in his manner
than I had expected, and invited me into the
parlour
,
where his wife, the mother of Miss St. Clair,
was sitting at her work-stand, in a very domestic,
and, to me, pleasing fashion.
She arose upon the introduction, and held out
her hand in southern style, giving me altogether
one of the most smiling and benignant welcomes
I have received for some time. It immediately
carried me back to relatives and the scenes of
home. In addition to this, it was inexpressibly
soothing to me on another account! It said
plainly that I had been well reported to her by
some one, and that one, I was sure, was not her
husband. A servant was despatched for Miss
Frances; in the mean time, the good lady made me
quite at home in a few moments; during which,
as I have above intimated, I found her and her
daughter were of one counsel. Such things are
easily discovered without much of the world's
tact.
Mrs. Brumley, formerly Mrs. St. Clair, is about
the middle height, and apparently about thirty-five
years of age, though she may be much older.
Her hair is light brown, and her eyes are like her
daughter's, blue; she is really handsome in feature
and expression; the latter especially charmed me.
With women of her age, there is generally an
expression
of suppressed suffering,partly subdued
misanthropy,disappointment,bigotry or
fanaticism
.
How seldom do we see cheerful matrons of
the middle age? But Mrs. Brumley was not only
cheerful,she was simple, unaffected, intelligent,
and benevolent.
The younger lady entered. I could not
exactly
determine whether she was alarmed or
embarrassed
,
but she was evidently labouring under
some excitement. She was in more simple attire
than I had seen her wear before. There was
something of the home look both in her dress and
manners which I had never observed, and which
was inexpressibly delightful to me. And the
half-mourning
dress sets off fair hair and a fair
complexion
to the best advantage. In addition to all
these things, a young lady appears different
at home
and in the world. Upon her deportment in the
latter respect it depends whether that difference
redounds to her advantage. Has she been simple
and unaffected in the world? home will make her
simplicity more captivating. But if she has been
abroad in a holyday suit of manners and deformed
with affectation, as is too often the case with very
youthful females, the change made by home will
be painful to the beholder, because this holyday
suit must be thrown aside. It will not pass current
in that market. Even the servants would comment
upon such an assumption, and the lady would be
subjected to the mortification of being laughed at
and criticised by her own attendants.
No such change was visible here; Frances
was evidently at home, in every sense of that
delightful
word. Permit me to make another
observation
here: the estimation in which one is held
by the persons around them, especially the
servants
,
is no bad criterion. When I see the servants
of a family pay unasked homage, and that peculiar
touching devotion which comes from the heart, my
own follows spontaneously. I would not lack the
love of my servants for any earthly consideration.
I can truly say that I never did lack it; and,
contemptible
as it may appear to the proud and
supercilious
,
it has afforded me many an hour of
self-congratulation
.
These were the first things that I looked for,
nor was I disappointed. Every heart seemed to
dictate the actions and services rendered to
Frances
St. Clair. Mrs. Brumley, after ascertaining
that I had already supped, found some business
out of the room, whence her husband had been
previously called by one of the servants. We
were thus left alone within less than half an hour
after I had entered the house. I arose and seated
myself beside her, and presuming to take her hand,
was going to introduce the subject of my visit,
perhaps too suddenly, when she said, permitting
me still to retain her hand, `Ah! Mr. Chevillere,
a mental illusion concerning yourself greatly
alarmed me to-night. Is it not strange that a
thought or occurrence will sometimes recall the
image of a friend, but a few moments before that
friend himself appears?'
`I am too happy,' said I, `to know that I
sometimes
dwell in your thoughts during absence, to
ask the how or the wherefore; but I hope the
illusion
was not wholly unpleasant?'
`Do you perform on the flute, Mr. Chevillere?'
`Imperfectly.'
`Do you play the little air which you gave
me?'
`As well as I play any thing.'
`Then my illusion was still more strange than
I before thought it. Ah! I see you smile! perhaps
you have been practising upon my superstition;
but I thought of that. Ah! you smile again; so
you
did
play that air under my window! Still
there was something strange about it, for I had
but a few moments before touched it on the
guitar.'
`Ah, dear lady, I was so happy as to hear it;
and I am so unhappy as to rob you of that slender
hold for your superstition also; but I will give
you a better one: at the very moment you touched
that air, I was leaning against one of those old
oak-trees
of the grove behind the house, and that
identical
piece of music floated as distinctly through
my mind, as if it had been played in the air
immediately
over my head!'
She was brilliantly beautiful for a moment, as
a new train of thought suddenly illumined her eye.
She then said, in an absent manner,
`It was strange!'
`It was more than strange!' said I.
`What, was it more than strange?' she eagerly
demanded.
`It was delightful to me.'
Her head dropped, while she blushed at the
idea of my reading her thoughts; `I shall fear you
in future!'
`Not for the world, dear lady. Surely it is no
cause of fear that delightful thoughts will
sometimes
be spontaneously felt between us; when I
say delightful, I speak for myself alone; they may
be very disagreeable to you. Of that I do not
pretend to speak at the present moment, further
than to acknowledge that I draw the most happy
presages from these simultaneous bursts of thought
and feeling, which you must often have observed;
nay, further, it is a kind of congeniality which I
have thought until lately had no existence except
in romances. Perhaps it is presuming too far to
say so with regard to the impulses of the heart;
but certainly you will admit the fact with regard
to most subjects.'
`I shall not express my opinion just now,
because
my mind and feelings have been too
painfully
engaged since I saw you, to lengthen the
conversation in that direction which I see plainly
you are disposed to give it.'
`Ha!' said I, `
you
too sometimes read thoughts.
But may I presume to ask what that painful
employment
has been?'
`I have been committing to paper a brief and
plain narration of those circumstances of my life
which I promised to relate to you. I preferred
this course, because my feelings have become so
irritable of late on the subject, that I should merely
tantalize you if I attempted to relate them.
Besides
,
in a painful and full confession (which you
will find much of this to be), it conduces to truth,
and an unvarnished statement of facts, to record
them in the closet. It then seems that if we set
down aught in extenuation, we lie to the great
Searcher of hearts himself.' She then presented
to me a roll of manuscript.
VOL. II.L
On taking it, I said, `It shall be read and
pondered
upon under the same solemn scrutiny. My
eyes shall not know rest until they have devoured
the contents of these pages; but I know full well
that my heart will rest as well thereafter as it can
do, until it receives its final blessing or quietus in
this life.'
I did not need a second invitation to my
quarters
for the night; but requesting the servant to
supply me with an additional candle, greedily
devoured
what you will find I have transcribed for
you.
V. Chevillere
.
CHAPTER X.
Narrative of Miss St. Clair.
My
grandfather, Holcomb St. Clair, settled
about the year 17, where the town of H
in this state now stands. He had two sons,
Holcomb
and Howard, the latter of whom was my
father. At the time of this settlement they were
mere children. Adjoining his lands lived a Mr.
Moreton, whose family consisted of a son and two
daughters. Little intercourse had taken place
between
the two families except among the children
at school. When it was determined to lay off a
town at the place before mentioned, it was found,
upon the survey, that a corner of Moreton's land
extended into the very centre of the contemplated
town, and much farther, according to his claims,
than my grandfather was willing to allow. A
deadly animosity and consequent lawsuit arose,
which my grandsire gained. In the mean time,
the town was laid off and grew apace.
All the little intercourse between the families
was now broken off, and the separation extended
to the children at school, with the exception of my
uncle Holcomb, a precocious boy, and Moreton's
eldest daughter, who was then a beautiful little
girl. Thus were the two families situated at the
beginning of the revolutionary war. My
grandfather
espoused the republican cause, and accepted
a commission in the army: while his persevering
enemy took the opposite side. Whether his
enmity
to my grandfather had any thing to do with
his determination, I will not undertake to say.
During the progress of the war, owing to some
reports of my grandfather to the commander of the
American army, Mr. Moreton and his family left
the neighbourhood, and soon after sailed for
England
.
Nothing more was heard of the Moretons
till long after the recognition of American
Independence
by the mother country, when Moreton
and his family returned to their former mansion.
His daughters were now both nearly grown, and
the eldest, a fair and accomplished young lady.
My uncle, Holcomb St. Clair, who was much older
than my father, and who had now almost arrived
at man's estate, from all that I can learn, in nowise
participated in the feelings of his father, at least
towards one member of the Moreton familyI
mean the eldest daughter. Indeed, tradition says
that the young people found frequent opportunities
of meeting, were devotedly attached to each other,
and had resolved to be married when Holcomb
became
of age, in spite of all opposition.
At length, that time arrived. Young Holcomb
was twenty-one. He sought his father and made
known to him the state of his affections. In vain
did he plead that their attachment was prior to the
family feud; the old gentleman was inexorable;
he next boldly presented himself before the lady's
father, and asked his consent, declaring that he
would marry her without the permission of his
own parents, provided Mr. Moreton yielded. He
however was more resolved against the match
than my grandfather, and forbade his daughter
ever afterward to hold communication with
Holcomb
,
by letter or otherwise. Nevertheless, the
young lovers found frequent opportunities of
meeting
,
at the house of a former domestic, who lived
on the land of Mr. Moreton. At this place many
interviews took place, and at length a runaway
match was concluded upon.
Neither of the pair possessed a dollar,
independent
of their parents, and they doubtless would
have been in the greatest distress if their designs
had been accomplished: but these very oversights
of the young people were deeply pondered upon
by the nurse, at whose house they met, and who
had a most parental regard for the young lady.
Her mind was greatly moved by seeing, as she
thought, a little farther ahead than the lovers. She
accordingly sought an interview with my uncle,
soon after his separation from his betrothed bride,
and asked him plainly to unfold to her his prospects
after marriage, and his future means of living.
As it may be readily supposed, his answers were
not very satisfactory to the anxious nurse. On
her way home, and while she was deeply musing
upon the melancholy prospects which awaited the
L 2
young people, she accidentally encountered her
patron, landlord, and former master, and out of
pure devotion to the real interests of the young
lady, as she supposed, divulged the whole plot.
Mr. Moreton kept his secret for the time within
his own breast, but at length the night arrived for
the elopement. My uncle was at the appointed
rendezvous with the horses, waiting as patiently
as could be expected, until the time appointed
for setting off had some time elapsed, when he
began to grow uneasy at the non-appearance of
his bride. Two hours had gone by, and yet no
trembling damsel greeted his longing eyes.
Mid-night
found him still waiting and chafing under the
appointed oaks. At length, leaving his horses
under the care of his trusty servant, he resolved
to reconnoitre the premises of the hostile father.
Around the mansion of the Moretons the
quietness
of death reigned; not a living being was to
be seen except the dogs, and the agricultural
animals
which were quietly grazing over the green
in the still moonlight. At length he retired to his
own quarters totally discomfited, and at a loss to
account for the want of punctuality in the lady,
when all things around her father's mansion seemed,
to his observation, to have been so propitious to
their designs.
The next day found him without his having
closed his eyelids, and in no enviable state of mind.
Again he made his observations, and yet the same
quiet prevailed. Every thing seemed to be moving
on at the usual rate of country life and occupations.
He was now completely at a loss to account for his
disappointment in any other way than that which
is usually the last for an ardent lover to adopt
namely, the inability of his mistress. And before
he was willing to admit a possibility of this, he
proceeded
to the cottage of the nurse, calculating with
great certainty to find some letter or message,
giving
some explanation of the mystery. But when
he arrived at the cottage, the door and rude
shutters
were closed; a thing so uncommon, except on
Sundays, that he was struck with dismay and
undefined
alarm. He knocked and stamped, but all
in vain. The next day, and the next, his visits to
the cottage were repeated with the same results;
and he now became almost maddened by suspense
and fear.
He watched Moreton's domestics, in hopes to
bride some of them to a disclosure of the
proceedings
within the mysterious house, as he now began
to consider it, but no opportunity offered. At
length the long wished-for Sabbath arrived.
Knowing
that both the Moreton family and the nurse
were constant attendants at the village church, he
repaired thither, with throbbing pulses and an
aching
heart, in hopes, at least, to catch some stolen
and consolatory glance from his adored mistress;
or, at least, to gain intelligence from the nurse, as
to the cause of her unusual absence from her
ancient
and much loved home. The bell was now
ringing, and the people of the village and the
country around were pouring in from all quarters;
and with them, at length, came the carriage of the
Moretons. His eyes were now riveted to the
spot, in hopes to see his betrothed descend as usual.
First came the old gentleman, then his proud lady,
and lastly, the younger daughter: and then the
steps were put up, and the carriage drove away.
These movements he had watched from his
position
in the church; and long did his eyes remain
gazing upon the spot from which the carriage had
driven, until they were rapidly turned to the seat in
the gallery where the old nurse usually sat; there
also he was doomed to disappointmentthe seat
was vacant.
Seizing his hat, he rushed out of the church, and
over the stile like a maniac; leaving my
grandfather
and grandmother completely astounded at
his rude behaviour. From the church he ran to
the house of the Moretons, being at least a mile;
and bursting into the first door he came to,
demanded
of the astounded domestic to see Miss
Catharine instantly.
Lord bless you, sir! Miss Catharine's
half-way
to England by this time!
To England! cried my uncle, as he fell
upon the floor in uncontrolled agony.
When he had recovered himself, and reflected
for a moment, he composed his features, and
enjoined
upon the two domestics (enforcing his
request
in the usual way) not to mention his visit.
After ascertaining that Catharine was
accompanied
by her brother and the nurse, and that they
had set off for the city of New-York on the very
night intended for the elopement, he rapidly
retraced
his steps to the church, and arrived there in
time to be seen quietly reposing under one of the
trees surrounding it, both by his own and the
Moreton family; leaving it to be supposed by them,
that sudden indisposition was the cause of his
abrupt
exit. On the next morning, while his father's
family were yet ignorant of most of the foregoing
circumstances, he requested a private audience of
my grandfather. The old gentleman was just
about to take his usual ride round the farm on
horseback, and requested Holcomb to order his
horse and join him. At dinner, the old gentleman
announced to the family that Holcomb would set
out next morning for the city of New-York;
whence, after certain necessary preparations, he
would continue his journey through the middle and
southern States. He seemed more than ordinarily
pleased at his son's determination; thinking, no
doubt, all the while, that it proceeded from a
laudable
desire to wean himself from his unfortunate
attachment, and a judicious wish, at the same time,
to see his countrymen and improve his mind.
Some weeks after my uncle's departure for the
city, my grandfather accidentally heard that
Holcomb
had sailed for England immediately on his
arrival at New-York. And this piece of bad news
seemed but the commencement of an unparalleled
series of disasters. Next came the news of the
lady's having preceded my uncle: then the more
dreadful tidings of the loss of the vessel in which
the latter had sailed, every individual on board
having perished, except the captain and one or two
seamen.
My grandfather was now almost heartbroken,
and his greatest enemy little better; for it was
soon ascertained that the blooming and beautiful
Catharine was in a rapid decline. Then came the
news of her death, and lastly her mortal remains,
to be deposited in the village burying-ground.
Thus, in the short space of one year, were these
obstinate parents brought to lament, each for the
loss of a favourite child.
But their individual and family griefs by no
means softened their hearts towards each other.
So far from it, each acted towards the other with
renewed hostility, seeming as if he attributed the
loss to his enemy.
These wounds were just beginning to be
cicatrized
by the lapse of some few years, when, on a
beautiful Sunday morning, the Moreton family
were astonished, on coming into the churchyard
(which was also the burying-ground), to see a
chaste and elegant monument erected over the
grave of their lamented daughter, with this simple
inscription:
BENEATH THIS STONE IS THE GRAVE OF
CATHARINE MORETON.
Every person in the churchyard had very
naturally
supposed that it was erected by her parents.
The latter, however, were dumb with
astonishment
.
An inquiry was immediately set on foot to
ascertain who had interfered (as the old Mr.
Moreton
complained) with his private grief; but no clew
could be discovered to the mystery: and finally
the subject died away, and was never afterward
renewed, except when a stranger visited the
village
,
and was desirous to see the curiosities of the
place, among which the mysterious tomb was sure
to be the first.
There was one small yet singular circumstance
connected with this tomb. At the corner where
the name of the maker is usually inscribed, there
was an anchor very legibly cut into the marble,
without the sculptor's name. In a few years the
memory of my uncle Holcomb and his unfortunate
love was swept into that eternal sleep of oblivion,
which had before engulfed a million of
heart-rending
tales, and which stands ready to bury all
the sufferings of their successors.
CHAPTER XI.
Some
years after the circumstances
related
in the foregoing pages, when many of the
persons to whom they were known had sunk to
rest for ever,when Mr. Moreton and my
grandfather
had both paid the last debt of nature, and
taken final leave of their earthly animosities,
when my father had grown to man's estate, and
been married some time,when I was a little girl
just beginning to run about my father's house,
there appeared one day at the village tavern a
pedestrian traveller, who excited little more notice
at the time than such travellers usually do. He
attended worship on Sundays in the only church
in the place, being the one so often before
mentioned
;
with this solitary exception, he kept
himself
secluded, and seemed desirous to make no
acquaintances
.
He traversed the hills and dales
through the neighbourhood with the zeal of a
geologist
,
and seemed altogether quite domesticated
at the village inn. At length it was announced in
the village newspaper that the estate of the
Moretons
was for sale; the younger Moreton
announcing
in the advertisement that he was desirous
of emigrating to the west. The day of sale arrived,
when, to the amazement of all, the pedestrian of
the inn became the purchaser. Few people
believed
him able to comply with the terms, until he
actually paid the money.
The Moretons moved away to the far west, and
nothing more was heard of them at that time.
The mansion-house of the family, which had so
long rivalled my grandfather's in their pride and
their pretensions, was at length closed for ever,
and its classic columns and architectural device
were destined to sink into ruins, overrun by those
vines and flowers which were once obedient to
the training of many a fair hand. The farm was
let out in small parcels to the poorest people in
the neighbourhood, and, with exceptions to fixtures
and improvements to the land, at a mere nominal
rent. This strange and unaccountable being at
length paid my father a visit. He was an old
bachelor, apparently about fifty-five or sixty years
of age; a full, round-chested man, with dark hazel
eyes. He wore a black wig, though it was easy
to be seen that his hair had originally been light
brown. His complexion was between a bilious
and a cadaverous hue, which, with his great
corporeal
bulk, gave him an appearance of unsound
health. He was sad and even melancholy in his
temperament; but abstemious in his habits, and
as generous as a prince in his disposition. He
was remarkably fond of children; at least he
showed great fondness for me, and took great
delight
in directing my youthful lessons.
Thus were things moving on in the
neighbourhood
VOL. II.M
of the village of H, when, on a stormy
and terrible night, a messenger arrived with a
summons
to the dying bed of Mr. Thornton, as the
old bachelor was called, and my father
immediately
obeyed the call. The next morning he
returned
unusually dejected, which was accounted
for, in some measure, by informing my mother of
the death of Mr. Thornton; but the sadness lasted
much longer, and seemed to be much more
profound
in its nature than was called for by the death
of a mere stranger. Our family attended the
funeral, which, for a time, closed all further
particulars
relating to this narrative.
CHAPTER
XII
.
Mr. Chevillere
will perceive that I have
merely sketched a long train of circumstances
connected with our family history; but I hope I
have said enough to enable him to understand what
I have now to relate, more immediately concerning
myself. He will, in due time, perceive that the
circumstances already glanced at had a powerful
and unfortunate influence upon my destiny.
With the exception of the death of my
grandmother
,
nothing remarkable occurred between the
time just spoken of and my thirteenth year. My
childhood was happy and unclouded; and the
attention
bestowed upon my mental cultivation was
such as might have been expected from devoted
and intelligent parents towards an only child; and
my improvement by their instructions was such as,
at least, to satisfy their partial judgment.
Those happy days were destined too soon to
endtoo soon it was thought that I was old enough
to improve under other and less kind and blinded
instructerstoo soon it was determined that I
must leave the dear home of my youth, the society
of my parents, and the scenes of my childish
rambles
.
Oh! how little do we know the value of the
wild, gay, irresponsible happiness of childhood, until
we look back upon it from after years. Already,
young as I am, I have often to recur to memory's
stores in order to seek consolation from the past
for the unutterable sufferings of the present. It
was determined that I must now be sent to a
boarding-school in the city of New-York. This
gave me much pleasure in prospect, so long as the
day of separation from my parents was at a
distance
.
The idea of a boarding-school in a large
city is pleasing to a gay and thoughtless girl; and
doubtless, under ordinary circumstances, it is the
source of much innocent delight. It is in such
places that we form the dear friendships which are
to endure, at least in memory, for a life-time. If
the persons of our friends pass away, they still
remain with us in spirit; and the scenes and
enjoyments
of younger life will sometimes, upon the
casual touching of a chord, rush back upon us with
a melancholy which, though desirable, is
over-whelming
and even suffocating. The term seems
to me peculiarly adapted to that singular
oppression
of the soul which only the female heart
endures
.
But I was speaking of more pleasing
anticipations
:
these were but too free and buoyant;
and therein, perhaps, was laid the foundation of all
my after sorrows. The day of my departure soon
arrived, when all my pleasing anticipations were
turned into weeping and sorrow. Something
inexpressible
seemed to burden my heart upon this
first separation from my mother. Whether it is a
usual thing with our sex on such occasions, or
whether it was a more especial presentiment of
coming evil in my particular case, I do not know.
Certain I am, that I had never experienced any
thing like it before; and what seems peculiarly
strange to me now is, that the undefined sufferings
of that hour were very like those which oppressed
me under the real misfortunes of which they could
only have been the foregoing shadows. There
was really an identity in the miserable feelings
attendant upon the two occasions. This may
appear
like folly: but, certainly, every one who has
suffered at all can recur to each link in the gloomy
chain, as particularly as we can travel back over
the identical feelings of by-gone enjoyments.
These are not the associations of the moment only,
but specific and peculiar sufferings related to the
cause, and even existing when the mind is
abstracted
from all surrounding objects. And these
same nightmare feelings will arise again and again
over the heart, when we are least expecting them.
Sometimes, in the gay and joyous hour, they have
come over me like a horrible dream, in exactly the
same gloomy hues and colours in which they first
presented themselves.
I have dwelt upon this presentiment a moment,
because it seems to me that there was something
peculiar in its first appearance; as I was but a
child of thirteen, and had never felt more mental
suffering than a moment's childish vexation. These
were entirely new feelings, totally unconnected
with my past experience at that time: how far
M 2
they were connected with that which was to come,
I leave others to judge for me.
At length I parted with all those most dear to
me upon earth except my father, who accompanied
me. And here I may remark, that however
peculiar
and poignant were my feelings of the parting
hour, they were of short duration. One night's
sleep, away from home, effected the cure; all was
forgotten, and my gay anticipations returned. I
began already to select play-fellows and intimates
from the crowd with which my imagination peopled
the boarding-school. My plans were all arranged,
dresses bought, and books selected.
Having parted from my father, a new life opened
upon me, entirely different from any thing I had
before experienced. I was now placed with girls
near my own age, in that little epitome of the
female
world called a select boarding-school. Here
I found, for the first time, the pleasures of congenial
intimacy with beings of my own age, and the pains
of envy, jealousy, rivalry, and all the meaner
passions
.
The love of admiration is a singular passion in
girls so young; I say singular, because it is a
general
,
undefined, impracticable feeling, having no
ultimate object; a strange, fluttering, wild emotion,
which is seldom analyzed by those who are under
its influence. Indeed I doubt whether it could
exist in a person who had judgment enough to
know exactly its origin, support, and end.
A boarding-school is a very hot-bed for this
tumultuous
feeling, as it exists primitively, and many
of the seemingly whimsical actions and flighty
speeches of very young girls, under such
circumstances
,
may be traced to it as their source.
There is one radical error of all girls at that age,
which, it seems to me, may be the nucleus of this
feeling. It is the dread of being overlooked in the
human crowda fear that our virtues, our
beauties
,
our accomplishments, or our intelligence, may
be slighted. We cannot easily discern that the
very efforts which we make to distinguish
ourselves
from the common multitude, tend but the
more forcibly to stamp us of the commonest
material
of the number, and that the method best
calculated
to elevate us above the mass, is to seek
deeper retirement in that oblivion which we then
most dread. This grand mistake, it seems to me,
has its origin likewise in a preceding error, with
regard to those qualities which the other sex most
admire in us. How can a girl, without experience,
ascertain, at the very threshold of life, that retiring
modesty, that seemingly negative virtue, is the
index by which all others are supposed to be
fore-told
;
how can she possess by intuition, that which
is nothing less than the grand result of all female
education, experience, and accomplishment? True,
there is a native modesty in most young girls,
whose infantile education has been parental; but
this is more properly called bashfulness, and may
be allied with many reprehensible qualities, and
of itself requires discriminating cultivation. There
is a great difference between native bashfulness
and that self-possessed modesty, which can never
be attained but through the influence of good sense
in the pupil, and discriminating judgment in the
parent or teacher.
It must not be supposed for a moment, that the
cultivated humility of which I speak, is the same
which many intriguing mothers and chaperones
inculcate upon their daughters and proteges.
These cunning instructers only enforce the
imitation
;
I am speaking of the genuine principle and
feeling; and I dwell upon these things the more
diffusely, because much of my after unhappiness
was owing to a neglect of them, as I am sorry
to add, they are too often overlooked in similar
institutions. It may seem that I speak too openly
of the failings of my sex, when I detail the progress
of the desire for admiration, and take it for granted
that it is a feeling common to all; but it must be
recollected that I speak of the secret motives of
action in females of my own age at that time, not
of the disgusting exhibitions of the passions which
are too often to be met with in forward and
uncultivated
young ladies. I speak of it when it is
not directly perceptible to any but a discerning
mind; when it displays itself not so much by direct
and unwomanly advances, as by whimsical actions
and foolish conversation. How often do we hear it
said of girls, at about the age of fourteen, that they
are light-headed and flighty. This is nothing
more than the secret working of the desire for
admiration
,
and the fear of not receiving it. This
may seem a humiliating exposure of secret female
motives, and so it would be, if I were speaking of
those whose characters are formed; but it is not
so. I refer to the feelings of myself and my
associates
at the most interesting period of female
education
;
and I consider it by no means humiliating
to my sex in general, to expose feelings, which in
their rude and natural state, are disgusting to a
refined mind, but which, judiciously cultivated and
guided, give origin to most of the social happiness
of our race.
It will be perceived that the school into which I
was now introduced, like all others of its kind, was
a nursery for the growth and nurture of many other
things than those which were formally put forth to
the world as the regular routine: these indeed
form but a small part of boarding-school education.
Young ladies are there, for the first time, thrown
into a community of their own age, sex, feeling,
and prospects; for the first time cut off from the
restraints of affectionate parental authority, and
subjected to that which is formal, indiscriminating,
and too often, ludicrous. The consequence is, that
there is soon established a little republic of feeling,
which is ruled by a tacit under-authority among
pupils themselves. These develop similar passions
and feelings to those which we experience in the
world; female ambition, rivalry, jealousy, hatred,
revenge, and all the little wars and contests to
which they give rise.
For the first year there were no occurrences of
an unusual character besides these developments;
at all events, none connected with those events
which I have undertaken impartially to relate.
Twice a year I was allowed to visit my father's
house, and always with renewed delight; fierce as
our little contests sometimes were at school, they
were all forgotten when the parting hour came at
the end of the session; plentiful showers of tears
washed away every vestige of bitter feeling; and
we returned, at the commencement of the next
session, with open arms for every one, like dear
friends who had long been parted; but soon again
we were divided into our little factions, each one
with her favourites.
CHAPTER
XIII
.
When
I was about fifteen years old, and had
been at school nearly two years, I received
permission
from my father to attend a riding-school
in the city, at which some of the more advanced
girls had already been attending. Among these
were most of my intimate associates, some of
whom resided in the city, and of course did not
sleep at the school. Of the latter number was my
dear and valued friend, Isabel Hazlehurst. When
we had been at riding-school some time, Isabel and
I were pronounced sufficiently secure in our seats
to ride out into the country. One Saturday
afternoon
,
when I was spending the day with my friend,
a riding-party was proposed and soon made up,
consisting entirely of the girls of our school, and
escorted by Isabel's brother and several other
young gentleman, most of whom had sisters of the
party. When we had proceeded safely for several
miles, and timidity and caution began to give way
to our usual wild mirth, the horse on which Isabel
rode became all at once very restless and
unmanageable
;
this soon startled mine, which was the
most restive and mettlesome of the whole. All
my endeavours to quiet and pacify him were
fruitless
;
the nearer Isabel or one of the gentlemen
endeavoured to approach, the worse he became,
until he was at length fairly at the top of his
speed. I scarcely recollect what happened
afterward
,
until I found myself lying on the road-side,
and all the party standing around, frightened almost
out of their senses. When I became able to sit
up and look more freely about me, I found a
gentleman
added to the party, and then began to have
some confused recollection of a person galloping
by my side. The truth of the matter was, that
the gentleman mentioned was riding along the
avenue, in a direction to meet us, when he
discovered
my horse to be beyond my control, and saw
that the efforts of our escorts to overtake him
only made him fly the faster. With admirable
address and presence of mind, he wheeled his
horse, and began to canter in the same direction
with us until my horse came up with his, when he
seized the bridle without suddenly checking him,
and would have skilfully graduated his movements
to our usual gait, had he not discovered me falling,
when, seizing me and drawing me from the saddle,
by means of a movement between a jump and a
fall, we came to the ground together, without my
receiving, however, the slightest injury, and with
only a slight bruise on his part.
As soon as he saw that I had recovered my
bewildered
senses, he sprang upon his horse and was
out of hearing in an instant, before any one had
asked his name or address, or even thanked him
for his interference; all were so much interested
to know whether I was seriously hurt, that no one
thought of it until it was too late: I was much
chagrined, but there was no remedy. A carriage
was soon procured, and Isabel and I were safely
conveyed to Mr. Hazlehurst's. This was the last
of our equestrian expeditions beyond the limits of
the riding-school grounds.
On the Monday following our excursion, as I
was sitting intently engaged upon a piece of
painting
in a front apartment of the school, a
fashionable
vehicle drove up to the door. Most of the
younger misses (as was usual) ran to the window
to see whose friend or relation had arrived.
Immediately
was heard the exclamation, Oh! what
an elegant young gentleman! What a beautiful
carriage! I, too, ran to the window now, with
the others who were crowding around; but the
gentleman had descended, and was ringing at the
door before I arrived. We were all soon seated
and waiting with breathless expectation, fluttering
hearts, and eyes cast towards the door, to see who
would be called down into the parlour. One said,
'Tis my brother! another, 'Tis my cousin!
At length the formal old house-servant opened the
door, and exclaimed, in her usual drawl, Miss St.
Clair is wanted in the parlour. I went down
with fear and trembling, which was little
tranquillized
when I pushed open the door and discovered
the handsome horseman of our riding adventure,
sitting in conversation with the schoolmistress,
with great case and familiarity, and apparently
VOL. II.N
answering inquiries about some person who was
mutually known to them.
My dear (the mistress's usual salutation
before
company
), this is Mr. Sandford, a friend of your
father's, whom he has directed me to introduce to
you, in order that he may inform them at home of
your health, and the progress of your studies. I
made a desperate effort at conversation, in order
to occupy the time until the mistress should be
called out for a moment, lest he should suddenly
introduce our surreptitious and disastrous ride
before
her; out it came, nevertheless, in spite of all
my shallow cunning. Certainly I cannot be
mistaken
in supposing Miss St. Clair to be the same
lady whom I was so fortunate as to assist, the day
before yesterday, in alighting from her horse? I
hung my head and blushed like a culprit, or looked
guilty as I really felt; when the mistress, holding
up her finger, exclaimed, Ah! you naughty girls.
I suspected something was in the wind, from so
many of you going to Hazlehurst's together,
contrary
to the custom. But it is useless to dwell on
this particular visit, and every word that passed at
it, for it was succeeded by many others, until I
became the envy of the whole school.
But how shall I describe Mr. Sandford to you,
so that you will understand his difficult character
thoroughly? As to his external appearance, there
is no difficulty. He was a tall, fashionable, sandy
haired gentleman, with a sanguine complexion,
eyes between gray and blue, teeth perfect and
white; lips thin and compressed; rather large
fox-coloured, fashionable whiskers, extending down
under the chin; cheeks, lips, forehead, and ears
were all of the same florid colour. In his address
he showed evidently that he had seen much good
company; his speech was rather slow, deliberate,
and inclined to pomposity. He had been educated
at one of the eastern colleges, and my father
mentioned
in his letter, that he had been always
distinguished
in his classes. His address to females
was rather calculated to please a mixed collection
of young girls, than a select company of educated
ladies, his discourse consisting chiefly of badinage,
and a kind of conversational satire upon every
passing circumstance and object. Since I have
reflected upon his character, I can account for
many things, which at that time made only an
evanescent impression. Though he was peculiarly
gentle and persuasive in his manners, these
qualities
did not originate in the heart. He was
courteous
from selfish motives, rather than polite from
benevolence; he suited himself to the cast of our
girlish society; yet his courtesy would have been
an insult to our understanding, if we had
understood
it at that time as I do now. To me he was
peculiarly attentive and polite, in the usual
acceptation
of the words; yet I was neither entertained
nor improved by his conversations. Not that I
thought or felt his attentions disagreeable to me at
that time; far from it; I considered myself under
obligations to him, to a romantic extent, perhaps,
and the failure of our conversations I attributed
rather to my own want of tact and information,
more especially as he sometimes introduced subjects
with which I was entirely unacquainted, and
seemingly
dropped them again, and resumed the
common-place
,
in pity or charity to my youth or
ignorance
.
Such was my interpretation at that time;
it is very different now.
He was undoubtedly a man of good sense and
education, and I was as certainly pleased and
flattered by his attentions. He affected poetry,
and here again he threw me in the background,
not because I had not really a soul capable of
poetic feelings, but because his exhibitions were
too classically refined for my obtuseness; I rather
dreaded the stores of his head, than sympathized
with the feelings which he affected. Now the
truth is, he had not one particle of poetry in his
composition. He no doubt thought otherwise, and
his associates and preceptors may have thought so
too. I did not discern this by intuition, but from
a thorough study and experience of his character,
under circumstances well calculated to develop
the secret motives of the heart, which will soon
appear.
He was full of anecdotes, which were lavishly
told among, and much enjoyed and laughed at by,
the girls; but there was a sneer upon his nose and
upper lip, even when he joined in the laugh at his
own stories, as if they were told for our
amusement
solely, and thrown humanely down to us
rather than contributed as his share of the mutual
entertainment. He never listened to the
conversation
or anecdotes of others with the feelings of
the heart attuned properly to the social pitch; he
gave his attention as a kind of conventional and
fashionable duty. In short, he had an utterly
contemptuous
opinion of the understanding of our sex,
and one as much too exalted of his own. He had
been cried up for a genius at school, because he
was successful in getting his lessons, until he
believed it. The truth is, he had no genius, although
he was not without good sense, as I have already
said, when it could be brought to bear uninfluenced
by his contempt for others, or admiration of
himself
.
He was supremely selfish. He could not
laugh, any more than he could listen, with the heart.
His mirth was forced. Even when he laughed at
his own stories, he would pull the lower part of his
ear with each motion of the chest, or place a finger
beside his nose, in such a way as seemed to me
at that time droll and expressive, but which I now
know proceeded from a contempt for the
understanding
of his hearers. I have learned to attach
some importance to these things. For instance,
since I have detected the heartlessness of one
through these little tokens,laughter among the
rest,I now habitually observe people when they
give way to their feelings. If I see a man
laughing
now with the same spirit that he would join
in a chorus, I cannot keep my eyes from him, so
deeply has my experience in one case affected the
N 2
general current of my thoughts. But perhaps I
anticipate, for it must be recollected that my
impressions
at the time I have been speaking of were
very different from the results of my subsequent
mature and painful reflections. Mr. Sandford
appeared
to me to be an elegant and accomplished
young gentleman; and I was flattered by his
attentions
,
because they seemed to be highly estimated
by my thoughtless associates.
At length, after repeating his visits to the school
as often as it was proper for my father's most
intimate
friends to do, he called for the last time to
take leave of me, and be the bearer of my letters.
These I gave him, with many verbal messages for
my friends in the country, and then shook hands
with him, and was about to run away. But he
detained me a moment, as no one was present, and
said that he hoped again to enjoy the pleasure of
my society at H, where my father then lived,
as soon as the session should be ended. There was
something sly and peculiar in his way of saying
such things; something that seemed to imply that
he knew more than I did, or had a secret worth
knowing, of which I would like to be a partaker.
However, we parted with a slight fluttering on my
part, the result of novelty; for I can truly say, as
far as first impressions were concerned, that I was
as free from any thing like being in love with him
at first sight as might be. I may have received
pleasure from having a handsome, rich, and
fashionable
suitor; but I had no feelings personally
favourable
to Mr. Sandford.
After his departure, I was as calm and unmoved
as if he had never made his appearance, except
when the girls teased me about my handsome lover;
and then the only effect was a little excitement,
having more relation to them than to him. But I
was surprised, not long afterward, to receive a
most inquisitive letter from my mother, asking
particularly what I thought of
my father's friend
,
Mr. Sandford; and, not answering it as promptly
as I ought to have done, I soon received another
from my father, on the same subject. These
surprised
me very much; because I never imagined
for a moment that they took any interest in our
girlish notions of beaux; and as to any serious
thought of marriage, it had never entered my head,
except in the same manner in which we think of
death. I thought of it only as a thing to happen, if
at all, at some far, far distant day.
CHAPTER
XIV
.
When
I returned home during the vacation,
which succeeded the events just related, I found
Mr. Sandford completely domesticated at my
father's house; and what appeared still more
strange to me, there appeared to be some subject
of secret conference, but of primary and
engrossing
interest, between this comparative stranger
and my father: whatever it might be, it was
studiously
concealed from the rest of the family.
This course was so different from my father's
usually
confidential
and unrestrained intercourse
with his own family, that it excited my surprise;
but in no way shook my confidence in him or his
new friend. My curiosity was excited to find out
the subject of these long and secret conferences.
It was not that restless, feverish, morbid curiosity
with which our sex is so generally charged; but
one partly founded upon selfish feelings, and partly
proceeding from a laudable anxiety for the welfare
of us all.
But to proceed with my story; I found Mr.
Sandford, under my father's calm, penetrating eye,
a gentleman more to my taste than I had before
seen him. He had doffed much of the city gallant,
that had been visible when I last saw him; yet was
still far from a plain, unaffected country
gentleman
;
and he suffered no opportunity of displaying
himself to escape. Yet he was not disgustingly
ostentatious, for there was much good taste in
every thing he did; his errors lay in the motives,
and not in the manner of his actions. This
combination
of good sense, taste, and fine education,
without principles, is perhaps one of the most
dangerous
assailants to female happiness which it has
ever been my misfortune to contemplate. Almost
every one of my sex would do as I did; look to
the effects, not to the secret motivesto the
actions
,
not the principlesand to the
accomplishments
,
rather than the morals of a suitor.
Mr. Sandford took an early opportunity to show
me that his acquisitions were not confined to the
classical refinements of the school. He seemed to
have studied mankind in the true spirit of
Chester-field
,
and to have devoted much time to the
cultivation
of the lighter personal accomplishments.
When we all felt ourselves a little accustomed to
our new state of society at home, he began
gradually
to unfold these stores in reserve; and I found
that he danced, and sang, and performed on several
musical instruments with taste and skill. These
graces were, of course, exhibited by the accident
of
design
, and with the most refined
nonchalance;
seeming rather to despise them as trifles, and yet
to think no gentleman could do without them.
As I was seated, one day, upon the green, in the
grove behind the mansion-house at H, he
suddenly
made his appearance; and seizing my hand,
avowed himself my most ardent and enthusiastic
admirer. I mention this circumstance because the
first seeds of a suspicion, that much of it was
lip-service
,
were at this time first sown; not that I
threw his hand from me and turned away in
disgust
;
for the suspicion of which I speak was
scarcely known at that time to myself. If I had
taken myself to account, I might, indeed, have
found it; but it was one of those singular
impressions
which spring up in the mind nearly
unobserved
,
and yet influence every action of
importance
;
first, scarcely operating on the conduct at
all, but in the end affecting it decidedly. This
produces
a reaction, then the opposite state of
unsuspiciousness
,
and so on, from one extreme to the
other, until the mind becomes settled in permanent
confidence or distrust.
At the time alluded to, this suspicion was nothing
more than a flash across the mental vision, and in
nowise operated upon my conduct; for to tell the
truth, I was still under the dominion of those same
girlish feelings with which I had first seen Mr.
Sandford; and I suppose that the pleasure of the
avowal was but too visible in my countenance, for
when we had concluded our interview, which it is
not necessary to describe more particularly, he
was referred to my father. As I had expected,
my father had but one objectionmy age. He
gave his consent readily, provided Mr. Sandford
would wait until I had spent one more year at
school; this was also in accordance with my
feelings
,
for I could not bear even then to contemplate
marriage immediately before me. Not so my
suitor; he became urgent with my father, and
absolutely
tiresome to me, with eternally harping
upon the same subject, and that too after the most
unanswerable reasons had been assigned by the
family, and reiterated by me.
As I was sitting one night, while matters were
in this state, in a little arbour in a secluded corner
of our garden, from which there was but one way
of egress, two persons approached and seated
themselves on a bench immediately outside of the
entrance. It was about nine o'clock on a dark
night, and the distance to the house so great that
the inmates could not have heard me if I had called
with all the power of my voice. Under these
circumstances
,
I sat trembling, while the two (men
they seemed to be) began a conversation in an
under tone of voice. I instantly concluded one of
them to be Mr. Sandford, and was soon confirmed
in that opinion, by ascertaining the subject of their
conversation to be the postponing of the marriage.
His companion seemed to be deeply chagrined,
and honoured me with several not very flattering
epithets, such as minx, obstinate, and provoking
devil; and I often, during the interview, heard
exclamations
which were not so intelligible; as, for
example, was any thing ever so unlucky? and
yet it seems reasonable! Ah, there's the difficulty
of the case.
I was utterly at a loss to conceive how the
post-ponement
of the marriage could be so unlucky to
any other than Mr. Sandford. He was evidently
young; a year could not greatly affect his
fortunes
;
and as to the fortunes of any other, they
could have nothing to do with our marriage. Such
was the tenor of my reflections, as I slowly walked
towards the house after their departure, and
meditated
upon the singularity of what I had seen and
heard. I could not in any way account for Mr.
Sandford's seeing this intimate of his so
clandes-tinely
.
Why, thought I, does he not introduce
him to the family? But the thought of there being
a propriety in my communicating the circumstance
to my father never entered my head, and I finally
almost ceased to remember it; I was nevertheless
resolved, without exactly knowing why, to delay
the marriage at least for the year stipulated.
I was now under an engagement to be married
in one year, and the period was to be spent in the
city, in the completion of my very imperfect
education
.
Soon afterward I took leave of my father
and mother and my affianced husband, with the
usual feelings of deep and momentary suffering
with regard to the former, but with little sensation of
any kind towards the latter; as long as the marriage
could be contemplated at the distance of a whole
year (a little lifetime in a young girl's estimation),
I was contented and thoughtlessly happy. But
this long, long year produced wonderful changes
in my views of things. Towards the end of the
time, I began to dread and tremble whenever I
contemplated the marriage immediately before me.
I had now begun to form more consistent pictures
of my own future. My imagination painted such
a husband as I could fancy, and in very different
colours from any in which I had ever seen Mr.
Sandford; the first time I compared the two
beings
the
one of my imagination and the other my
real and affianced husband, was one evening when
with Isabel Hazlehurst. We were indulging our
young hearts, in building gay and dreamy castles
in the air; but the instant afterward, when my
engagement came to my recollection, I was truly
miserable. In fact, I did not love Mr. Sandford;
nay more, he was now disagreeable to me; while
I had viewed the completion of the engagement at
a distance, and had never pictured in my
imagination
a rival to that gentleman, I was perfectly
indifferent
on the subject; I loathed the thoughts of
the marriage, and hated Mr. Sandford because, I
suppose, he interfered with my new fancies.
After reflecting and enduring this state of mind
for some weeks, I resolved to break the subject to
Isabel Hazlehurst, and to ask her advice.
Accordingly
,
having given her the history of Mr.
Sandford
,
as far as I knew it myself, and confided to
her all my secret feelings, both past and present, I
asked her advice; such are the beginnings of
female
intimacies. Isabel counselled that I should
inform Mr. Sandford, as soon as I could see him,
that I had changed my mind, or rather, that at the
VOL. II.0
time of my engagement, I was too young to have
any mind of my own on the subject; that now my
views were enlarged, and that I felt capable of
judging for myself.
To my father, who, we concluded, was very
anxious for the match, I was to write immediately,
and candidly state my views, past and present;
inform him of the interview which I had overheard
in the garden between Mr. Sandford and his
unknown
friend, and earnestly beg his forgiveness
for my fickleness.
This letter I wrote immediately to my father,
and explained, or rather protested to him, at the
same time, that there was no other suitor present
or in expectation for my hand; that my change of
views was owing solely to my improved
reflection
and more mature age, which, however, was
advanced only some eight or ten months,a little
age of female experience.
CHAPTER
XV
.
Before
time enough had elapsed for me to
receive
an answer to my letter, Mr. Sandford
suddenly
made his appearance at the school, with the
startling and alarming news that my father had
been taken suddenly ill, and it being thought
probable
by his physicians that he would not recover,
he was very desirous to see me before he died. I
was almost heartbroken at this intelligence, and
when I arrived next morning at my father's door,
after riding post-haste nearly all night, I was ready
to sink with fear and confusion, and a rush of
thought connected with my various misfortunes,
which seemed to be accumulating so fast upon me.
I found my father frightfully altered, and too
evidently
near the close of his career; he grasped
my hand convulsively, as he drew me towards him
to receive a melancholy embrace. Oh, Fanny!
said he, your letter was near killing me.
My dear father! did my letter make you ill?
No; I was seized before I received it; but it
was enough to kill me.
Do not say so, dear father; I will do as you
desire; indeed, indeed, I will,after you have
heard all the circumstances.
He motioned with his hand for my mother, Mr.
Sandford, and the nurse, to leave the room.
We were now alone, and he made a sign that I
should be seated. His countenance, now that I
had a good view of it, was indeed terribly altered.
A stroke of the palsy had afflicted half his body,
and one side of his face; one eye was bright and
excited with the pleasure of seeing me, while the
other was dim; the corner of his mouth drawn
down, and all the features on that side relaxed and
cadaverous; it was horrible to look upon! As if
a person, in an awful moment, was making faces
with one half of the countenance, and talking to
you with the other,or playing comedy with one
side and tragedy with the other.
Fanny, said he, I know all the circumstances
far better than you do; Mr. Sandford has
satisfactorily
explained the meeting in the garden to me;
besides, my dear child, I know Mr. Sandford's
whole history, and that of his family before him.
But, my dear papa, I do not love him!
When, my dear Fanny, did you make that
discovery
?
Very lately, sir.
Did you make it alone, or had you some friend
or some book to assist you?
I had indeed a dear friend; but her advice was
sought, not offered.
Ah, I thought so! I knew it. Trust me, my
dear child, that I understand what is good for you
better than yourself. I have studied your
disposition
and that of Mr. Sandford long and closely,
and have deliberately come to the conclusion, that
he is exactly such a prudent, cautious, judicious
young man as I should like to leave my family
with when I am gone; besides, there are other
powerful reasons, which I cannot mention just
now.
But, my dear father, may he not be too cautious
and prudent?
There it is now, exactly as I expected; you
have got your head full of some romantic nonsense
from reading novels in the last year.
Indeed, sir, you wrong me; I have not read a
novel since I left home; they are not permitted to
be brought into the school.
No matter, no matter where you caught the
disease, you have certainly been infected; but time
presses,I feel that I have but a short time to
live,I wish you to decide whether you will marry
the man whom you have chosen, of your own free
will, for your husband; if not, I must go to work
again, and rearrange all my complicated affairs;
but first tell me whether you have seen any other
young gentleman whom you like better?
I have seen no young gentleman whom I
particularly
regard.
Then decide the question with regard to Mr.
Sandford, and I may say with regard to me, too;
for I identify my happiness with his in this case,
and perhaps it is the last which I may enjoy in this
world.
O 2
I threw myself on my knees before him, seized
his hand, and bathed it with tears, for I could
scarcely speak: Oh! my dear father, do not say
so! indeed I cannot marry Mr. Sandford; I will
do any thing else you ask me! I will live single
all my days; I will give up all hopes of fortune;
I will live poor and secluded if you will.
I have none of these to ask, said he, solemnly;
I have made my last and only request, and you
have rejected it; you may leave me.
Oh, my dear father, do not drive me from you
in displeasure, under such dreadful circumstances;
my will is not my own in this case.
Did you not tell me but now, that you had seen
no other young man whom you liked better?
I did, and it is true; and yet I cannot control
my affections.
Enough! you may leave me!
Dear father, do not drive me from you while
under your displeasure; I will be all you desire
me to be in every thing but this.
I have nothing more to say, replied he. Your
whims have thwarted the exertions and designs of
more than one life-time. It is enough; we will
henceforth number it among the things that have
passed away.
Dearest father, do not break my heart by this
cold and settled displeasure. I have never been
voluntarily undutiful till now, and God knows I
would obey you if I could.
Yes, yes; you will obey me in those things
in which it is your pleasure, as well as your duty,
to obey! But you misunderstand me in this case;
I put no commands upon you, nor was it ever my
intention to do so; all I have ever done was for
your good, not mine; now let the subject drop for
ever!
With this he rang the bell, and when the nurse
appeared, he desired the rest of the family to
enter.
From this moment he grew evidently worse; so
that when the physician called again, he was
startled by the change, and again bled him. My
dutiful attentions were offered on every occasion,
but he always appeared scarcely to notice them,
and often, as if by accident, accepted those of Mr.
Sandford; who, to tell the truth, acted upon this
occasion with great tenderness and delicacy, both
towards me and my poor father. This settled and
cold displeasure towards myself, under such
circumstances
,
was maddening; the next morning,
after watching most of the night at his bedside
unnoticed
,
I fell upon my knees, and entreated him
to hear me; he turned his disfigured and wretched
face slowly towards me, and said, Say on; I am
all attention.
Oh, my father! I will marry Mr. Sandford!
Not by my orders, said he, solemnly.
No, my dear father; of my own free will and
choice!
And this is your settled determination; to be
firmly adhered to, whether I live or die?
Yes; I have before Heaven solemnly
promised
,
of my own free will, to marry Mr. Sandford
at any time my dear father may choose to appoint;
whether he lives or dies.
Then you are still my consistent and devoted
child; my dear Fanny, come to my arms. All
my struggles to arrive at this conclusion were
forgotten
in the ecstacy of that embrace; melancholy
it undoubtedly was, but it was necessary, and
dear to my affections. The truth was, I saw,
before
this time, that my father's mind had suffered
much from the peculiar disease with which he was
afflicted, and believing, from what I saw, that his
whole soul had been set upon this union during the
days of his strength, I felt it to be my duty to
make some sacrifice to his happiness in this time
of his weakness; and, to speak the truth fully and
freely, Mr. Sandford's truly delicate conduct
(whether proceeding from cunning or good taste I
will not undertake to say), rather led me to doubt
my observations and consequent suspicions of his
character.
Every face now wore a new aspect; even my
own must have been more cheerful, for I was
before
wretched and miserable; now I had the joy
proceeding from conscious rectitude in my duty to
my poor father. My mother truly sympathized
with all my feelings, and approved my conduct,
though she deplored the necessity.
In a few days my father was able to sit up in
his bed, and in less than two weeks to be rolled
about in a chair with wheels. Though I saw
some of the causes thus removed which had united
to coerce me into the dreaded marriage, yet I was
firm and resolved in my purpose, for I saw that
my father was a mere wreck of his former self, and
that he might, and in all probability would, live
many years in this feeble state of body and mind,
depending upon the fulfilment of my voluntary
promise for all the little consolation and comfort
of which he was capable in this life. It seems to
me to be a law of our nature, that when a
powerful
and vigorous mind is suddenly cut down to
imbecility
by disease or mental suffering, it almost
always dwells with great pertinacity upon the
ruling ideas and motives at the time of the attack.
In consideration of this, I knew that the principal
stimulus of his mind consisted in ruminating upon
this marriage, and that to cut it suddenly away
would be to cause his immediate dissolution.
CHAPTER
XVI
.
My
father, having so far improved as to attain
that melancholy state which the physician stated
to be his probable zenith, by no means forgot the
privilege with which I had invested him, of
appointing
the wedding-day, though he was thus far silent.
That time was now appointed, and it having been
determined that I should not return to school, the
miserable interval was spent by me in alternate
duties to my father, and the solitude of my own
room. Mr. Sandford's conduct during this time
was to me a riddle. He seemed to move along
calmly and quietly, and to divide his time pretty
much as I did my own. He seldom intruded his
society upon me, unless I met him half-way. This
I thought strange for a young and ardent lover,
such as he had first exhibited himself to me;
nevertheless
it was pleasant, and I have no doubt was
founded in the most consummate art, and judgment,
not only of my character, but also of the depths
which I had seen into his. Without any verbal
communication, it is easy for two persons to
understand
each other thoroughly. The weakness
of the one is the strength of the other.
During this most painful interval, we did not
enjoy a single confidential, unrestrained interview.
His pride was either too great, or his judgment
imperfect; he did not see clearly how far I could
read his deep and designing character, and therein
lay my strength.
I effected many discoveries at this time, which
more ardent lovers seldom make so shortly before
marriage, and which, I suppose, are oftener made
after: necessity and pain were my teachers in this
abstruse branch of human knowledge. A stranger,
to have entered the room where Mr. Sandford
and myself were sitting, would have said that we
were a young couple who had quarrelled: so cold
and formal was our intercourse. Not that I
increased
the distance designedly; for, to tell the
truth without disguise, after mature and painful
reflection
,
I was anxious that we should come to
some amicable understanding of each other's
feelings
and views, and thereby form a kind of treaty
for our mutual peace and my father's happiness.
But Mr. Sandford's conduct confirmed beyond a
doubt those suspicions of his primary motives that
had been engendered in the interview which I had
overheard; he seemed conscious of his own bad
motives, and acquainted with my knowledge of
them.
However, the time approached as rapidly as it
ever did (and seemingly far more so) to the most
anxious and impatient pair. My father grew no
better, and as the day approached I grew no
calmer. No one, who has not been similarly
situated
,
can easily imagine the profound sadness of a
heart about to be united in a cold, formal, worldly
sacrifice. When we directly think upon our hard
fate, whatever it may be, and directly and boldly
face the consequences, the pain is not half so great
as when we forget the whole train of ideas for a
moment, in gazing out upon the happiness of
others, or the beauty of nature; it suddenly flashes
over the memory, in the midst of our pleasing
reveries
,
like some horrible spectre, and so it is when
we sleep under such circumstances. There is, I
believe, in the sleeping of every person, a space
between awakening and profound sleep of the most
singular nature. This little space is at once
discovered by the truly miserable, if they have
never done so before; and consists, as I have been
informed by a medical gentleman who is a friend
of mine, in the repose of all those parts of the body
dependent upon the will. Let the philosophy of it
be what it may, I only speak of the facts, which
will be readily recognised by every person who
has suffered. Nature has evidently designed this
interval between sleeping and waking as one of
pure and unalloyed delight, and I suppose it to
resemble
the happiness of the blessed more than any
thing we have in this world; it is a period of
oblivion
to the ordinary mishaps of the day; under
its influence minor ills dwindle into insignificance,
and the more pleasing features of our lot in life
pass in a calm but most delightful review before
the recumbent mind. But let the main-spring to
all this happy machineryhopebe once taken
away, and the revery becomes a moral engine of
torture; just as the oblivious feeling begins to steal
gently over the senses, the spectre of our wrecked
hopes starts up in our very path, and we tremble
and startle into our wretched consciousness again.
I speak of this because much of my most
irremediable
sorrow, at this time, was exhibited in this
peculiar
way. So long as I was awake to all my
misery, and could summon judgment or moral and religious principles to my aid, I was not so
wretched; but no sooner would I lay my throbbing
temples on my pillow with these my moral
defenders
asleep, than my evil spectre was before me.
Oh! what wretched and sleepless nights did I pass
during this interval! When I did sleep soundly, it
was in that profound and deathlike exhaustion of
mind, which more resembles the stupidity
occasioned
by some deadly narcotic, than the healthful
slumbers of my school-days; and when I awoke,
it was like a fresh burst of misery sweeping over
the heart, as a new career of the same miserable
rounds were again to be begun.
There is, in every young female mind, a
healthful
anticipation of a happy future, a looking
forward
to things not seen, a confident expectation of
blessings yet to come, which, though not analyzed
by us at that age, is nevertheless ever present and
ever acting upon the naturally buoyant spirits;
but, in my case, these healthful supports were
suddenly
knocked from under me, and I was left to
look forward to a gloomy and unhappy destiny.
VOL. II.P
Escape seemed impossible; my father's very
existence
depended upon the fulfilment of that which
was the cause of all this suffering to his daughter.
He seemed totally ignorant of the sacrifice I was
about to make.
How Mr. Sandford could agree to take me,
upon the terms and with the feelings on my part
towards him, which were but too evident, was at
that time a profound mystery to me. The fortune
which I could expect, though handsome, was not
such as to hold out any lure for a man who sought
that alone; besides, his time and happiness must
necessarily, for a long time, be so burdened with
the unfortunate state of our family, that an
ordinary
youth would have fled from us in dismay.
My father, too, had expressly stipulated with him
to reside in our house till his death or recovery.
During this time, Mr. Sandford was as attentive
to my father's helplessness as if he had been his
own son, and this circumstance prevented the
wretchedness which must have been visible upon
my countenance from being more observed than it
was, and thus necessarily affecting the rest of the
family. My mother was little less wretched than
myself; it is to the mother's sympathy that the
daughter flies for relief; but in this case she could
do little more than weep with me, and look wretched
too; and thus was spent, between us, the last of
those wretched days and nights which were valued
by mewretched as they wereas happy, in
comparison
to those which were so soon to follow.
CHAPTER
XVII
.
The
important daythe crisis of my destiny,
had now arrived. The house was all bustle and
confusion. Extra cooks were employed in the
kitchen, and additional servants in the house. The
bridemaids, whom it was thought proper to invite
from the neighbourhood, arrived in the morning.
Mr. Sandford set off also quite early to meet a
party of gentlemen, and spend the day at the house
of one of my father's friends in the neighbourhood.
All persons and all things wore an external
appearance
the most blithe and frolicsome, such as
is usual at our large country weddings of the better
sort. As for myself, a stupor came over me
entirely
different from what I had expected from my
previous anticipations: I found it now difficult to
realize the truth that this was indeed my
wedding-day
.
I stood up to be decked out and dressed for
the sacrifice, like some stupid idiot, scarcely noticing
the jests and playful sallies of my thoughtless and
joyful attendants. My mother tried to look gay
and cheerful before such of our most particular
friends and relations as arrived early in the
afternoon
,
but to me she seemed most miserable when
she most affected gayety. My father was full of
wretched mirth and humour, and presented a
strange contrast between his overflowing spirits
and broken constitution, and my mother's sickly
spirits and healthy person. He would be wheeled
into the great hall of the house, where we then
lived, to direct the proceedings and receive the
company himself, as they severally arrived. He
said too that he had a great secret by which he
was going to surprise the whole company after
supper, but more especially would it please the
bridegroom and the bride. The house and the
adjacent grounds began now to give some evidence
of the expected gayeties within. Horses were
crowded into stalls, both permanent and
temporary
;
parties were walking about in various
directions
;
and ladies, and girls, and boys, and
servants
crowded the apartments. Bandboxes and
trunks were piled in pyramids in the various
entries
;
carriages and gigs blockaded the several
avenues without; voices were heard in all
directions
,
and many a peal of laughter resounded
through the swarming mansion, while the heart of
her who should have been alive to all these
demonstrations
was stupified with sorrow. It was
fortunate for me, however, that some little reflection
and sadness are usually looked for, on such
occasions
,
from the more sensible maidens, on the very
eve of parting with home, and friends, and objects
dear to the heart; otherwise my bewildered
appearance
must have attracted the attention of my
female friends.
At length, the clergyman having arrived, and
the whole company being assembled in the largest
room of the house, one of the bridemaids entered
to announce the arrival of the bridegroom, and the
readiness of him and his attendants to lead us to
the expecting company. I was sitting in my own
boudoir, dressed for the ceremony, gazing upon
passing things like an indifferent spectator when
the summons came. It shook my frame for an
instant, but I soon mechanically arose and declared
myself ready; all this must have been done in a
very different spirit from what is usual on such
occasions, when the heart is ready. Feeling, I
suppose, there usurps more the place of formal
speech. Thanks, however, to the kindness or the
dulness of my attendants, my cold mechanical
formality was not observed; no officious kindness
was intruded upon me, to make my wretchedness
palpable to all. How strange that on those
occasions
,
when the mind is most requisite, when it is
important that we should have all our thoughts
about us, on the greatest and most solemn incident
of our lives, they should be wandering, like the
fool's eyes, to the ends of the earth. Such was
the case on the present occasion. I was led by
my destined husband into the midst of a crowd,
which looked like the world assembled in judgment.
The walls themselves seemed to have given place
to a swarm of heads, extending as far as the eye
could reach.
I suppose that the poor criminal on the scaffold,
when about to suffer the extreme penalty of the
P 2
laws, must feel and see much as I did then; or,
to speak more truly, that like me, he lacks those
feelings which he would desire to have. The
demand
upon the mind is too great; there is such a
rush of novel sensations, such a crowd of important
ideas, such consequences concentrated into a single
instant, that the poor object, whether bride or
criminal, shrinks from the encounter, as the eye
will naturally close when a million of objects
demand
attention at the same instant.
I was led to my place in the centre of this
immense
crowd, surrounded by my attendants, who
were trembling far more than myself. The
clergyman
(of the Presbyterian denomination) already
stood before us, and offered up a short prayer,
imploring happiness and blessings upon our heads.
Oh! how like a solemn mockery did his words fall
upon my ear! and how like an involuntarily guilty
creature did I feel, thus to stand in a solemn
attitude
,
in such a presence, with such feelings! But
if this prelude partially aroused my blunted
sensibilities
,
how much more exquisitely did I feel the
bitter pangs of hopeless and desperate remorse,
when called upon, in the presence of God and those
witnesses, to promise love and obedience to one
whom I could not love! I could not utter, or
signify
even by a motion, the awful perjury. A
solemn pause occurred in the ceremony. A pin
might have been heard to drop, and the very hearts
of the people seemed stilled in a profound and
deathlike silence! How this would have
terminated
,
God only knows, had not some one
fortunately
whispered to one of the attendants to hand
a glass of water, which was speedily done, and
the ceremony hurried over in order that I might
breathe the fresh air; not, however, before I was
pronounced a lawful and wedded wife! In these
trials of the conscience, how the soul clings to any
little subterfuge, rather than admit to ourselves
that we have committed a great sin. And thus it
was with me. Slender as was this hold for my
conscience, it was of infinite comfort for me to
think, as I then did, that I had been a mere passive
instrument in the hands of destiny.
But now that I was a wife, and receiving the
congratulations of friends and relations to an
interminable
extent, the same lethargy came over
me under which I had laboured ever since the fatal
day had been appointed. Nor could all the
devotion
of my dear mother to the duties of hospitality
which pressed upon her so oppressively, remove
the could which hung over her spirits, and was
but too plainly visible upon her usually calm and
complacent countenance.
As is common at country weddings, a set supper
had been provided for the guests, in the
preparation
of which all the young and old ladies of the
neighbourhood, who pretended to skill in pastry
and confectionary, had contributed their efforts.
To this long array of towering cakes, and floating
islands, and sparkling wines, we were soon
summoned
.
I was led in due state, by my new-made
husband, to the head of the table, where my father
had already been wheeled in his great arm-chair;
and now commenced the hum and the din of a
hundred voices; the rattling of knives; the
running
of servants; the politeness of beaux to their
mistresses; the drinking of wine, and the telling of
stories,and the joke, and the repartee, and the
laugh, which, though not uproarious, was deafening,
from the number and the merriment of the guests.
When this state of confusion, and merriment,
and enjoyment to most of those present, had lasted
for some three-quarters of an hour, my father, who
was as merry as the youngest and the gayest of
the party, raised his great carving-knife, and
bringing
down the handle with three loud raps upon the
table, astounded the company into silence as
perfect
as if they had been petrified.
A true story! a true story! was first uttered
by my father, and then repeated along the table,
more loudly as it went farther from its source, until
the attention of the whole company had been thus
gained, and anxious heads might be seen vying with
each other to reach nearer the centre of the table,
and thus catch the story as it went down the long
line of guests. My father prided himself very
much upon his judgment touching the quality of
his wines, and a large number of bottles had been
that day brought out of the cellar and placed in
one of the closets of the room, under his
immediate
inspection. No one was privy to his designs,
which he thus laid open.
My friends! before I relate my short but true
story, which, I say beforehand, relates to the bride
and bridegroom, you must all pledge the young
couple in some real old Madeira, which I have had
in my cellar since my daughter's birth.
The servants now began setting the bottles along
the table, one before each gentleman, until the whole
table was supplied. Each poured out for the
ladies within his reach; Mr. Sandford, of course,
filled for me, and his father, who sat at my elbow,
and who, I should have told you before, was
introduced
to me in the early part of the evening, and
by whose voice I recognised instantly the strange
nocturnal visiter of Mr. Sandford in the garden.
It may be readily imagined that this discovery did
not tend to tranquillize my feelings, or make me
enjoy the present company in any very enviable
degree. By some strange accident, or perhaps by
a providential guidance, I happened to observe that
the wine which had been poured out for me had
rather a singular appearance, and I therefore
concluded
that I would merely touch it to my lips, as,
indeed, was generally my practice. The pledge
was soon given, when Mr. Sandford, bowing his
head by way of thanks for the honour, as I
supposed
,
raised the glass to his lips and drank the
contents to the bottom. I imitated his example so
far as to touch my lips to mine. The elder Mr.
Sandford, I observed, had taken a mouthful of his,
and had speedily ejected it on the floor. As soon
as the toast was drank, I pointed to the bottle
before
Mr. Sandford, and remarked to my father (who
was particularly touchy upon the subject), that he
had given his principal guests a spoiled bottle of
wine; at the same time I ordered one of the
servants
to throw it out, while my father replaced it
from a supply in the cooler.
The story! The story! was now called for,
from various quarters of the table.
My friends, said my father, my story is
very simple and soon told. Perhaps there is more
than one person present who recollects Mr.
Thornton
,
the old bachelor, as he was called at the
neighbouring
village?
Yes, yes, we recollect him well, replied
several
of the older guests.
Well! continued my parent, the wedding
which we have met to celebrate to-night was made
by him!
I started! and many others exhibited evidence
of as great surprise; while my father continued:
That Mr. Thornton was my only brother
my long-lost, shipwrecked brother Holcomb St.
Clair. I see you are all amazed, but it is true. I
did not, indeed, know of our relationship till the
night of his death; when he revealed to me his
name; how he had been picked up at sea by a
vessel bound for New-Orleans; how he had
commenced
with nothing, and at length amassed a
large fortune: not, however, before it was too late;
for the object for which he toiled was no more.
This he learned from a friend of his, who is now
present, the elder Mr. Sandford; and who had
married the only remaining daughter of Mr.
Moreton
,
my father's ancient enemy. You see, my
friends, how, by the perseverance and
determination
of one man, the old feud has been healed, and
two hearts made happy. Yet an old crone, who
remains upon the land of the Moretons, intruded
herself into my presence on this the day of my
daughter's wedding, to prophesy and anathematize
against this most unholy union, as she called it.
My brother left his whole estate in the trusteeship
of Mr. Sandford, Counsellor Bates, and myself, for
the benefit of the young couple before you,
provided
they should ever be married; but at the
same time earnestly entreating us to keep it a
secret, each from his own child. And providing
also, in case there should be no disposition on the
part of the young people, after being thrown
frequently
together, to form the connexion, that my
daughter Frances should then be lawfully entitled
to one-half of his whole estate, and the remainder
be advantageously invested for the purpose of
establishing a free-school at the village hard by.
Now, my friends, I feel it to be my duty to declare
solemnly, before God and this assembly, that I have
kept the trust and the secret reposed in me
faithfully
until the present moment; and I doubt not
that my colleague, who is present, has been equally
faithful; but of that he must speak for himself.
Mr. Sandford, senior, being thus called upon,
arose in his place, and, amid a good deal of
coughing
and hemming, said:
In the same solemn manner I declare before
this assemblyHere he stopped, and screamed
out, reaching his arms half across the table towards
his sonMy God! what is the matter?
I now turned my eyes towards the object of his
solicitude, and oh! the wretchedness of that
countenance
!
I can even at this distance of time see
fear, and despair, and death, written in characters
too awful and legible to be mistaken. Before any
one had thought of offering assistance, he had fallen
to the floor; and raising himself upon his elbow,
pointed to the wine-glass, for he was already
speechless. Some of the by-standers, thinking this
a sign to hand him drink, presented him water and
wine, but his eyes were fixed. The room was now
an alarming scene of confusion; some standing
upon chairs, others upon tables; one
recommending
this, another that; some accounting for it in
one way, and some in another. The fact is, that
corrosive sublimate had been dissolved in some
common wine, and carelessly left standing in the
repository where my father had secreted his old
and choice Madeira.
I remained on my knees by the side of my
new-made
husband, in a state of distraction which no
pen can describe; and it was not the least of my
afflictions to know within myself, that my sorrow
was not such as ought to characterize a widowed
bride. He was now, indeed, a corpse, and that
before any medical aid could be procured. I was
borne to my chamber almost as lifeless as he to
whom I had mechanically pledged my faith so short
a time before.
VOL. II.Q
CHAPTER
XVIII
.
After
the melancholy events just related, I
know very little of those which took place around
me for the first week. I have a confused
recollection
of seeing every one in deep mourning, and an
expression of wo and sadness upon every
countenance
.
I remember also a moving about my
chamber upon tiptoe, conversation in whispers,
and occasionally the visit of the doctor to the
darkened room. One of the first things that I
recollect
distinctly, and unaccompanied with the
overpowering lethargic feelings of the preceding
weeks, was that one morning, while I was lying
in a tranquil state of half sleeping, I felt some
warm tears falling fast upon my face, and upon
looking up to see from whom they came, saw my
dear friend Isabel Hazlehurst standing over me.
Never was her dear and beautiful face more
welcome
to my sight. I needed just such a presence;
not that I was by any means fitted to enjoy her
society, but the sight of her countenance brought
such consolation to my mind, it tranquillized my
nerves and composed my spirit.
But I was not suffered to improve in this natural
and gradual manner. Few days had elapsed thus
before she came into the room with something so
evidently struggling at her heart, that even I,
prostrated
as I was, demanded to know what more
dreadful things were yet necessary to fill up the
bitter cup of my destiny. She seated herself by
the bed, and taking my hand, said, My dear
Fanny, you have great strength of mind; now is
the time to call it into action.
To what is this to lead, my dear Isabel? For
God's sake, tell me at once.
You know, dear Fanny, continued she, that
your father was far from being well when the
dreadful accident happened.
My God! is my father dead too?
He is alive, and wishes to see you; but I came
to prepare you for seeing him much altered.
I will not dwell upon the melancholy particulars.
My father had desired earnestly to see me. Alas!
that meeting was the last we ever had in this
world! and it seemed to me that all my sorrows
had again assembled in presence before me. To
crown all, my fathermy own dear father
implored
his child's forgiveness, calling himself
criminal
,
guilty, and blind! God knows I had nothing
to forgive. But the grave, in three short weeks,
closed over the last of the St. Clairs,over the
last male of a once numerous, powerful, and
wealthy house. Thus were my mother and myself
left wretched widows; but we were miserable
from very different feelings. She from too strong
an attachment,
I
from too
little;
and yet I was as
wretched and as miserable as I could have been if
my heart had been deeply concerned in the tragedy
which commenced the series.
My cup was not yet full. When some three
months had elapsed, and my health had become
somewhat restored and my spirits a little more
elastic, the servant one day brought me a letter
from the village post-office, directed to Mrs.
Frances
Sandford. I opened it without dreaming that
it was any thing more than a friendly letter from
some of my old school friends; but oh, cruel
destiny
!
all my former sufferings were light in
comparison
to those inflicted by this cruel letter. It
deliberately charged me with murdering my
husband
on his bridal night. The cruel and
tremendous
train of too specious charges which it linked
together with an ingenuity that Satan himself could
scarcely have excelled, had well-nigh cost me my
reason! It alluded to my not tasting the fatal
wine,my ordering the servant to throw out the
evidence of my guilt as soon as my hellish work
was completed,my known aversion to the match,
my excuse for the bad wine,and other lesser
corroborating circumstances, which really threw
over the whole charge a frightful plausibility.
I had ever heard the elder Mr. Sandford spoken
of as a man of more than ordinary shrewdness
and soundness of mind; I therefore could receive
none of the cruel consolation derivable from his
supposed insanity.
Mr. Chevillere has, I believe, witnessed, on more
than one occasion, how this individual has pursued
me with this idea; becoming more annoying to
me the more unsettled his mind became. His
friends are now convinced of his lunacy, and have,
it is said, safely secured him from further intrusions
upon me. This has given me much consolation;
for of late I have been afraid to move from home
on account of his persecutions. Long after the
occurrences just related, my mother was united in
marriage to her cousin, Mr. Brumley. This
alliance
was eagerly urged upon her, when once
proposed
,
by all her friends, and by none more ardently
than myself. They were educated together, under
the same roof, and from earliest youth had
entertained
the affection of brother and sister for each
other.
I have now given Mr. Chevillere a glance at all
those portions of our family history which it was
necessary for him to know, in order to approve, as
he undoubtedly will do, of my intention, long since
formed, never to carry my personal misfortunes
and their gloomy consequences into the bosom of
a happy family; at all events, never while I am
subject to the persecutions of that man whom he
has so lately seen violate my feelings. Some of
the leading incidents of this narrative have already
been related, as before said, to Mr. Chevillere's
honoured mother. She will, I am quite sure,
approve
of my decision. But Mr. Chevillere once
propounded another question to me, which I
promised
then to answer at another time. It was
whether, if none of these things had ever
happened
,
Q 2
the offer of his hand would have been
accepted
by me. I will now candidly and honestly
answer that question. My heart would, if I
allowed
it, dictate an answer in the affirmative.
Now, sir, let us part,but as friends; more, I
am sure, you will not now desire to be considered.
CHAPTER
XIX
.
V. Chevillere to B. Randolph
.
(In continuation.)
As you may well imagine, this narrative did not
lie unread. Every page was greedily devoured,
before I closed my eyes, which was late in the
night. I lay late next morning; the family had
breakfasted when I descended to the parlour. Mrs.
Brumley, however, seasoned that meal to me with
her delightful conversation, which was the more
agreeable as no one intruded upon us.
Announcing the object of my visit, I respectfully
solicited her consent and co-operation. The one
was charmingly granted, the other enthusiastically
promised; I say enthusiastically, because that
good lady was exceedingly anxious to adopt any
laudable course which was likely to dispel her
daughter's melancholy.
Ah, Randolph! her language was too flattering
for me to repeat verbatim; she, however, told me,
that she was sure every feeling of her (admirable)
daughter's heart leaned in my favour; that she had
nevertheless not given way even to the first
impulses
of those emotions, because she considered
it her duty never to carry her misfortunes into any
other family. `But,' said she, `this is a morbid
sensitiveness, which you must overcome; and
when once she is happily married, she will be
again restored to her natural self and to
happiness
.'
I found that she had walked to the banks of the
river, where I soon found her seated on a rugged
little stony seat, looking over upon the water and
the blue cliffs, as melancholy as if it had been
twilight
instead of a beautiful, cool, unclouded
morning
.
She looked up as my footsteps disturbed the
pebbles in the bank. I was in my most happy
mood, and springing to the little level, I seated
myself on the grass at her feet, and seized her
passive
hand.
`Did Miss Frances suppose that there was one
single circumstance in her sad story which would
not render her far more dear to my heart than
ever? Could she have been in earnest when she
once said that such a revelation would be a
sufficient
answer to my suit? Certainly not! Believe
me, dear lady, the sheets which I read last night
have made me a hundred times more determined
than ever to prosecute my humble claims to this
dear hand.'
No answer was returned, but one plentiful
shower of tears after another: these I thought
favourable, and I proceeded: `Your mother and
mine unite their irresistible petitions with my feeble
suit; certainly then, after the concluding
acknowledgment
,
which I will ever hold in my possession,
you cannot persist in your too refined notions of
delicacy.'
But, Randolph, I am too eager in rushing
towards
the conclusion, to relate all the particulars
of the how and wherefore: she is mine! mine,
Randolph; that is, after old Sandford's death: by
heavens, I must `put a spider into his dumpling' if
he is not so kind as to die soon. My time now
passes off here delightfully. Frances begins really
to look cheerful, and I doubt not, when her
tranquillity
is more restored, will consent to an early
day; seeing that, when once she is mine, she will
be beyond the reach of her tormentor. Will that
day ever come, Randolph? Will this beautiful
creature really be mine? I can scarcely realize
my own happiness; yet her eyes say so, and her
very music speaks to my soul in anticipation of
coming enjoyment.
Oh! how I hate that old saw about a `slip
between
the cup and the lip.' 'Tis all stuff; I will
not believe a word of it; there is no philosophy
in it: for if it had been so often true as its
language
imports, this world would have been, and
still would be, nothing but one great and ludicrous
scene of broken cups and spilt pleasures. Misery
must be common when it becomes ludicrous; yet
if all the world were standing gaping over their
broken vessels, looking dismal at their loss, it
certainly
would turn tragedy into farce. The fact is,
there must be a great preponderance of enjoyment
in this world before tragedy can be affecting.
None feel losses so much as those who are rich.
Providence has given us a fair world, and peopled
it with beautiful creatures, and covered it with
varying trees and flowers, seas and rivers,
diamonds
and minerals, delicious fruits and luxuries
to gratify the palate and the eye, and charm the
soul; and yet one of our standing thanks to the
great Giver of these things is, `there are many
slips between the cup and the lip!' If the slips
had been more numerous than the potations, the
latter would have been noticed instead of the
former. It is the rarity and the greatness of these
slips which make them remarkable.
There is a page of philosophy for you, with a
vengeance! But you cannot expect me to be very
sensible or very consistent under existing
circumstances
.
Only reflect what a thumping there is
against my ribs, whenever I think of the subject
with which I commenced this epistle: a pretty
story I made of it, indeed; but then it is natural
that it should be so, after all. Does a man, when
he climbs to an intoxicating height, turn round and
philosophize on the steps by which he ascended?
By no means. He turns himself and elevates his
wings in this new heaven to which he has risen, as
I now raised mine. He thinks of soaring in these
new regions, or climbing to those still more
exalted
;
but let me see if I can, by any strength of
resolution, get back to common sense again.
This once mysterious lady of the black mantle
has wonderfully changed within the last few days.
She has actually laughed! yes, till the tears ran
down her cheeks; and at what, do you suppose?
At a certain epistle from a southern gentleman of
about your dimensions! Yes, it is true. I know
you will swear never to indite another to so
faithless
a correspondent; but I could not help it. She
had a great curiosity to know more about my
cousin
;
so I thought it would exhibit her in a
favourable
light to show her your first impressions.
Unfortunately
,
I handed her the wrong letter, and as
bad luck would have it, we had to peruse the
whole before we came to the first one, which was
a very natural consequence of the pack being
turned upside down. I found that the letters
themselves
appeared to more advantage, too, when she
read them. I could thus receive all the palpable
substance of them from her exquisitely musical
voice; besides seeing all the delightful effects of
the thoughts, as they were beautifully reflected
upon a transparent countenance, the features of
which vibrated like the leaves of a sensitive-plant
when too rudely assailed.
The face is but a reflecting surface for the soul
at last. All other beauty than that of the soul
transferred to the features is earthy and
grovelling
.
Oh, Randolph, how seldom does it fall to
the lot of man to find such a treasure! Age seems
almost necessary to bring that experimental
wisdom
which engages our respect and esteem, by
which process beauty departs; fate seems
generally
to determine that no one individual shall have
a combination of all the good qualities at once;
but here, Randolph, in the case of this most
remarkable
young lady, experience and wisdom
have come before age had stolen away the beauty.
Oh, rare and excellent concurrence of
circumstances
!
What if they were the death of a
presumptuous
aspirant, unworthy to breathe in the
same atmosphere with her. Hah! perhaps I am
myself presumptuous? Methinks I have read
somewhere of an enchantress, who slew a host of
admirers in succession, for a like presumption!
Shall I indeed possess this idol of all my faculties?
Sanguine youth and southern blood say yes! Her
guardians and mine say yes! Herself says yes!
And by all that is resolute, naught but the Ruler
of our destinies shall say no.
Excuse the incoherent strain of this epistle,
and believe me to be, far more coherently, your
friend,
V. Chevillere
.
CHAPTER
XX
.
B. Randolph to V. Chevillere
.
Rockfish Gap, Virginia.
Dear Friend
,
Once
more I behold as it were the
dwelling-place
of my fathers! Once more I stand upon
these high places, and look down over the loved
tracts of the Old Dominion! You know that I
have always loved old Virginia, and, by my troth,
I may now add young Virginia too. But before I
tell you of our parting scene, permit me to say a
few words of my older mistress.
It always of late excites painful and melancholy
ideas, when I can have an extended view of this
highly-favoured country, as I now have from the
table-land of this mountain-top. Here before
me are eastern and western Virginia! The
Tuckahoes
[2]
[2]
In Virginia, the inhabitants east of the Blue Ridge are called
Tuckahoes
, and those on the west
Cohees;
as some allege, from
the Scotch-Irish phrase
quo'he
(quoth he).
and the Cohees. From this rich and
highly romantic spot a looker-on may see the
onward
march of events; and many things which
VOL. II.R
are not generally observed by those who are
immediately
under their influence; and it is this
which excites my melancholy. But it is the eastern
view which principally produces that effect.
There
are the dilapidated houses, and overgrown fields,
and all the evidences of a desperate struggle with
circumstances far beyond their control.
Here, to the left, are the wide stretching and
worn-out domains of some broken lord of the soil,
with his wagons loaded, his carriage ready, his
descendants collected, and his negroes in travelling
array, about to take a final leave of the moss-grown
hearths and graves of his ancestors. Many a tear
is shed over the scenes of his younger days; many
a longing, lingering look is cast behind him at the
old weather-board mansion, in the architecture of
the seventeenth century, where he and his fathers
before him had dispensed their hospitality with a
too generous hand. Assembled also in funeral
sadness are the worn-out hounds, and the venerable
setter, which had so often made glades and forests
resound with their enlivening music; and swung
upon the shoulders of one of the half-grown
descendants
,
are the very horn and fowling-piece of
more than one head of the family; the former of
which had so often recalled hunter and hounds to
the generous entertainments of the day and the
evening, when the goblet and the song went round,
and the enlivening cotillion closed the ruinous
gayeties
of the festival.
I do not envy that man who is callous to these
hallowed feelings of the emigrant cavalier. Poor,
exhausted, eastern Virginia! she is in her dotage.
Her impassable roads protect her alike from the
pity and the contempt of foreign travellers;
[3]
[3]
Most of the late English travellers have bestowed little
notice upon the Old Dominion.
Vide
Stewart, Hamilton, and
Trollope. The Duke of Saxe Weimar indeed blundered through
Virginia, and mistook her buzzards for eagles.
but
with all her weakness, with all the imbecilities of
premature age upon her, I love her still.
On the western side, a totally different scene
greets my eyes.
There
a long and happy valley
stretches far as the eye can reach, with its green
hills and cultivated vales, neat farm-houses, and
fragrant
meadows, and crystal springs, and sparkling
streams, its prosperous villages, its numerous
churches, and schools, and happy, happy people.
There, Chevillere, our college days were spent, when
all were joyous, and laughing, and frolicsome around
us; when the happiness of the present hour was
all that was asked or cared for; when the
tumultuous
impulses of young hopes and sanguine youth
threw care and trouble to the winds, and buoyed
us up upon the flood-tide of thoughtless happiness.
There the spirit of the age is working out a gradual
revolution, which, in its onward career, will sweep
away the melancholy vestiges of a former and
more chivalrous and generous age beyond the
mountains; 'tis sad to look upon, but I do not
repine
at the necessity which produces these new
impulses.
Virginia has been the mother of states. Her
sons have peopled the forests of the west, and now
her turn has come to build up her own fortunes
destiny has willed this course of events, and man
cannot gainsay it.
But while I prate of the elder matron, I leave
her young namesake neglected. A few days after
the interview with your mother, mentioned in my
last letter, as the sun was just sinking behind the
towering vapours of the Santee, and the sombre
shadows of the evening were throwing their
lengthening outlines over the green, and the
brilliant
fire-flies were flashing their fitful rays over
these southern scenes, I espied Virginia sitting
at the low parlour window, with her head resting
upon her hand, as she gazed out upon the setting
sun, through the interstices of the rich vines which
so tastefully festoon the windows. I walked into
the room, more engaged upon my own thoughts
than how I should most appropriately
communicate
them to her who was the object of them.
`To-morrow,' said I, `I leave Belville!' more
as an exclamation than addressed to her.
`To-morrow! said you?' exclaimed Virginia.
`Yea, to-morrow, Virginia; why not
to-morrow
?
the sooner I go, the sooner I will return.'
`True, but I would rather you should stay now
the longer, and be longer in returning.'
`But you know that would derange all our
plans respecting your cousin.'
You see we have arranged it thus; I am to
return immediately from Virginia, when our
nutials
will be celebrated in the good old southern
style; immediately after which we will proceed,
with all convenient despatch, to the home of my
fathers, where, if your suit is likely to be crowned
with success, we will then await your arrival with
your bride; otherwise we shall proceed to
New-York
.
But to return; morning came, and with it
came the servant and horses to the door. If I had
not been so confoundedly sad myself, I should
have enjoyed Virginia's confusion most
particularly
.
She thought it would not be appropriate
to appear melancholy on the occasion. She
therefore
attempted to be gay, but fruitlessly: and
when she discovered that your mother and I both
saw through her too childish arts, she hastily left
the breakfast table, without having tasted a
mouthful
.
The fact was, as I closely observed her, I
saw that her eyes were full, and that she must
either let the tears come, or run for it; she chose
the latter, of course. When the gloomy and
nominal
meal was over, your mother told me that I
must seek Virginia to say
farewell
, as she would
not return of her own free will. I bounded through
the rooms of the second floor with a false alacrity,
similar to the speed which a man employs when
he is about to plunge headlong into a cold bath.
I at length found her, the green shutters all closed,
sitting in the corner of the darkened room, with a
white handkerchief thrown over her face; I drew
R 2
it away, and found, as soon as my eyes became
accustomed to the light, that she had been weeping.
I could not bear this; seizing her therefore in my
arms, and printing a parting blessing upon her lips,
while mine made a gurgling sound in the throat
for a
farewell
exclamation, I rushed out of the
house, mounted my horse and galloped away,
without even saying adieu to your mother. Oh!
that wretched day! fifty times I would have turned
back, if the fear of ridicule had not impelled me
forward.
And now, my dear fellow, the next that you
hear or see of me will be either at the seat of the
Randolphs with my bride or in New-York; till
then, fare you well.
B. Randolph
.
CHAPTER
XXI
.
V. Chevillere to B. Randolph
.
Oaklands
, 18.
Dear Friend
,
Give
us joy, my dear fellow; for Lamar and
myself are made men. Last evening, just about
the same hour at which I came on shore from the
North America steamboat, who should land at
the same spot but Mrs. and Miss Hazlehurst,
attended by Lamar, with his arm in a sling. Since
that time, I have ascertained that he has not only
triumphed over poor Arthur, but which is better,
and more to be rejoiced at, he has triumphed over
Isabel's scruples about going to the south and to a
slave-country. Such was the state of things with
him in the city, when a note from me, informing
him of a like success on my part, induced him to
propose, and to prevail upon the two ladies to
make the present visit. Since this addition to our
party, we have arranged every thing. The day is
set, my dear fellow, and Lamar and myself will, at
the same time and place, receive a legal title to the
hands of two of the most interesting girls in these
northern latitudes: so you may go back to
Belville
as soon as you like, and inform my mother
that you have my most hearty consent to your
marriage with my cherished and beloved cousin.
Yes; go, Randolph, and bring her to Virginia,
where we will meet you and spend the
Christmas-holydays
.
I suppose you think it strange that my
letters become shorter and shorter with the
increase
of my subjects. But my feelings are not
now in the writing mood; I do not feel so
communicative
so
desirous to commune with old friends:
not that I regard you less, for you know that I do
not; but that I have a
new outlet
for my confidence.
Until we all meet again once more, believe me
to be yours, most sincerely,
Victor Chevillere
.
CHAPTER
XXII
. CONCLUSION.
On
a certain evening, about  months after
the events related in the last chapter, and during
those most jovial days in old Virginia between
Christmas and New-Year's-day, the sun was just
sinking in the western horizon, behind a long veil
of fleecy and dappled winter clouds, tinged with the
richest hues of crimson and pink; a gentle breeze
was just rippling the red and dried-up leaves along
the lawn, and monotonously sounded through the
naked boughs of the grove of ancient oaks, which
stood around and in front of the venerable domicil
of the Randolphs; the hounds had sought the
protection of the kennel from the chills of the
evening
,
and the solitary bell of the ancient wether, as
he led the little flock into the primitive-looking
fold, could just be heard above the lowing of the
few household cattle which still remained
unsheltered
;
all external objects around the venerable
establishment bore that delightful aspect of rural
repose which is so soothing to those who yet
retain
,
after the fierce struggles of the world, a heart
susceptible of these simple emotions, and a
conscience
untainted by crime.
Not so profound, however, was the repose within
the extensive walls of the old mansion. Lights
were seen passing and repassing through the most
uninhabited portions of the house, while all the
lower and usually occupied apartments gave
evidence
of some rare occasion.
In the western wing and largest parlour of the
establishment, a roaring hickory fire gave out its
genial heat in no niggardly rays. The large
branching silver candlesticks, which stood at each
side of a full-length picture of General Washington,
on the mantel-piece, were richly fringed with white
bridal ornaments, after the good old fashion; and
as lively a set of lads and lasses as ever moved
through the figures of a cotillion, were keeping time
to the impetuous thumping of their own hearts,
and the long-sweeping bow-hands of two
hereditary
fiddlers stationed behind the door. In a little
recess, formed by the old-fashioned projecting
chimney, sat three youthful ladies; their chairs
forming the figure of a rude triangle; the hands of
the one in the centre locked in those of her
companions
,
and their heads forming a lovely little
constellation
.
Three happier brides never united their
hands, hearts, and heads, than Virginia Bell
Randolph
,
Frances Chevillere, and Isabel Lamar. It
was heart-cheering to behold with what rapidity
and gasping eagerness Virginia poured out the
rich treasures of a long and, as she thought, an
eventful journey, to her new friends on each side
of her. A stranger, who should have entered at
that moment, would have declared that they were
sisters, just met after a long and painful separation.
Along the sides of the antique and lofty parlour
sat several old gentlemen, dressed in the fashion of
seventy-six
. Their small-clothes fastened at the
knee with the buckles which their fathers wore in
the days of tobacco-money, and their hair
powdered
and tied behind the collars of their
long-tailed
coats. A few of these venerable remnants
of a former and, at least, a more chivalrous age,
are still left in eastern Virginia, to smoke their
pipes, fight over their battles, and bewail the
impoverishment
of the land and the degeneracy of
their descendants. The cocked hats and black
cockades, it is true, have disappeared; but many
of their contemporaries still linger upon the scene,
as melancholy memorials of the too evident
mortality
of the venerated worthies who wear them.
At the farthest extremity of the room from the fire,
and on the opposite side of the door from the
musicians
,
stood the three Southerns. Randolph
was holding his hands hard pressed against his
sides, as Lamar related to him some of the
adventures
of the Kentuckian in New-York, which he
thought Chevillere had not sufficiently descanted
upon by letter. Chevillere stood in the middle
with his arms folded, apparently listening, but with
his eyes fixed upon a certain corner of the room,
to which we have already directed the reader's
attention.
Old Cato stood, with a small salver under his
arm, a little in the back-ground from the crowd
near the door; his eye intently fixed upon those of
his master's bride, and unconsciously moving a step
forwards, if she happened to turn her head in that
direction. If any one advanced towards or passed
by him, his person as naturally bowed forward as
the willow to the wind. Notwithstanding the
hilarity of the scene, the time, and the occasion, his
countenance was still serene and dignified; the
only evidence of a contrary feeling being the almost
imperceptible patting of his advanced foot to the
cadences of the music.
Cato, said Randolph, tell the musicians, as
soon as the present set have gone through the
figures, to strike up one of Jessy Scott's
[4]
[4]
Jessy Scott is a coloured gentleman, who lives at
Charlotte-ville
,
Virginia; has three sons distinguished musicians; one of
whom was educated in France. Few strangers visited Mr.
Jef-ferson
,
during his life-time, who did not likewise visit Mr. Scott.
He is an accomplished gentleman. We trust that he is yet alive,
and able to play the Cameronian Rant.
best
Virginia
reels. Turning to Randolph and Lamar,
We must initiate those three ladies in the corner
into the mysteries of the Virginia reel. The set
having gone through the figure, the three
Southerns
,
who, it must be recollected, were well versed
in the art, presented themselves before the three
ladies already mentioned. They begged to be
excused
,
pleaded ignorance of the figures, and
declared
that they would certainly be laughed at by
all the young girls in the room. But no excuse
could be taken. Randolph led out Mrs.
Chevillere
;
Lamar, Mrs. Randolph; and Chevillere,
Mrs. Lamar. The additional couples were soon
arranged down the room; the ladies on one side
and the gentlemen on the other, as is customary in
the usual country-dance.
The order of the country-dance is in these
simple figures reversed; the usual romping motion
of hands round commencing, instead of ending,
the set. The general effect of this rural figure is
hilarious and exhilirating in the extreme, and, on
the present occasion, did not lose credit by our
novices. Few persons would have recognised in
the bright and laughing countenance of Mrs.
Chevillere
,
the sad and demure little recluse of the
Hudson. But a few rounds were necessary to
initiate the strangers completely into the apparently
abstruse figure. We have seen these figures
frequently
attempted in Pennsylvania and New-York,
but always to the music of some jig or Scotch
strathspey. This is not correct; the time is about
the same as that usually employed in cotillions, and
the step slow and graceful. In this way each lady
dances, at one stage of the reel, a kind of solo
minuet, at the conclusion of which she carries on
a mock flirtation with each gentleman of the set in
succession. It must be apparent at once, to every
dancing lady, how ridiculous this must appear when
done to the tune of a sailor's hornpipe.
The reel being brought to a close, and soon after
the more substantial entertainments of the evening
VOL. II.S
having been served up, carriages now began to
draw up to the door, and such guests took their
leave as did not form part of the family party for
the holydays. After the bustle of departure,
calling
for shawls, cloaks, and mantles had somewhat
subsided,the three remaining happy pairs drew
up their chairs around the large blazing chunk fire,
and evidently prepared themselves for some
remaining
entertainment. The fiddlers, having stood
up in the centre of the room, their instruments tied
in green bags under their arms, and each having
drank a long and wordy toast in strong waters to
each of the brides, took their departure, with many
bows, and scrapes, and motions of the hat; with
each of which old Cato, unknowingly to himself,
made a slight inclination of the head. Having
closed the door, Cato advanced to a corner of the
room, and placed a stand with lights at his master's
right-hand, and then produced a large,
coarse-looking
letter. It was written upon rough-edged
foolscap
paper; was folded square as a chess-board,
and evidently contained many sheets, written upon
ruled black-lead pencil lines,looking very much,
upon the whole, like an old copy-book. This
formidable
package was addressed to Victor
Chevillere
,
Esquire, and Augustus Lamar, Esquire.
Present.
It was no sooner opened, than (at the very sight
of it) Lamar burst out into one of his long,
irrepressible
fits of laughter. For mercy's sake,
Chevillere, said he, only wait till I compose my
self a little, and wipe the tears from my eyes,
before
you begin that letter. But, tell me, do you
really say you can make it all out?
I have spent two hours, I tell you, in
deciphering
it, on purpose that you might all enjoy it
without
interruption, replied he. Here it is.
Down low in old Virginny, 25th day of November, in the
year of our Lord one thousand eight hundred and
.
`
Dear Gentlemen
,
`They tell me hereabouts you're married. Well,
hurrah for old Kentuck, I say, and her sister
Carolina
.
I'm married, too! yes, and I believe
everybody's
married, nearabouts, as far as I can learn.
It's twisted strange, ain't it, when a feller gets half
corned,
[5]
[5]
Western term for drunk.
everybody reels round; and when a feller
gets married, everybody else should get married
just at that particular time.
`Yes, it's a fact; it seems to be goin about now
like the influenza and the cholera, and the parsons
are dragged about like country doctors in a panic.
`But keep up your heart, my hearty,' says I to the
old gentleman that coupled us up, `it will soon be
over; for most of 'em won't have it but once, and
it'll soon run through a neighbourhood; and I've
been told it kills very few.'
`But I'm tetotally bamboozled if I ain't tellin
you of the killed and wounded, before I've told
you who fout, and whereaboutsbut let it go, the
lead always comes first, and the powder afterward
a man must let off a little of the extra steam,
you know, or he would burst his biler. I was
always one of them sort of fellers that went upon
the high pressure system.
`But ain't it a little particular now, that I should
be settin here of a rainy day in Mr. Randolph's
househe that you gentlemen talked so much
aboutand be writing you this long letter; my
nose close down on the paper, and strainin my
eyes till every thing in the world looks like
pot-hooks
and hangers when I look up. But I rub my
eyes, and at it again, for fear I might git off the
trail; and my little wife, Betsy, she sits there,
'fraid to wink her eye lest she mout put me out,
and I'll be hanged if she hasn't dropped a dozen
stitches already in that stockin she's knittin, she
says, jist because she can't keep her eyes off my
facewith my eyes and mouth all workin up and
down, like I was makin mouths at the paper, and
could see my face in it. And so I jumped up and
turned the table round, with my back to Betsy,
and now she's giglin at me, because, she says, she
can see the hair on the crown of my head workin
yit, and drops of sweat rollin down my temples
this winter day. `The fact is, Betsy,' says I,
`this pen you made me is like an old field-colt, a
little skittish in the breakin; it goes along as stately
and as stiff as a charger for a little while, until it
comes to some of these hills and gullies in the
paper, and then it begins to prance, and caper, and
git suple in the timbers, until down comes a great
dab of ink, like a rider in the mud. There now,'
says I, `Betsy, I'm hanged if I wouldn't rather
ride a three-year-old filly bare-backed through a
cane-brake, than git a fair start on that pen. You
kin hold on to the mane even if the filly does kick
up behind; but this pen blots it down as bald as a
pancake, no notice and no warnin nor nothin, nor
no mane to hold on to.'
`Well, here I go again, on a new trail, with a
fresh pen. A new broom sweeps clean, they say.
`I have read over now what I've writ, an I'm
dadshamed if it ain't all up in snarls. I don't see
how you'll ever git into it; and what's more, I don't
see how you'll ever git out of it, when once you
are in. I thought I had begun at the beginnin of
my story, when I left you, and had got more than
half-way through by this time. But I find that
I've been poppen my bill into it, and out of it again,
like a kingfisher in a mill-dam; or, maybe, I'm
more like a feller lost in a rye-field, the rye
higher than his head, dodging and poking about;
thinking all the time he's goin straight through,
when, in fact, he ain't gone a hundred yards from
where he started. I can't see, no how, how you
used to git on so slick through them long letters. It
used to look mighty easy; but when a feller comes
to the trial of it, it's a real job, I tell you. The great
drops of sweat come pouring down every now and
then on to the paper, and I jump back, thinkin its
the pen lettin off the steam again; and sure enough,
S 2
the jump starts another great bald blot as black as
a bullet hole; and that's the way I make so many
big stops. You see, I mind my stops, as the
school-master
used to say. Oh! if he had only seen this
letter, if he wouldn't have ruled a page on my
back. You see, I hav'n't got started yet; it's like
a tangled skeene of thread; there's no way of gittin
into it unless you break right in, like an ox into a
corn crib.
`Oh! my stars and turnips! if I did'n't forgit to
tell you how I found old Pete Ironsides; that's
just what was the matter with me. I thought
something was wrong; but hang me if ever I
thought once that that something was old Pete.
He spoke to me the minute I sot my foot inside the
stable-door. `Hello! Pete,' says I, `stand up there;'
and I'm a papist if he didn't laugh as natural as
Mr. Lamar with his white teeth. Yes, he showed
every tooth in his head: he didn't laugh loud, as
one may say, but he laughed
long
though. Oh! it
would have done you good to have seen that
laugh; there was the red and white of his teeth and
gums; I'm a steamboat if it didn't look like a ripe
water-
million
.
`But whose house do you think Pete had been
boarding at? At Betsy's father's. And who's
Betsy? Why Betsy was the little girl I saw in
the Circus. And seeing how well they had treated
Pete, I thought, maybe, they mout treat his betters
as well. And so I struck up to em; and a cleverer
set of people you never saw
south of the Potomack
,
as Mr. Lamar used to say. The old man got
quite in the notion of movin to the West; and sure
enough, he's comin out there next spring, bag and
baggage. And well he may, as I've carried off
the flower of his flock. But I didn't run away with
her; no, no. I asked the old man and old woman,
and all the girls and boys; but I asked her first
though.
`Well now, Betsy,' says I, after I had been
sparkin some weeks, `how would you like to go
to old Kentuck?'
`Do you think father will go sure enough?' said
she.
`Come now, Betsy, none of your playing sly;
you know what I mean.'
`Law, now, Mr. Damon,' says she, `you're such
a funny man, a body never knows how to take you.'
`That's the very thing,' says I; `take me for a
husband.'
`Law, Mr. Damon;' and she put her arm round
her eyes, but I pulled it down again.
`Now,' says I, `Betsy, you must come up to the
scratch now; no flinchin now.'
`So in about ten minutes, when I begun to think
the jig was up with me, for she began to look
serious,
`Well,' says she to me, `you may ask father.'
`I looked over my shoulder just now at her.
`Oh!' says she, `you're writing something about
me now.'
`And with that she jumped up, and snatched
away the paper, and made this great dash you see
here like a fishingpole and a turtle at the end of it.
`There now,' says I, `Betsy, you have made a
pretty spot of work of it.'
`Let me see where I have got to now. Ah! I
seewe had a tare down sneezer of a wedding:
the old folks were quite pleased, and I rather
suspicion the young ones were not far behind
them. After it was all over, and we had all got
settled down agin to the regular old ways, I spoke
up one day at dinner about starting next day to
old Kentuck. The old lady and Betsy took the
hint, and straightways tuned up their pipes.
`But the old gentleman, he was bothered to think
how I was to get Betsy home with me; and to
come right plump down with the plain truth like a
centre shot, I was feelin my way a little when I
began to talk about goin. So the old man he
took the hint, and come up to the trumps like a
white head, I assure you.
`Well,' says he, `to be sure I have been thinking
about that; and I have been studyin some time
whether your horse will work in a one-horse
carriage.'
`What, Pete Ironsides?' said I.
`Yes; Peter, to be sure,' said he.
`Why Pete would no more go inside of harness
than a snappin-turtle would work in a horse-boat.'
`Well, then,' says he, `you must swap him off,
and get one that will; for I've got a clever little
one-horse carriage in my eye, which I'm goin to
buy, and give to Betsy.'
`I wish I may run my head right into a
steamboat
biler, if I would any more part with Pete
than I would part with Betsy.'
`But Betsy struck in here, and told the old man
that she was goin to ride on horseback.
`That's the girl for me,' said I, and there it ended.
`At last the whining and pouting was over (and
that's a kind of work that always makes my throat
raw inside), and we were on the road; and, after
two days' ride, as happy a pair as ever jogged over
a turnpike.
`On the fourth day, at night, we got benighted
near this house; and the rain came pouring down
as if all the steamboats in Christendom had burst
their bilers; and Pete began to get a little
melancholy
,
and I had to sing to him; and Betsy laughed
at me, rain and all. Ah! I like these laughin girls.
But I'm gittin off the trail again.
`Well, I saw a light in these windows, away far
off from the big road yonder. Betsey and I rode
up to the door, and I hallooed and hallooed, but
nobody came. At last I raised a whoop, and if I
didn't wake the snakes and Junebugs in November,
then say I'm a dandy, and eat molasses and pork,
and never went to a Yankee singin-school. I'm
rather of the opinion that I raised the bats out of
a month's nap in these old oaks. Pete raised his
ears, and if his thoughts could be found out, I'll bet
he was on the look-out for the dogs and some
varmint
or other, to come sweepin by with a curley
whoop.
`But I raised the old housekeeper, too, out of a
deep sleep; she came stickin her head, with the
lamp held up above it, through the window, and
her gray hair hanging from under her nightcap,
till she looked for all the world like a little
hail-storm
.
Can a benighted traveller git a night's
lodging
?'
said I.
There is nobody at home,' said she; `Mr.
Beverley Randolph has gone to the Carolinas to
git married.'
Mr. Beverley Randolph?' said I.
Ay, Mr. Beverley Randolph,' said she, `as
tidy a gentleman as ever walked in shoe-leather.'
`And then I made the woods ring again for
gladness, to think what good luck always follows
me. But the old woman looked as bewildered as
a hound off the trail. But I soon put things to
rights. `Halloo, mother,' said I, `Mr. Randolph's
a particular friend of my particular friends Mr.
Chevillere and Mr. Lamar.'
Mr. Lamar and Mr. Chevillere!' said she,
with her great big blue eyes as wide open and as
big as a Liverpool chaney saucer; `why, we expect
them and their wives on here soon, to meet Mr.
Randolph and his wife.'
`And then the old lady told us to get down, and
go into the front porch out of the rain, until she
came. After a while she came down all dressed,
and now that she had got wide awake and a sight
of Betsy's pretty laughing face, she was quite polite.
`But she stared at me most confoundedly at first,
and asked me if I had been to college with the
young gentlemen. `No,' I told her, `we hadn't
been to college together, but we had been on a
northern campaign together against the Yankees;'
but for the life of her she couldn't keep her eyes
off me.
`She soon got us some supper, late as it was, and
had the negroes called up to take care of our
horses. In the morning, and that's to-day, the rain
is still pourin down; so we have concluded to
accept the old lady's invitation to stay till the
weather clears up. She has been asking my wife
something about my acquaintance with you, and
since that she has been wonderful polite; nothing
seems good enough for us now in the eyes of the
old lady. But she still stares at me.
`Me at college with you! well, now, that's a
good one; but I'll be run through a spinnin jinny,
if I havn't seen as big fools as I am come through
a college. I know a feller that's been clean through,
and he writes little, if any, better than I do. He
picks his words maybe a little more; but what's
the difference between one that picks his steps
through a mud-hole, and one that jumps clean
over? I can tell the truth as well as he can, and
I'm sure in a case of needcessity, as one may say,
I could tell a lie that would make him ashamed to
look a college in the face again. I git more off my
land than he does,I'm a better judge of
horse-flesh
,I
can beat him at a foot-race, and throw
him four falls out of five. But, above all, his book
larning has made his head so weak he can't stand
nothin at all. He gits corned on all occasions just
at the very first blush of the thing, as one may say,
and he never gits through a regular frolic unless
he falls through a trap-door, or down two or three
pair of stairs. His face looks like it was boiled
in poke-berry juice and indigo, and hang me if I
don't think he's a little flumucky altogether about
the head. Most of this I rather suspicion mought
be larned in York without a regular sheepskin. I
suppose there's a sheep's head for every skin,
according
to nature.
`College spiles a great many people; not you
and Mr. Lamar,for, as I tell Betsy, I never see
two gentlemen come out with so little blast and
airs about them.
`But, as I was saying, it ruins a power of people;
some gits halfway through like an ear of corn in a
shelling machine,and then it will go neither
backwards
nor forwards, and is jist good for nothin.
`Some kick up like wild colts at the first trainin
to harness, and if they're cleverly broke of them
tricks at the start, they work in harness all their
days pretty well. But if they git the upper hand
the first time, they'll be like runaway horses; they'll
smash things, you may depend upon it, first chance.
Some old regular-built harness nags go well right
off at the start; they may be good at a regular
tug, but they'll never make spirited tackies. Give
me your fiery-blooded colts, that takes a real
teardown
blast at the start, and then behave themselves
well all their lives afterward.
`Take an old field scrub out three or four times
to a military parade, and he gits to prancing and
snorting, and is worth nothing no more neither for
work nor show. Now old Pete's what I call a
well brought up horse; he won't have nothin to
do with parading on one side nor harness on the
other. When he's goin to do a thing, he says so
at once, and there's an end of it. If a nigger comes
behind him, he just backs his ears and kicks him,
and then goes strait ahead again.
`Old Kentuck raises the finest horses in the
universal
well,
now, I wish I may be tetotally
ballgusted
,
if here ain't another pretty piece of business.
I started as fair as a poney-race to tell you all
about colleges and such likes, and here I've got
a-straddle of old Pete, and ridin away through a
Kentuck colt-pen, like a gust of wind over a chaff
bank.
`But I'll tell you what it is, strangers,it's not
sich an easy job to start right off and put down in
black and white every thing that a feller's been
doin for a month of Sundays back. Then there's
all the lines to keep straight; for though Betsy
ruled all the paper, I've a confounded hankering
after the furrows between. Now talkin of
furrows
,
I would rather plough an acre of new ground
any day, than write down one side of a letter. But
it must be done, and so here goes at it agin,but
VOL. II.T
where did I leave off? Oh! I was a-straddle of
Pete, confound him, in a Kentuck colt-pen; but I
had to run and jump through the walls of a college
to get there. But I must turn back, now, and see
what I have writ and what I havn't.
I have hardly writ a single thing I wanted to
write, I'm jist now like I've been at times when I've
been out catting.
[6]
[6]
Throwing for cat-fish.
I could catch every thing but
catsnakes, and turtles, and all other sort of
water varmints except the things I wanted. And
so it is nowI've been trying to fish up several
things that's still at the bottom; but all I can do
nothing will come up but the varmints. Now I
could tell it to you in no time at all. So now as
I have fished you up a mess of all sorts of odd
creters, I may as well gather up all these papers
and put marks on them, so that you will know
which to begin with.
And now it makes me so sorry I don't know
what to doto think I'm goin to tell you both
farewell for ever and ever and ever. But let what
will come, never forget that I am
yours
, till death.
Montgomery Damon
.
And now, gentle reader, we will take a gentle
leave of you, hoping that you have not been
altogether
displeased with the adventures of the
Kentuckian
and the Southerns.B. Randolph to V. Chevillere
.
High Hills of the Santee
, 18.
The
change in Virginia's deportment has been
to me a curious subject of study and reflection. I
dare not say that it has been entirely disinterested
study, but perhaps it was none the less close and
minute on that account. We are apt to
investigate
those engines which operate upon ourselves
very philosophically. But before I go any farther,
permit me to correct an error into which I fear
I have led you, because I had honestly fallen into
it myself. I stated to you that my sickness had
cast out devils for me, and that I was altogether a
changed and reformed man. It is no such thing;
I feel the devil of mischief and fun in me even
now. It was nothing more than a natural
depression
of animal spirits, consequent upon the low
state of my stomach and pulsations. The doctor
was my priest on the occasion. He subdued the
old Adam in me for a time, by the assistance of
his lancet and the whole vegetable and mineral
kingdom, worked up into shot and bullets vulgarly
called pills, by the aid of which these same
doctors
,
I believe, often do a deal of execution; at all
events this disciple fleeced me of a goodly
quantity
of the flesh upon my ribs; none of his shot
happened to be mortal; but, nevertheless, I would
advise you to keep out of the reach of their
magazines
.
The muzzle of a pill-box is as terrible to
me now, as the mysterious dark hole in the end of
a forty-two-pounder; and a blister-plaster as awful
as an army with banners. As for cupping-glasses
and scarificators, they are neither more nor less
than instruments of torture, borrowed from the
Spanish inquisition. But above all, deliver me
from the point of a seton-needle! Did you ever
see a cruel boy string fish on a stick before they
were dead? He runs the stick through the gills,
tearing and torturing as it goes; so do these
disciples
of Esculapius; they seize a piece of your
skin, no matter how scarce the article may be,
no matter if your lips do not cover your teeth, and
the bones of your nose look white through the
attenuated
sheath! Away goes this surgical bayonet
through a handful of it, armed with a piece of gum
elastic, which is left sticking there, the sensation on
the back of your neck being as if the ramrod of a
small swivel had been shot through it; and there
you must sit, or stand, or lie, with this huge thing
all the while poking your head forward, as if you
had a pillory on your back.
Although there is not so great a change in me
as I had supposed, the change in Virginia is none
the less certain. She is as dignified towards me
now as a princess; nevertheless there is a
trembling
VOL. II.H
nervousness about it, which charms me
indescribably
.
I know you will exclaim here, `Vain
fellow!' I am not vain; but as humble and
fearful
as a bride of two hours' standing. Half the
time I am doubtful of the cause of this new
reserve
,
and set it down as decidedly unfavourable
to my views, until I detect a little thrill in her
voice, or tremulousness in the fingers as they meet
mine, or touch the piano; and even that I set down,
sometimes, as nothing more than sympathy for my
forlorn condition, especially if there is a mirror
near, and I happen to get a peep of my shaved
cranium and sharp visage. And then, again, I
consider it nothing more than the natural reserve
of the woman, as she throws off the playful air of
the school-girl; and that too, perhaps, from having
discovered, during my illness, that she could no
longer, in justice to myself, treat me as a playmate.
But all these doubts and difficulties will be solved
in two hours. I have requested her to accompany
me in a walk around the lawn and garden, and I
intimated to her that I had something very
particular
to say. This was ill advised, I know, but the
truth is, I was attempting at that very time to
broach the subject, and, as with all other bashful
boobies, my tongue clove to the roof of my mouth.
I certainly have some fear of disturbing my
pleasant
dreams of the present reckoning; but I am
committed now, and there is no retracting. I shall
leave this letter open, that I may communicate to
you the result; no doubt you can anticipate now
more truly what it will be than I can. Until this
crisis in my affairs is over, farewell.
B. Randolph
.B. Randoiph to V. Chevillere
.
(In continuation.)
I have deferred the closing of this letter a day
longer than I intended when I penned the above.
The fact is, I was not so much in the humour for
writing as I expected. I was compelled to order
your horse and take my first ride, and you may be
sure that I did not restrain his mettle. What
would you argue from this? That I was
successful
?
or defeated? I should suppose neither, from
that circumstance alone, say you,as you would
be apt to ride down your impetuosity in either
case.
But the time at length arrived,the long
looked-for
,
hoped-for time! and lo! when it did come, I
would have put it back again, if I could have done
so with credit; but no, I must now go onward;
so I plucked up my wavering courage, and
prepared
for a formal introduction. This, you know,
is at all times, and under the most favourable
circumstances
,
but an awkward business; but it is
especially so if the lady possesses a keen sense of
the ludicrous, has a lurking devil of ridicule in her
eye, and if the person about to address her has
often felt the smart of her keen satire.
In the present instance, there seemed a hundred
little smothered devils of fun, and wrath, and
frolic
peeping from the corners of her eyes; not that
her deportment was different from that placid
serenity which has of late sat so modestly upon
her brow; unless, indeed, it was that there might
have been discovered greater efforts than usual to
produce this result. We sauntered down the
lawn, until we came to the clump of pride of India
trees, amid which is situated a summer-house,
covered
with vines; you no doubt recollect the place;
here we were seated.
`Miss Virginia,' said I, in the formal style in
which a lawyer says, `may it please the court,'
`Miss Virginia, when I first set out from home
upon a southern expedition at this strange season
of the year, my only object was to see whether
the original of that miniature, about which you
have heard so much, was as lovely as it
represented
her. I expected to see a beautiful little girl
of thirteen, and hoped at some future day to make
her my wife; nay, if I must make a true
confession
,
I hoped to make some impression on her
youthful and gentle susceptibilities, before she could
see any more attractive admirer, and then leave
her to mature until my return. In all these
expectations
I have been disappointed, except with
regard to the personal qualities, which I found of
a much more dangerous character than I had
calculated
upon; but Miss Virginia Chevillere is not
one to whom I would address compliments upon
her beauty, except in the regular course of my
narrative. During the progress of these
discoveries
I was taken ill, and within the same time a
great change has come over Miss Chevillere.'
`A great change,' said she, suddenly turning
full upon me, a deep blush suffusing her face; `in
what respect, sir?'
`Does Miss Virginia ask that question
seriously
?'
`Never was one more seriously propounded.'
`The change has been from hilarity to calm
placidity, as it regards externals.'
`You astonish me!'
`And
you
astonish
me
.'
A laugh ensued, which afforded a favourable
opportunity, and I continued:
`After my recovery, I found that I had rivals;
that it was more difficult than ever to tell upon
what ground I stood;' she smiled, while I
continued
:
`I have now only to offer Miss Chevillere a
skeleton of a hand,' holding out my anatomy, `but
it is an honest one, and is at her disposal, backed
by as warm and ardent an attachment as ever a
man was laughed and fretted into; will you accept
it for better for worse?'
She hung down her head a moment upon the
ends of her fingers, seeming to struggle, I know
not with what; then suddenly placing her hand in
H 2
mine, she said, `I will be as candid and as honest
as yourself,you have left me no alternative.'
But I pass over those delightful passages,
which no human eye shall ever fathom; they are
my own treasures for future retrospection.
Yet I may give you some hints of our
subsequent
conversation, towards the end of the time
spent in the arbour.
`But, Mr. Randolph, you acknowledge that
you have entertained two distinct opinions since
your arrival at Salem; suppose you should have a
third, and a fourth?'
`My changes of opinion,' said I, `have in both
instances taken their cue from your own changes
in deportment; but to tell you the truth, I should
be contented with either set of manners, or with
either opinion of them.'
`Pshaw!' she replied, `you flatter; I thought
we understood each other too plainly for you to
offer such compliments.'
`I would not offend you for the world, dearest
Virginia, nor would I have you to believe that I
pretend not to have studied the change. All that
I meant to convey was, that I was pleased and
delighted
with Virginia Chevillere when I saw her
the lively school-girl, but far more so when I saw
her the reflecting and considerate young lady; and
that I would have been quite contented with the
former if I had never known the latter; nay more,
I will tell you the cause of the change!' Here
she put her little hand over my mouth.
`No, no, no!' said she, `for fear you might
tell the true one, and surely you shall never find
out my secrets for the world, lest I become afraid
of you!'
`Well,' said I, `I am satisfied with the result;
you may keep your own secrets for the present,
but remember a time is coming, and that soon,
when there will be no secrets between us.'
`Hah! are you there?' replied she; `then I
must see all those letters you have been writing to
my cousin and his friend; indeed, now I think of
it, I must see them before'
There she stopped, not knowing how to finish
the sentence, and immediately started up and
attempted
to run towards the house; I caught her,
and, with gentle violence, compelled her to resume
her seat.
`Before when?' said I.
`Before the great day,' she answered, laughing.
`What, the day of judgment?'
`Yes, truly, the day of judgment.'
`But tell me truly, Virginia, how very, very
soon shall that happy day come?'
`One year from next Christmas day.'
`Phew!' whistled I, `a year and a half! Come,
say a week and a half.'
`Why, sir, you have not asked my aunt's
consent
,
nor my cousin's, nor my guardian's.'
`Come, then,' said I, `let us to the house; it
shall soon be done.'
When we were seated in your mother's private
parlour, the old lady looked first at me, and then
at Virginia. The latter sat with her cheeks flushed,
biting the fingers of her gloves into bits, with
side-long
glances at me, and a malicious smile upon her
face. I was meanwhile pulling all the fur off my
hat with one hand, and drumming on the crown
with the other. Virginia could bear this no longer,
but, bursting into a sprightly laugh, flew out of the
room.
`Ah!' said your mother, `I see it all; you
need not pain yourself, Mr. Randolph, in breaking
the subject. Believe me that a woman's vigilance
does not often sleep in these matters.'
`Ah then, dear madam, say that your
judgment
approves of your son's partiality in my
favour
.'
`My
son's
! I thought it was my niece's.'
`Indeed, madam, I mean both, if I dare say
so.'
`Mr. Randolph, you have my cheerful
consent
;
trust me, I have not observed you carelessly,
since your visit to us, to say nothing of the
unbounded
confidence which I place in Victor's
judgment of his associates and school-fellows. To
tell you the truth, he long ago revealed to me his
ardent desire that you and Virginia should become
acquainted, and his conviction that you were
exactly
suited to each other.'
`Do then, dear madam, urge an early day for
our nuptials; your niece's most extravagant
notions
of the length of human life render the request
necessary.'
`My dear sir!' she replied, `you have not yet
consulted your own relations and friends; even if
you had, you would not be married to-night?'
`Madam, I would, if I had my own way,
especially as I have unfortunately no mother and
father to consult.'
`There will then be nothing to prevent your
removing to South Carolina.'
`You forget, madam, that we Virginians are
the most bigoted people in the world about our
own country.'
`You would not separate my adopted daughter
from her widowed mother?'
`By no meansI would take the mother with
the daughter.'
`Have you a home already prepared?'
`I have, madam, the home of my fathers.'
`I fear it will be more difficult to remove you
than I had supposed. Virginia and I have
managed
this business badly. We should have held you
in suspense until you had renounced your country.
But perhaps it is as well thus; forced renunciations
are generally unhappy.'
I need not repeat to you, dear Chevillere, every
word that passed between us; suffice it, therefore,
to inform you, that I am to tear myself away, in a
few days, to the Old Dominion, to prepare for my
nuptials, which will occur immediately on my
return
;
and this, whether you shall have repaired
hither or not. Indeed, you need not be surprised
to see Mr. and Mrs. Randolph in New-York
before
Christmas.
Yours truly,
B. Randolph
.Down low in old Virginny, 25th day of November, in the
year of our Lord one thousand eight hundred and
.
`
Dear Gentlemen
,
`They tell me hereabouts you're married. Well,
hurrah for old Kentuck, I say, and her sister
Carolina
.
I'm married, too! yes, and I believe
everybody's
married, nearabouts, as far as I can learn.
It's twisted strange, ain't it, when a feller gets half
corned,
[5]
[5]
Western term for drunk.
everybody reels round; and when a feller
gets married, everybody else should get married
just at that particular time.
`Yes, it's a fact; it seems to be goin about now
like the influenza and the cholera, and the parsons
are dragged about like country doctors in a panic.
`But keep up your heart, my hearty,' says I to the
old gentleman that coupled us up, `it will soon be
over; for most of 'em won't have it but once, and
it'll soon run through a neighbourhood; and I've
been told it kills very few.'
`But I'm tetotally bamboozled if I ain't tellin
you of the killed and wounded, before I've told
you who fout, and whereaboutsbut let it go, the
lead always comes first, and the powder afterward
a man must let off a little of the extra steam,
you know, or he would burst his biler. I was
always one of them sort of fellers that went upon
the high pressure system.
`But ain't it a little particular now, that I should
be settin here of a rainy day in Mr. Randolph's
househe that you gentlemen talked so much
aboutand be writing you this long letter; my
nose close down on the paper, and strainin my
eyes till every thing in the world looks like
pot-hooks
and hangers when I look up. But I rub my
eyes, and at it again, for fear I might git off the
trail; and my little wife, Betsy, she sits there,
'fraid to wink her eye lest she mout put me out,
and I'll be hanged if she hasn't dropped a dozen
stitches already in that stockin she's knittin, she
says, jist because she can't keep her eyes off my
facewith my eyes and mouth all workin up and
down, like I was makin mouths at the paper, and
could see my face in it. And so I jumped up and
turned the table round, with my back to Betsy,
and now she's giglin at me, because, she says, she
can see the hair on the crown of my head workin
yit, and drops of sweat rollin down my temples
this winter day. `The fact is, Betsy,' says I,
`this pen you made me is like an old field-colt, a
little skittish in the breakin; it goes along as stately
and as stiff as a charger for a little while, until it
comes to some of these hills and gullies in the
paper, and then it begins to prance, and caper, and
git suple in the timbers, until down comes a great
dab of ink, like a rider in the mud. There now,'
says I, `Betsy, I'm hanged if I wouldn't rather
ride a three-year-old filly bare-backed through a
cane-brake, than git a fair start on that pen. You
kin hold on to the mane even if the filly does kick
up behind; but this pen blots it down as bald as a
pancake, no notice and no warnin nor nothin, nor
no mane to hold on to.'
`Well, here I go again, on a new trail, with a
fresh pen. A new broom sweeps clean, they say.
`I have read over now what I've writ, an I'm
dadshamed if it ain't all up in snarls. I don't see
how you'll ever git into it; and what's more, I don't
see how you'll ever git out of it, when once you
are in. I thought I had begun at the beginnin of
my story, when I left you, and had got more than
half-way through by this time. But I find that
I've been poppen my bill into it, and out of it again,
like a kingfisher in a mill-dam; or, maybe, I'm
more like a feller lost in a rye-field, the rye
higher than his head, dodging and poking about;
thinking all the time he's goin straight through,
when, in fact, he ain't gone a hundred yards from
where he started. I can't see, no how, how you
used to git on so slick through them long letters. It
used to look mighty easy; but when a feller comes
to the trial of it, it's a real job, I tell you. The great
drops of sweat come pouring down every now and
then on to the paper, and I jump back, thinkin its
the pen lettin off the steam again; and sure enough,
S 2
the jump starts another great bald blot as black as
a bullet hole; and that's the way I make so many
big stops. You see, I mind my stops, as the
school-master
used to say. Oh! if he had only seen this
letter, if he wouldn't have ruled a page on my
back. You see, I hav'n't got started yet; it's like
a tangled skeene of thread; there's no way of gittin
into it unless you break right in, like an ox into a
corn crib.
`Oh! my stars and turnips! if I did'n't forgit to
tell you how I found old Pete Ironsides; that's
just what was the matter with me. I thought
something was wrong; but hang me if ever I
thought once that that something was old Pete.
He spoke to me the minute I sot my foot inside the
stable-door. `Hello! Pete,' says I, `stand up there;'
and I'm a papist if he didn't laugh as natural as
Mr. Lamar with his white teeth. Yes, he showed
every tooth in his head: he didn't laugh loud, as
one may say, but he laughed
long
though. Oh! it
would have done you good to have seen that
laugh; there was the red and white of his teeth and
gums; I'm a steamboat if it didn't look like a ripe
water-
million
.
`But whose house do you think Pete had been
boarding at? At Betsy's father's. And who's
Betsy? Why Betsy was the little girl I saw in
the Circus. And seeing how well they had treated
Pete, I thought, maybe, they mout treat his betters
as well. And so I struck up to em; and a cleverer
set of people you never saw
south of the Potomack
,
as Mr. Lamar used to say. The old man got
quite in the notion of movin to the West; and sure
enough, he's comin out there next spring, bag and
baggage. And well he may, as I've carried off
the flower of his flock. But I didn't run away with
her; no, no. I asked the old man and old woman,
and all the girls and boys; but I asked her first
though.
`Well now, Betsy,' says I, after I had been
sparkin some weeks, `how would you like to go
to old Kentuck?'
`Do you think father will go sure enough?' said
she.
`Come now, Betsy, none of your playing sly;
you know what I mean.'
`Law, now, Mr. Damon,' says she, `you're such
a funny man, a body never knows how to take you.'
`That's the very thing,' says I; `take me for a
husband.'
`Law, Mr. Damon;' and she put her arm round
her eyes, but I pulled it down again.
`Now,' says I, `Betsy, you must come up to the
scratch now; no flinchin now.'
`So in about ten minutes, when I begun to think
the jig was up with me, for she began to look
serious,
`Well,' says she to me, `you may ask father.'
`I looked over my shoulder just now at her.
`Oh!' says she, `you're writing something about
me now.'
`And with that she jumped up, and snatched
away the paper, and made this great dash you see
here like a fishingpole and a turtle at the end of it.
`There now,' says I, `Betsy, you have made a
pretty spot of work of it.'
`Let me see where I have got to now. Ah! I
seewe had a tare down sneezer of a wedding:
the old folks were quite pleased, and I rather
suspicion the young ones were not far behind
them. After it was all over, and we had all got
settled down agin to the regular old ways, I spoke
up one day at dinner about starting next day to
old Kentuck. The old lady and Betsy took the
hint, and straightways tuned up their pipes.
`But the old gentleman, he was bothered to think
how I was to get Betsy home with me; and to
come right plump down with the plain truth like a
centre shot, I was feelin my way a little when I
began to talk about goin. So the old man he
took the hint, and come up to the trumps like a
white head, I assure you.
`Well,' says he, `to be sure I have been thinking
about that; and I have been studyin some time
whether your horse will work in a one-horse
carriage.'
`What, Pete Ironsides?' said I.
`Yes; Peter, to be sure,' said he.
`Why Pete would no more go inside of harness
than a snappin-turtle would work in a horse-boat.'
`Well, then,' says he, `you must swap him off,
and get one that will; for I've got a clever little
one-horse carriage in my eye, which I'm goin to
buy, and give to Betsy.'
`I wish I may run my head right into a
steamboat
biler, if I would any more part with Pete
than I would part with Betsy.'
`But Betsy struck in here, and told the old man
that she was goin to ride on horseback.
`That's the girl for me,' said I, and there it ended.
`At last the whining and pouting was over (and
that's a kind of work that always makes my throat
raw inside), and we were on the road; and, after
two days' ride, as happy a pair as ever jogged over
a turnpike.
`On the fourth day, at night, we got benighted
near this house; and the rain came pouring down
as if all the steamboats in Christendom had burst
their bilers; and Pete began to get a little
melancholy
,
and I had to sing to him; and Betsy laughed
at me, rain and all. Ah! I like these laughin girls.
But I'm gittin off the trail again.
`Well, I saw a light in these windows, away far
off from the big road yonder. Betsey and I rode
up to the door, and I hallooed and hallooed, but
nobody came. At last I raised a whoop, and if I
didn't wake the snakes and Junebugs in November,
then say I'm a dandy, and eat molasses and pork,
and never went to a Yankee singin-school. I'm
rather of the opinion that I raised the bats out of
a month's nap in these old oaks. Pete raised his
ears, and if his thoughts could be found out, I'll bet
he was on the look-out for the dogs and some
varmint
or other, to come sweepin by with a curley
whoop.
`But I raised the old housekeeper, too, out of a
deep sleep; she came stickin her head, with the
lamp held up above it, through the window, and
her gray hair hanging from under her nightcap,
till she looked for all the world like a little
hail-storm
.
Can a benighted traveller git a night's
lodging
?'
said I.
There is nobody at home,' said she; `Mr.
Beverley Randolph has gone to the Carolinas to
git married.'
Mr. Beverley Randolph?' said I.
Ay, Mr. Beverley Randolph,' said she, `as
tidy a gentleman as ever walked in shoe-leather.'
`And then I made the woods ring again for
gladness, to think what good luck always follows
me. But the old woman looked as bewildered as
a hound off the trail. But I soon put things to
rights. `Halloo, mother,' said I, `Mr. Randolph's
a particular friend of my particular friends Mr.
Chevillere and Mr. Lamar.'
Mr. Lamar and Mr. Chevillere!' said she,
with her great big blue eyes as wide open and as
big as a Liverpool chaney saucer; `why, we expect
them and their wives on here soon, to meet Mr.
Randolph and his wife.'
`And then the old lady told us to get down, and
go into the front porch out of the rain, until she
came. After a while she came down all dressed,
and now that she had got wide awake and a sight
of Betsy's pretty laughing face, she was quite polite.
`But she stared at me most confoundedly at first,
and asked me if I had been to college with the
young gentlemen. `No,' I told her, `we hadn't
been to college together, but we had been on a
northern campaign together against the Yankees;'
but for the life of her she couldn't keep her eyes
off me.
`She soon got us some supper, late as it was, and
had the negroes called up to take care of our
horses. In the morning, and that's to-day, the rain
is still pourin down; so we have concluded to
accept the old lady's invitation to stay till the
weather clears up. She has been asking my wife
something about my acquaintance with you, and
since that she has been wonderful polite; nothing
seems good enough for us now in the eyes of the
old lady. But she still stares at me.
`Me at college with you! well, now, that's a
good one; but I'll be run through a spinnin jinny,
if I havn't seen as big fools as I am come through
a college. I know a feller that's been clean through,
and he writes little, if any, better than I do. He
picks his words maybe a little more; but what's
the difference between one that picks his steps
through a mud-hole, and one that jumps clean
over? I can tell the truth as well as he can, and
I'm sure in a case of needcessity, as one may say,
I could tell a lie that would make him ashamed to
look a college in the face again. I git more off my
land than he does,I'm a better judge of
horse-flesh
,I
can beat him at a foot-race, and throw
him four falls out of five. But, above all, his book
larning has made his head so weak he can't stand
nothin at all. He gits corned on all occasions just
at the very first blush of the thing, as one may say,
and he never gits through a regular frolic unless
he falls through a trap-door, or down two or three
pair of stairs. His face looks like it was boiled
in poke-berry juice and indigo, and hang me if I
don't think he's a little flumucky altogether about
the head. Most of this I rather suspicion mought
be larned in York without a regular sheepskin. I
suppose there's a sheep's head for every skin,
according
to nature.
`College spiles a great many people; not you
and Mr. Lamar,for, as I tell Betsy, I never see
two gentlemen come out with so little blast and
airs about them.
`But, as I was saying, it ruins a power of people;
some gits halfway through like an ear of corn in a
shelling machine,and then it will go neither
backwards
nor forwards, and is jist good for nothin.
`Some kick up like wild colts at the first trainin
to harness, and if they're cleverly broke of them
tricks at the start, they work in harness all their
days pretty well. But if they git the upper hand
the first time, they'll be like runaway horses; they'll
smash things, you may depend upon it, first chance.
Some old regular-built harness nags go well right
off at the start; they may be good at a regular
tug, but they'll never make spirited tackies. Give
me your fiery-blooded colts, that takes a real
teardown
blast at the start, and then behave themselves
well all their lives afterward.
`Take an old field scrub out three or four times
to a military parade, and he gits to prancing and
snorting, and is worth nothing no more neither for
work nor show. Now old Pete's what I call a
well brought up horse; he won't have nothin to
do with parading on one side nor harness on the
other. When he's goin to do a thing, he says so
at once, and there's an end of it. If a nigger comes
behind him, he just backs his ears and kicks him,
and then goes strait ahead again.
`Old Kentuck raises the finest horses in the
universal
well,
now, I wish I may be tetotally
ballgusted
,
if here ain't another pretty piece of business.
I started as fair as a poney-race to tell you all
about colleges and such likes, and here I've got
a-straddle of old Pete, and ridin away through a
Kentuck colt-pen, like a gust of wind over a chaff
bank.
`But I'll tell you what it is, strangers,it's not
sich an easy job to start right off and put down in
black and white every thing that a feller's been
doin for a month of Sundays back. Then there's
all the lines to keep straight; for though Betsy
ruled all the paper, I've a confounded hankering
after the furrows between. Now talkin of
furrows
,
I would rather plough an acre of new ground
any day, than write down one side of a letter. But
it must be done, and so here goes at it agin,but
VOL. II.T
where did I leave off? Oh! I was a-straddle of
Pete, confound him, in a Kentuck colt-pen; but I
had to run and jump through the walls of a college
to get there. But I must turn back, now, and see
what I have writ and what I havn't.
I have hardly writ a single thing I wanted to
write, I'm jist now like I've been at times when I've
been out catting.
[6]
[6]
Throwing for cat-fish.
I could catch every thing but
catsnakes, and turtles, and all other sort of
water varmints except the things I wanted. And
so it is nowI've been trying to fish up several
things that's still at the bottom; but all I can do
nothing will come up but the varmints. Now I
could tell it to you in no time at all. So now as
I have fished you up a mess of all sorts of odd
creters, I may as well gather up all these papers
and put marks on them, so that you will know
which to begin with.
And now it makes me so sorry I don't know
what to doto think I'm goin to tell you both
farewell for ever and ever and ever. But let what
will come, never forget that I am
yours
, till death.
Montgomery Damon
.